OVERSEAS  SWEATSHOP  ABUSES,  THEIR  IMPACT 

ON  U.S.  WORKERS,  AND  THE  NEED  FOR 

ANTI–SWEATSHOP  LEGISLATION 

S.  HRG.  110–1062 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

FEBRUARY  14,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

35–685 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 14, 2007  .......................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Prepared statement of William Jones, Chairman, Cummins-Allison Corp.; 
..........

Member, Board of Directors, U.S. Business and Industry Council 

WITNESSES 

Fuentes, Beatriz, President, Sintrasplendor Union, Splendor Flowers 

English, James D., International Secretary-Treasurer, United Steelworkers  ....
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
..............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Griswold,  Daniel  T.,  Director,  Center  for  Trade  Policy  Studies,  The  Cato 
Institute  ................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jesseph,  Steven  A.,  President/CEO,  Worldwide  Responsible  Apparel  Produc-
tion (WRAP)  ..........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kernaghan, Charles, Executive Director, National Labor Committee  ................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Nazma,  Sheikh,  Founder/Former  President,  Bangladesh  Center  for  Worker 
..............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Socolow,  Hon.  David  J.,  Commissioner,  New  Jersey  Department  of  Labor 
...............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Solidarity 

and Workforce Development 

Athreya,  Bama  and  Ferm,  Nora,  International  Labor  Rights  Fund  (ILRF), 
joint prepared statement  .....................................................................................
..........

Snowe, Hon. Olympia J., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement 

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
4 
1 

22 

32 
33 
5 
6 

38 
40 

11 
13 
25 
29 

8 
9 

35 
37 

56 
55 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSEAS  SWEATSHOP  ABUSES,  THEIR 

IMPACT  ON  U.S.  WORKERS,  AND  THE  NEED 

FOR  ANTI–SWEATSHOP  LEGISLATION 

WEDNESDAY,  FEBRUARY  14,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:05 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. I am calling the hearing to order this morning. 
This  is  a  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  of  the  Commerce  Com-
mittee, and I am Chairman of the Interstate Commerce, Trade, and 
Tourism Subcommittee. Senator DeMint, who is the Ranking Mem-
ber, will be with us shortly. And when he does arrive, I will recog-
nize him for an opening statement. 

We  have  a  hearing  today  on  the  issue  of  overseas  sweatshop 
abuses, their impact on U.S. workers, and the need for anti-sweat-
shop legislation. I have introduced such legislation here in the U.S. 
Senate, and today we will examine this issue in some detail. 

The global economy is producing a lot of interesting results, some 
quite wonderful and some very beneficial to our country and others 
around  the  world,  and  some  that  are  not  so  wonderful,  some  that 
cause very significant problems in our country. And yesterday’s an-
nouncement  of  a  trade  deficit,  for  the  last  year,  of  $832  billion  is 
a  demonstration  of  the  fact  that  our  trade  policy  is  far  out  of  bal-
ance and needs to be changed. 

When  manufacturing  plants  in  foreign  countries  are  able  to 
grossly  mistreat  workers  with  impunity,  our  own  workers  will  suf-
fer,  as  well.  We  see  a  movement  going  on,  in  the  global  economy, 
of  American  jobs  moving  overseas,  and  some  think  that’s  fine.  I 
don’t. It is an opportunity for those that produce products to circle 
the globe and find the lowest cost of production, and, with that low-
est  cost  of  production,  to  employ  foreign  workers—in  some  cases, 
in countries where you can pay pennies an hour; in some cases, in 
countries  where  if  someone  dares  talk  about  organizing  workers, 
they can be sent to prison; in some cases, in countries where work-
ers have no rights at all. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

I  think  while  there  are  differences  of  opinion  about  these  trade 
issues, I believe there should be general uniform opinion on a cou-
ple  of  things.  We’ve  already  reached  a  uniform  judgment  on  the 
question of whether products that are produced in foreign prisons— 
that  is,  products  of  prison  labor—should  be  imported  into  this 
country  and  represented  as  products  that  are  engaged  in  fair  com-
petition  with  our  producers.  The  answer  for  our  country  has  been 
to say no, the product of prison labor is not acceptable. And so, we 
do not allow the import of the product of prison labor. 

What  about  the  product  of  labor  that  is  produced—or  of  goods 
that are produced in sweatshop labor conditions, in plants in which 
gross violations of the existing laws in the existing countries—gross 
violations  of  workers’  rights,  are  routine?  Should  the  product  that 
comes from foreign sweatshops be allowed into this country? If not, 
what  do  we  do  to  try  to  prevent  the  import  of  goods  produced  in 
sweatshop conditions? 

I’ve introduced a piece of legislation to deal with these problems, 
S.  367,  the  Decent  Working  Conditions  and  Fair  Competition  Act. 
The  bill  would  do  two  things.  First,  the  bill  says  it  is  illegal  to 
bring the product of sweatshop factories to this country. In this bill, 
a  ‘‘sweatshop  factory,’’  is  one  where  workers  are  abused,  in  viola-
tion of their own country’s labor laws. Second, the bill would allow 
U.S. retailers the right to sue their competitors for damages in U.S. 
courts  if  their  competitors  are  sourcing  their  merchandise  from 
sweatshop factories. 

This  is  a  bipartisan  bill.  I’m  grateful  that  Senator  Lindsey  Gra-
ham,  the  Senator  from  South  Carolina,  has  agreed  to  be  the  lead 
Republican cosponsor. 

And the reason I decided to introduce the bill was the revelation 
that  there  are  serious  sweatshop  abuses  in  a  number  of  areas  of 
the  country;  most  recently,  discussions  about  sweatshop  abuses  in 
the  country  of  Jordan.  Some  witnesses  invited  to  testify  today  will 
speak about this issue. 

When  our  trade  negotiators  negotiated  the  Jordan  Free  Trade 
Agreement,  in  October  of  2000,  I  gave  the  Clinton  Administration 
credit  for  giving  some  thought  to  putting  labor  provisions  in  that 
trade agreement. It is the only trade agreement in which labor pro-
visions  have  been  included.  But  those  labor  provisions  have  not 
been  enforced,  and  the  result  is  the  proliferation  of  sweatshops  in 
a  portion  of  Jordan.  Examples  of  workers  promised  $120  in  a 
month,  and  hardly  paid  at  all;  one  worker,  paid  $50  for  5  full 
months of work; a 40-hour shift in one plant—not a 40-hour week, 
a 40-hour shift. 

In  November  of  2006,  BusinessWeek  had  a  cover  story  on  sweat-
shop abuses, titled ‘‘Secrets, Lies, and Sweatshops.’’ The article be-
gins  with  a  description  of  a  Chinese  company,  called  Ningbo  Beifa 
Group.  This  Chinese  company  has  made  a  great  deal  of  money  as 
a top supplier of pens, mechanical pencils, and highlighters to Wal- 
Mart stores and other major retailers. 

In  2005,  according  to  the  BusinessWeek  stories,  Wal-Mart  in-
spected  the  company’s  factories.  It  found  that  the  company  in 
China  was  paying  its  3,000  workers  less  than  China’s  minimum 
wage,  and  violating  overtime  rules.  So,  they  asked  the  company  to 
fix  the  problems.  On  three  successive  inspections,  it  was  clear  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

Chinese  company  had  failed  to  do  so.  Three  times,  Wal-Mart  told 
the  company  it  would  get  another  chance.  When  Wal-Mart  issued 
a fourth warning, the Chinese turned to another Chinese company, 
called  the  Shanghai  Corporate  Responsibility  Management  &  Con-
sulting  Company.  For  a  $5,000  fee,  the  company  promised  to  send 
a consultant to take care of the Wal-Mart problem. That consultant 
provided  advice  on  how  to  create  fake,  but  authentic-looking,  pay-
roll records, and the consultant also told the company that, on the 
day  of  the  fourth  Wal-Mart  audit,  they  should  give  the  day  off  to 
any workers with grievances so that they would not tell any incon-
venient  stories.  Following  the  consultant’s  advice,  the  Chinese  fac-
tory  passed  the  Wal-Mart  audit,  even  though  the  China  company 
later  admitted  it  didn’t  change—hadn’t  changed  any  of  its  prac-
tices. 

I don’t believe, in this case, Wal-Mart deliberately turned a blind 
eye  to  these  practices.  There  are  certainly  documented  cases  of 
other companies that sell sweatshop products in the United States. 
But  I  do  think  that  companies  that  decide  to  import  products  into 
this  country  should  not  be  allowed  to  gain  an  unfair  advantage  by 
deliberately  sourcing  from  sweatshop  factories  that  abuse  workers 
abroad. 

The  bill  I’ve  introduced  with  Senator  Graham  would  address 
such  abuses  by  banning  the  importation  or  sale  of  products  made 
in factories under, quote, ‘‘sweatshop,’’ unquote, conditions. 

This bill has also been sent to the Finance Committee. I’ve writ-
ten  to  Chairman  Baucus,  asking  for  a  hearing  in  that  committee. 
It’s  appropriate  for  this  committee  to  also  hold  a  hearing  to  exam-
ine  the  issue  of  sweatshops.  The  import  restrictions  on  sweatshop 
goods  under  this  bill  would  be  administered  by  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission,  which  falls  within  the  jurisdiction  of  this  sub-
committee. 

Today, we’re going to hear from a broad range of witnesses about 
the  issue  of  overseas  sweatshops,  and  I  thank  them  for  coming. 
Betty  Fuentes  is  a  Colombian  worker  in  a  flower  plantation,  and, 
3  years  ago,  founded  one  of  the  first  unions  of  flower  workers  in 
that  country.  Sheikh  Nazma  began  working  in  a  Bangladeshi 
sweatshop  when  she  was  10  years  old,  and  eventually  organized 
her co-workers and formed the Bangladesh Center for Worker Soli-
darity. Charles Kernaghan is the executive director of the National 
Labor  Committee,  which  has  spearheaded  a  number  of  investiga-
tions  into  sweatshop  abuses  around  the  world.  Jim  English  is  sec-
retary  treasurer  of  the  United  Steel  Workers,  which  has  been  ac-
tively involved in the fight against sweatshop abuses overseas. Wil-
liam  Jones  is  chairman  of  the  U.S.  Business  and  Industry  Council 
but  it  is  my  understanding  that  Mr.  Jones,  because  of  travel  prob-
lems  in  Chicago,  is  not  able  to  be  with  us  today.  David  Socolow, 
a  New  Jersey  commissioner  of  labor,  is  part  of  a  multistate  effort 
to  fight  sweatshop  abuses  through  rules  on  State  government  pro-
curement.  Steven  Jesseph  is  the  vice  chairman  of  Worldwide  Re-
sponsible  Apparel  Production,  a  group  founded  by  the  American 
Apparel  and  Footwear  Association.  And  Dan  Griswold,  director  of 
the  Center  for  Trade  Policy  Studies  at  the  Cato  Institute,  a  think 
tank based in Washington, D.C. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

I  want  to  thank  all  of  the  witnesses  who  have  come  today,  and 
let me call next, for an opening statement, on my colleague Senator 
DeMint. 

Senator DeMint? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  you 
pulling  together  this  hearing.  It  is  important  that  we  have  a  com-
prehensive review of labor conditions that our companies are doing 
business with and that our consumers are buying products from. 

I  think  we  all  know  that  trade,  on  the  whole,  has  done  much 
around  the  world  to  raise  the  standard  of  living  of  many  people. 
We’ve  also  seen  that  good  trade  agreements  with  other  countries 
not only help to guarantee human rights, but also set labor stand-
ards, which these trade agreements call on for enforcement. 

We’re  very  aware  that  we  still  have  problems  around  the  world. 
Hearings  like  this  can  continue  to  shine  the  light  on  those  prob-
lems, and, hopefully, we can begin to solve them, working with our 
corporate citizens as well as other countries. 

We  know  the  media  has  helped  to  bring  these  problems  to  light. 
Most  of  our  companies  in  this  country  have  demonstrated  a  lot  of 
corporate responsibility in how they’ve dealt with this. Again, most 
are  good.  But  we  have  some  examples,  as  we’ll  hear  today,  where 
not all is perfect. 

One of the best things, I think, that is going on is the monitoring 
and  certification  of  plants  around  the  world  so  that  American  cus-
tomers  of  these  products  will  know  who  they’re  doing  business 
with,  and  we  can  continue  to  put  pressure  on  companies  abroad. 
As  we  do  that,  it’s  important  that  we  don’t  cause  more  harm 
than  good.  While  there  are  sweatshops  which  we  need  to  look  at, 
Mr. Chairman, certainly many jobs have been provided around the 
world  by  American  companies  buying  products  from  all  over  the 
world, and we want to make sure that, as we attempt to stamp out 
the  bad  actors,  that  we  don’t  eliminate  jobs  for  many  low-income 
workers  around  the  world  by  creating  undue  liability  and  risk  for 
companies who make products made abroad. A comprehensive eval-
uation is important. 

And,  Mr.  Chairman,  if  it  would  be  acceptable  to  you,  as  part  of 
the  first  panel,  I  understand  that  Steven  Jesseph  has  some  sched-
uling  difficulties,  and  I  may  not  be  able  to  stay  through  the  entire 
second  panel,  and  it  would  probably  provide  good  balance,  on  the 
first panel, if we could hear from the problems, but also how moni-
toring and certification is working. And unless you object, sir, could 
Mr.  Jesseph  possibly  be  the  third  witness  on  the  first  panel  this 
morning? 

Senator  DORGAN.  That  would  be  perfectly  acceptable  if  Mr. 
Jesseph  would  be  willing  to  come  forward.  I  understand  you  have 
some  scheduling  issues,  and  I  expect  there  are  a  lot  of  people  in 
Washington,  D.C.,  trying  to  figure  out  their  schedules  these  days. 

Senator DEMINT. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.  But  let  us  have  you  on  the  first  panel,  and  we 
will  have  you  provide  your  testimony  following  the  first  two  wit-
nesses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. Of course. 
Senator DEMINT. And I’ll yield back. 
Senator DORGAN. Let me introduce the first panel. 
First,  we  have  Betty  Fuentes,  a  Colombian  worker  in  a  flower 
plantation.  Three  years  ago,  she  founded  one  of  the  first  unions  of 
flower workers in that country. Her visit has been sponsored by the 
International  Labor  Rights  Fund.  Since  Ms.  Fuentes  speaks  very 
little  English,  Nora  Ferm,  of  the  International  Labor  Rights  Fund, 
will  serve  as  an  interpreter.  Nora  speaks  fluent  Spanish  and  has 
worked in both Colombia and Ecuador. 

Next,  we  will  have  Sheikh  Nazma—I  hope  I  have  pronounced 
that  correctly.  She  began  working  in  textile  sweatshops  in  Ban-
gladesh  when  she  was  10  years  old,  organized  her  co-workers,  and 
formed a Bangladesh Center for Worker Solidarity. 
I want to thank both of the witnesses for coming. 
Nazma  speaks  very  limited  English,  and  we  have  an  interpreter 
with  her.  And  I’ll  ask  the  interpreter  to  identify  herself  when  we 
have Ms. Nazma testify. 

Let us hear now from Ms. Fuentes. 

STATEMENT OF BEATRIZ FUENTES, PRESIDENT, 
SINTRASPLENDOR UNION, SPLENDOR FLOWERS 

Ms. FUENTES. My name is Beatriz Fuentes. I’ve been working in 
the  flower  industry  in  Colombia  for  10  years,  and  I  have  two  chil-
dren. Today, on Valentine’s Day, I’m here to talk about my experi-
ence in the flower sector. 

First,  workers  face  a  lot  of  harassment  and  retaliation  when  we 
try to form a union, to exercise our right to freedom of association, 
and  to  improve  our  working  conditions.  At  the  Splendor  Flowers 
Plantation,  which  is  owned  by  the  multinational  company,  Dole, 
my  co-workers  and  I  formed  a  union  in  November  2004.  The  com-
pany used many tactics to try to weaken our union and avoid nego-
tiating  a  collective  bargaining  agreement.  The  management  called 
up  a  company  union  and  signed  a  collective  bargaining  agreement 
with them. Any worker that joined this company union received ap-
proximately  $20  as  an  incentive.  In  addition,  management  lent  a 
company-owned  bus  to  transport  workers  to  the  assembly  of  this 
management-sponsored  union  during  working  hours.  Management 
representatives  pressured  workers  not  to  join  the  independent 
union. 

The  Colombian  Government  gave  our  independent  union  legal 
recognition in 2005. However, despite this recognition, Dole decided 
to close the Splendor plantation instead of negotiating with the fa-
cility  that  now  had  the  strongest  independent  union  among  Dole- 
owned plantations. There is no proof that Splendor was a losing en-
terprise. We fear that Dole will soon declare the closure of its only 
other plantation with an independent union, La Fragancia. 

The second thing that worries us is the lack of protection against 
occupational  health  risks.  This  leads  to  health  issues—allergies, 
respiratory  complications,  and  eye  problems.  One  reason  I  decided 
to organize a union was that I saw how they were simply firing my 
sick co-workers. If you are sick, you are simply out of a job. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Another  issue  in  the  flower  industry  is  the  requirement  that  fe-
male job applicants submit to questioning regarding whether or not 
they  are,  or  plan  to  become  in  the  near  future,  pregnant.  As  well, 
they’re  required  to  undergo  a  medical  examination  by  a  company 
doctor  to  prove  they  are  not  pregnant.  Unfortunately,  this  is  com-
mon industry practice. 

Aggravating  the  situation  for  workers  is  the  inordinately  long 
time  it  takes  for  the  Ministry  of  Labor  to  resolve  worker-rights 
cases.  For  example,  in  early  2005,  my  union  filed  several  com-
plaints before a labor judge regarding occupational health problems 
and  violations  of  the  right  to  organize.  As  I  sit  here,  not  one  of 
these cases has been resolved. In contrast, there’s another decision 
to  be  rendered  rather  quickly  next  week.  It  is  one  where  Splendor 
Flowers,  just  6  weeks  ago,  asked  the  Ministry  of  Labor  to  approve 
the  mass  firing  of  all  workers  at  that  plantation.  Next  week,  you 
Senators  will  still  have  your  jobs,  but  my  workers  may  not  have 
theirs. 

In sum, workers in the Colombian flower industry are faced with 
low wages, long working hours, and poor and illegal company prac-
tices. All of this adds up to social instability and the disintegration 
of families in the flower-growing region. 

Thank  you  for  allowing  me  to  share  this  testimony,  and  I  hope 

you take it into consideration in considering S. 367. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Fuentes follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BEATRIZ FUENTES, PRESIDENT, SINTRASPLENDOR UNION, 

SPLENDOR FLOWERS 

Introduction 

I  am  the  President  of  the  Sintrasplendor  union,  which  was  founded  in  November 
2004  at  the  Splendor  Flowers  plantation  in  Colombia,  a  farm  belonging  the  multi-
national  Dole.  I  have  more  than  10  years  of  experience  working  in  the  Colombian 
cut  flower  industry.  For  Valentine’s  Day,  the  day  when  more  Americans  buy  cut 
flowers  from  Colombia  than  any  other  day  of  the  year,  I  have  traveled  to  the  U.S. 
to share my testimony about the poor working conditions that exist in many Colom-
bian  flower  plantations,  and  which  I  have  experienced  firsthand  over  the  past  dec-
ade. 

My  co-workers  and  I  have  witnessed  the  limitations  of  Colombian  labor  law  en-
forcement,  and  voluntary  initiatives  in  addressing  these  serious  labor  rights  viola-
tions.  New,  enforceable  strategies  are  needed  to  effectively  guarantee  workers’ 
rights in this industry. 
Occupational Health and Safety 

Flower  workers  are  inadequately  protected  against  occupational  hazards.  In  the 
greenhouses, we are exposed on a daily basis to highly toxic chemicals, without suf-
ficient  protection.  We  are  also  exposed  to  extreme  temperatures,  and  we  work  long 
hours doing repetitive tasks. These conditions cause serious health problems includ-
ing allergies, respiratory problems, eye problems, spinal problems, and carpal tunnel 
syndrome. 

I  have  had  a  problem  with  carpal  tunnel  syndrome  for  the  past  5  years,  due  to 
the  fact  that  I  have  had  to  spend  8–10  hours  straight  cutting  stems  with  scissors. 
Most workers are assigned to one job for several months at a time, frequently caus-
ing  repetitive  motion  injuries.  Currently,  we  must  trim  300–400  flowers  per  hour. 
On  July  14,  2005,  there  was  a  tragic  accident  on  one  of  the  company  buses  on 
which we ride to work every day. On that day, as on most days, the bus was exces-
sively overloaded. We had asked them to fix this problem but they hadn’t done any-
thing  about  it.  Several  workers  were  killed  or  injured.  I  was  on  this  bus  when  the 
accident occurred. 
Forced Pregnancy Testing 

It  is  also  common  for  flower  plantations  to  require  female  job  applicants  to  take 
a  pregnancy  test  to  demonstrate  that  they  are  not  pregnant,  which  is  illegal.  Or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

they  ask  if  we  are  planning  on  having  more  children,  and  if  we  have  had  an  oper-
ation.  The  management  does  not  do  this  out  of  concern  that  the  pregnant  women 
are  exposed  to  the  same  toxic  pesticides  as  all  of  the  other  workers.  They  do  it  be-
cause  they  don’t  want  to  pay  the  maternity  leave  or  the  other  benefits  legally  due 
to pregnant workers. 
Union Busting 

Colombia  is  the  most  dangerous  country  in  the  world  to  be  a  trade  union  leader. 
Compared  to  other  sectors,  the  cut  flower  industry  fortunately  has  not  experienced 
the  same  extreme  level  of  trade  union  violence.  Other  forms  of  retaliation  against 
unions  remain  all  too  common,  however,  and  we  hope  that  the  violence  will  not  es-
calate. 

My  co-workers  and  I  founded  a  new  independent  union  at  Splendor  Flowers, 
called  Sintrasplendor,  in  November  2004.  We  were  motivated  to  form  a  union  be-
cause  of  the  worsening  conditions  at  Splendor.  The  company  began  assigning  more 
and  more  flowerbeds  to  each  worker,  making  the  workload  intolerable.  Over  the 
past 10 years, the workload has doubled from 15–20 flowerbeds up to 30–40 flower-
beds  per  worker.  This  means  more  backbreaking  labor  for  no  more  pay.  Lately  the 
company  has  been  firing  sick  workers  and  old  workers.  They  also  announced  that 
they  would  soon  turn  some  jobs  over  to  subcontractors,  which  means  that  those 
workers will lose the little job stability that they currently have. The company was 
writing  up  its  own  collective  agreements  and  making  the  workers  sign  them,  with-
out even giving them a chance to voice their opinions. We hoped that a union would 
enable  us  to  present  a  petition  to  the  company,  and  therefore  negotiate  improved 
working conditions, guaranteed overtime pay, and salary increases. 

Sintrasplendor  was  the  first  independent  union  to  be  successfully  established  in 
a  Dole-owned  flower  company  in  Colombia.  When  Sintrasplendor  received  its  reg-
istration from the Ministry of Social Protection, the company presented a list of ob-
jections, asking the Ministry to revoke the registration. Splendor Flowers used var-
ious  forms  of  persecution  against  the  independent  union,  including  assigning  extra 
work on days when the Sintrasplendor had planned assemblies and other union-re-
lated activities. 

The  company  invited  in  another  union  and  signed  a  collective  bargaining  agree-
ment  with  them  almost  immediately.  The  agreement  said  that  any  worker  who 
joined  the  company  union,  Sinaltraflor,  would  be  rewarded  with  40,000  pesos  (ap-
proximately  US$20).  The  company  wanted  the  majority  of  workers  to  join 
Sinaltraflor,  because  they  could  then  negotiate  with  Sinaltraflor  instead  of  with 
Sintrasplendor.  The  company  even  lent  one  of  its  buses  to  take  workers  to  a 
Sinaltraflor  meeting,  during  working  hours.  Company  representatives  pressured 
workers  not  to  join  Sintrasplendor.  When  we  distributed  flyers  in  the  plantation  to 
explain to workers why we had formed an independent union, the company prohib-
ited workers from reading them. According to Colombian law, it is legal to read this 
kind of flyer inside the workplace, during lunchtime or a break. 

The Colombian government recognized our union as a legal entity in 2005. Never-

theless, the company still has not sat down to negotiate with us. 

On October 12, 2006 Dole announced that it would close the Corzo farm at Splen-
dor Flowers. We believe that the motivation behind this closure is that the company 
did  not  want  to  provide  basic  rights  and  decent  work  conditions  to  its  workers. 
Clearly,  we  can  not  trust  our  local  laws  to  protect  our  labor  rights—including  our 
right to organize—but rather we need new and enforceable international legal tools 
to ensure these rights. 

Splendor-Corzo  will  officially  close  in  mid  2007  after  the  company  completes  the 
necessary legal processes. Corzo is the larger of the two farms at Splendor Flowers. 
Dole  justifies  the  closure  of  Splendor-Corzo  by  saying  that  it  has  ‘‘historically  pro-
duced  products  with  limited/seasonal  demand  and  have  high  costs’’.  However,  in 
2001 Splendor Flowers was the second most successful flower company in Colombia, 
reaching  19  million  dollars  in  sales.  Dole  has  not  provided  evidence  that  Splendor 
is  a  losing  enterprise.  It  appears  that  the  plantation  closure  is  a  response  to  the 
growing  support  for  Sintrasplendor.  Splendor  management  has  been  offering  work-
ers  compensation  to  get  them  to  resign.  This  past  weekend,  they  fired  over  200 
workers.  Of  more  than  2000  workers  employed  at  this  plantation  in  2006,  only  150 
remain.  We  are  worried  that  Dole  will  soon  announce  the  closure  of  La  Fragancia, 
the other plantation where an independent union has successfully been established. 
Lack of Recourse to Labor Authorities 

Colombian  workers  who  want  to  file  complaints  about  labor  rights  violations  are 
often discouraged because governmental institutions like the Ministry of Labor take 
so  long  to  resolve  these  cases.  For  example,  in  early  2005,  my  union  filed  several 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

complaints  before  a  labor  judge,  regarding  occupational  health  problems  and  viola-
tions  of  the  right  to  organize.  Almost  2  years  have  passed  and  none  of  these  cases 
have been resolved. Meanwhile, a month and a half ago the company filed a request 
with  the  Ministry  of  Labor  to  approve  the  mass  firing  of  all  workers  at  Splendor 
Flowers,  so  they  can  close  the  farm.  The  decision  is  expected  to  be  released  next 
week. Apparently, justice comes faster for companies than for workers. 
Conclusion 

Because  of  the  low  wages  in  this  sector  and  the  long  working  hours,  I  have  very 
little  time  to  spend  with  my  two  young  children,  and  lack  the  money  to  give  them 
a  decent  education.  The  realities  of  the  flower  industry  have  contributed  to  social 
instability  and  disintegration  of  many  families  in  the  flower-growing  region  of  Co-
lombia. 

We  need  effective  legal  mechanisms  to  ensure  that  these  companies  give  us  safe, 
healthy, and decent workplaces. Thank you for allowing me to share this testimony, 
and I hope you take it into account in the consideration of S. 367. 

Senator DORGAN. Ms. Fuentes, thank you very much for your tes-

timony. 

tify herself? 

Next,  we’ll  hear  from  Ms.  Nazma.  And  will  the  interpreter  iden-

Ms.  IQBAL.  My  name  is  Sunita  Iqbal.  I’m  a  paralegal  in  New 
York, and I was asked to interpret for her. My parents speak Ben-
gali,  and  I’ve  been  speaking  it  in  the  house  since  I  was  a  child,  so 
translating, in that sense. 

STATEMENT OF SHEIKH NAZMA, FOUNDER/ 
FORMER PRESIDENT, BANGLADESH CENTER 

FOR WORKER SOLIDARITY 

Ms.  NAZMA.  My  name  is  Sheikh  Nazma.  I’m  from  Bangladesh.  I 
started working, when I was 12 years old, as a helper in a garment 
export factory, and we worked 10 to 14 hours a day, 7 days a week. 
In  1993,  I  helped  organize  the  first  major  struggle  in  a  garment 
factory to win our rights and organize a union. I started—later on, 
I  started  the  Bangladesh  Center  for  Worker  Solidarity,  and—of 
which  I  was  president.  That  is  when  serious  threats  began.  Gang 
members,  thugs,  sent  by  management,  constantly  harassed  and 
threatened me. On many occasions, I was assaulted and ruthlessly 
beaten. 

In  March  2005,  the  threats  became  serious  for  me,  and  I  had  to 
come  to  the  United  States.  In  2006,  I  applied  for  asylum.  My  col-
leagues at the Bangladesh Center for Worker Solidarity have been 
involved  in  a  9-month  investigation  of  a  large  factory  called  Har-
vest  Rich,  which  is  located  in  the  Narayarganj  District  of  Ban-
gladesh,  where  clothing  is  sewn  for  Wal-Mart,  Hanes,  JCPenney, 
Puma, and other European companies. 

When  the  research  began,  in  June,  we  discovered  scores  of  chil-
dren, just 11, 12, and 13 years of age, working at the Harvest Rich 
factory; more than three- to four hundred adolescents, 14, 15, to 16 
and  17  years  old  were  also  illegally  employed  at  Harvest  Rich. 
Halima  was  one  of  the  11-year-old  workers.  She  was  routinely 
forced to work 11 to 14 hours, from 8 a.m. to 7 p.m., and most com-
monly  until  10  p.m.  She  was  at  the  factory  7  days  a  week,  with 
an average of just 2 days off a month. 

It  was  not  uncommon  for  Halima  and  the  other  children  to  be 
working at the factory 95 hours a week, but the situation got even 
worse.  Before  clothing  shipments  had  to  leave  for  the  U.S.,  they 
were  often  mandatory  19-  to  20-hour  shifts,  from  8  a.m.  to  3-to-4 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

a.m.  The  workers  would  sleep  on  the  factory  floor  for  the  next  few 
hours  before  getting  up  for  their  next  shift  in  the  morning.  If  they 
did  anything  wrong,  they  were  beaten  every  day.  They  were  also 
cursed  at.  And  if  they  fell  behind  in  their  production  goal,  they 
were  also  beaten.  For  this,  Halima  and  the  other  children  were 
paid  6  cents  an  hour,  53  cents  a  day,  and  $3.20  a  week.  We  esti-
mate  that  the  workers  were  cheated  for  up  to  half  of  their  wages 
legally due to them, and anyone daring to ask for their legal wages 
would be fired. 

Corporate  monitoring  did  not  work  at  the  Harvest  Rich  factory. 
The  monitors  arrived,  the  children  workers  were  hidden  in  the 
filthy  bathrooms  or  put  on  the  roof.  The  factory  kept  two  sets  of 
time records, using the falsified one to show to the monitors. 

Since  the  campaign  has  started  on  Harvest  Rich,  it  has  been 
largely  successful  in  ending  the  hiring  of  children  under  13  years 
of  age,  though  they’re  not  getting  their  labor  rights  or  violations— 
and they’re being violated in the factory. 

The garment industry is doing very well in Bangladesh, and this 
would be good news if the garment workers were getting their legal 
rights and they were respected and they earned a wage that would 
allow  them  to  live  well.  Bangladesh  is  sending  1  billion  garments 
to  the  U.S.  last  year,  and  it  would  be  a  good  thing  if  the  workers 
were being treated fairly and they were receiving their rights prop-
erly. 

The  demands  of  the  Harvest  Rich  workers  are  very  modest. 
They’re  willing  to  work  10  to  12  hours  a  day,  as  long  as  the  over-
time  is  voluntary  and  paid  correctly.  They  need  1  day  off  a  week, 
as they are exhausted. And the beatings must end. 

Bangladeshi  workers  want  to  be  able  to  work  properly,  but  they 

also want their rights respected and the law followed. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Nazma follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SHEIKH NAZMA, FOUNDER/FORMER PRESIDENT, 

BANGLADESH CENTER FOR WORKER SOLIDARITY 

My name is Sheikh Nazma and I am from Bangladesh. 
I  started  working  when  I  was  12  years  old,  as  a  helper  in  a  garment  export  fac-
tory called Bay Garments Ltd. At that time, in 1984 we worked 10–14 hours a day 
and 7 days a week. For this we earned 240 Taka a month, which comes to 21⁄2 U.S. 
cents  an  hour.  I  worked  for  10  years  in  the  garment  factories,  eventually  becoming 
a  skilled  sewing  operator.  But  in  every  factory  I  worked,  the  legal  rights  of  the 
workers—80  percent  of  whom  were  young  women—were  repressed.  Then,  in  1993, 
I  helped  to  organize  the  first  major  struggle  in  a  garment  factory  to  win  our  rights 
and  organize  a  union.  The  factory  was  called  Comtret  Apparels  Ltd.  It  took  6 
months of struggle, but eventually we won. 

That was how the Bangladesh Center for Worker Solidarity (BCWS) was formed, 
of which I was the president. The AFL–CIO Solidarity Center has helped us in our 
struggle. 

That  is  when  the  serious  threats  began.  Gang  members,  thugs,  sent  by  manage-
ment  constantly  harassed  and  threatened  us.  On  many  occasions  I  was  assaulted 
and ruthlessly beaten. 

For  years,  as  we  carried  out  the  work  of  the  Bangladesh  Center  for  Worker  Soli-
darity  Center,  accompanying  and  providing  support  for  the  garment  workers  in 
their struggle to win their legal rights, the threats continued. 

In  March  2005  the  threats  against  my  life  became  very  serious  and  I  had  to  flee 

to the United States, where I was granted legal asylum on 2006. 

In 1992, there were as many as 100,000 child workers toiling under unsafe condi-
tions  in  Bangladesh’s  booming  garment  export  factories.  It  was  a  huge  problem, 
with children as young as 6, 7, 8 years old, forced to work 12 or more hours a day, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

mony on. 

often  7  days  a  week.  Then,  largely  due  to  legislation  proposed  in  the  U.S.  Senate, 
the exploitation of child workers was ended. 

But  it  is  starting  to  come  back  again,  and  this  is  what  I  want  to  focus  my  testi-

My  colleagues  at  the  Bangladesh  Center  for  Workers  Solidarity  have  been  in-
volved  in  a  nine-month  investigation  of  a  large  factory  called  Harvest  Rich,  which 
is  located  in  the  Narayarganj  District  of  Bangladesh,  where  clothing  is  sewn  for 
Wal-Mart, Hanes, J.C. Penney, Puma and other European companies. 

This  is  what  we  found.  When  the  research  began  in  June,  we  discovered  scores 
of  children  just  11,  12  and  13  years  of  age  working  at  the  Harvest  Rich  factory. 
More  than  300  to  400  adolescents—14,  15,  15  and  17  years  old—were  also  illegally 
employed  at  Harvest  Rich.  Under  Bangladeshi  law,  factories  are  strictly  prohibited 
from  hiring  anyone  under  14  years  of  age,  while  adolescent  workers  between  the 
ages  of  14  and  17  can  only  be  employed  under  special  circumstances,  and  are  al-
lowed to work just 5 hours a day for a maximum of 30 hours per week. Also, adoles-
cents may never work at night. 

Halima was one of the 11 year-old workers. Routinely, she was forced to work 11 
to 14 hours a day, from 8 a.m. to 7, or more commonly 10 p.m. She was at the fac-
tory  7  days  a  week,  with  an  average  of  just  2  days  off  a  month.  It  was  not  uncom-
mon for Halima and the other children to be at the factory 95 hours a week. 

But  it  got  even  worse.  Before  clothing  shipments  had  to  leave  for  the  U.S.,  there 
were  often  mandatory  19  to  20-hour  all-night  shifts  from  8  a.m.  right  through  to 
3  or  4  a.m.  the  following  day,  after  which  the  workers  would  sleep  on  the  factory 
floor  for  a  few  hours  before  beginning  the  next  shift  at  8  a.m.  that  same  morning. 
Even  the  child  workers  could  be  forced  to  work  such  grueling  all-night  shifts  three 
or  four  times  a  month.  While  paying  a  very  rare  unannounced  visit  to  the  Harvest 
Rich  factory  in  November,  U.S.  company  representatives  found  dozens  of  workers 
at  12:30  a.m.  still  sewing  boys  Faded  Glory  jeans  for  Wal-Mart,  161⁄2 hours  into 
what  would  have  been  a  19  to  20-hour  shift  had  the  executives  not  sent  the  ex-
hausted workers home. 

Halima  worked  as  a  helper,  just  as  I  did  when  I  started  out  when  I  was  12.  A 
helper’s  job  is  to  clean  the  finished  garment  by  cutting  off  any  loose  threads  that 
may  remain.  Halima  was  given  a  mandatory  production  goal  of  cleaning  150  gar-
ments  an  hour—she  was  working  on  Hanes  underwear—one  every  24  seconds.  The 
pace was relentless. 

She  was  on  her  feet  all  day,  standing  at  a  high  table.  Sometimes,  she  said,  she 
just  fell  down  or  fainted  from  exhaustion.  The  factory  was  hot  and  all  the  workers 
were sweating. 

If Halima or another young worker made a mistake, they were beaten. This hap-
pened every day, the workers said. They would be slapped very hard by their super-
visor,  who  was  always  a  man,  and  sometimes  the  children  cried.  They  were  also 
cursed  at.  If  they  fell  behind  in  their  production  goal,  they  would  also  be  beaten, 
or if they used the bathroom without permission. They were only allowed two visits 
a day, and the bathroom was filthy, without toilet paper, soap or towels. 

For  this,  Halima  and  the  other  children  were  paid  six  cents  an  hour,  53  cents  a 
day  and  $3.20  a  week.  The  wages  are  so  low  that  Halima  and  many  of  the  other 
workers  actually  brush  their  teeth  with  their  fingers  and  ashes  from  the  fire  be-
cause they cannot afford a toothbrush or toothpaste. 

Even  the  skilled  sewing  operators  at  the  Harvest  Rich  plant  are  being  paid  a 
wage  of  just  17  cents  an  hour,  $1.35  a  day  and  $8.09  a  week.  Such  wages  do  not 
come close to providing even a minimally decent standard of living. 

Overtime  was  mandatory,  but  not  one  worker  in  the  Harvest  Rich  factory  was 
paid  their  correct  overtime  wages.  We  estimate  that  the  workers  were  cheated  of 
up  to  half  the  wages  legally  due  them.  Anyone  who  objected  to  working  on  Friday, 
which  was  supposed  to  be  their  weekly  holiday,  would  have  3  days’  wages  docked 
as punishment. 

Anyone daring to ask for their legal wages would be fired. 
The  corporate  monitoring,  even  by  some  of  the  largest  corporations  in  America, 
did not work at the Harvest Rich factory. When the monitors arrived for their usual 
announced  visits,  the  child  workers  were  hidden  in  the  filthy  bathrooms  or  put  on 
the  roof.  The  factory  kept  two  sets  of  time  records,  using  the  falsified  one  to  show 
the  monitors.  All  the  workers  knew  this.  But  anyone  who  spoke  one  word  of  truth 
to  a  corporate  monitor  would  be  fired  the  minute  the  monitor  walked  out  the  door. 
The workers at the Harvest Rich factory, and in garment factories all across Ban-
gladesh, are in a trap. Of course our workers need their jobs—they desperately need 
these jobs, but without enforcement of Bangladesh’s labor laws, the workers are left 
without rights and are actually seeing their wages falling every year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

As I mentioned earlier, the exploitation of child labor in Bangladesh’s garment ex-
port  industry  was  wiped  out,  or  greatly  diminished,  in  1992.  After  that,  child  labor 
was not a problem. This is why BCWS had to act quickly when we saw the re-emer-
gence  of  child  labor  at  Harvest  Rich,  as  well  as  in  some  nearby  plants.  The  cam-
paign  focused  on  Harvest  Rich  has  been  largely  successful  in  ending  the  hiring  of 
children  under  13  years  of  age,  though  many  other  labor  rights  violations  continue 
in  the  factory.  But  at  least  for  now,  we  believe  that  the  resurgence  of  child  labor 
in Bangladesh’s garment industry has been blocked. 

The  garment  industry  in  Bangladesh  is  booming—Bangladesh  sent  one  billion 
garments  to  the  U.S.  last  year—and  this  would  be  great  news  for  the  poor  women 
garment  workers  if  their  legal  rights  were  respected  and  they  earned  a  wage  that 
would allow them to climb out of misery. Today, there are 4,220 garment export fac-
tories in Bangladesh employing at least 2.2 million workers. 

Yet despite booming exports over the last 12 years, the real wages of Bangladesh’s 
garment  workers  have  been  cut  nearly  in  half  as  a  cumulative  inflation  rate  of  88 
percent has eaten away at the purchasing power of their wages. 

The  demands  of  the  Harvest  Rich  workers  are  very  modest.  They  are  willing  to 
work 10, 11 or even 12 hours a day, as long as overtime is voluntary and paid cor-
rectly.  They  need  1  day  off  a  week,  as  they  are  exhausted.  The  beatings  must  end. 
The  workers’  dream  would  be  to  earn  at  least  5,000  taka  a  month,  which  is  just 
$71.50 a month, $16.50 a week, or 35 cents an hour. 

Surely it is not too much to ask that the great U.S. and European companies must 
respect the labor laws of Bangladesh. If this happened, it would be a great step for-
ward for the over two million garment workers in Bangladesh, who are some of the 
hardest working people anywhere in the world, but also among the poorest. 

Senator DORGAN. Ms. Nazma, thank you very much for your tes-

timony. 

And  finally,  on  this  panel,  we  will  hear  from  Ms.  Jesseph.  Mr. 
Jesseph  is  President  and  CEO  of  Worldwide  Responsible  Apparel 
Production. 

Mr. Jesseph, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF STEVEN A. JESSEPH, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

WORLDWIDE RESPONSIBLE APPAREL PRODUCTION (WRAP) 
Mr.  JESSEPH.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  here 
today  to  discuss  this  critically  important  issue,  and  for  the  oppor-
tunity  to  testify  before  this  committee  on  the  subject  of  working 
conditions in factories around the world. 

The  views  I  express  today  are  on  behalf  of  the  Worldwide  Re-
sponsible  Apparel  Production  Program,  best  known  as  WRAP.  As 
the  President  and  CEO  of  WRAP,  I  deal  with  these  issues  every 
day. 

From 1997 to 2000, the American Apparel and Footwear Associa-
tion,  or  the  AAFA,  funded  a  task  force  of  outside  consultants  and 
industry experts to examine working conditions in apparel and tex-
tile factories in major apparel-producing countries. Member compa-
nies made a clear commitment that they did not want to be associ-
ated  with  sweatshop  conditions,  and  believed  the  best  way  to  ad-
dress  the  challenge  was  to  create  an  industrywide  global  code  of 
conduct  enforced  through  a  factory  monitoring  and  certification 
program. 

In January of 2000, WRAP started operations as an independent 
501(c)(6) nonprofit organization with its own 10-member board and 
funding  dedicated  to  ensuring  legal,  ethical,  and  humane  working 
conditions  in  the  manufacture  of  its  own  products.  We  believe 
WRAP is the most rigorous code of conduct for labor-intensive con-
sumer products manufacturing, covering not only labor and human 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

rights,  but  addressing  environmental  protection,  Customs  compli-
ance, and security, as well. 

WRAP  is  completely  separate  from  the  AAFA;  however,  we  do 
enjoy the support of the AAFA and 20 other trade associations that 
encourage members to have their factories and their supply chains 
certified  to  the  WRAP  standard.  We  have  no  members,  and  we  do 
not  rely  on  government  grants.  We’re  funded  by  registration  fees 
from  applicant  factories,  training  fees,  and  monitor  accreditation 
fees only. 

Our certification process involves a lengthy application that must 
be  submitted  by  the  factory.  The  factory  must  answer  detailed 
questions  regarding  its  practices  in  the  areas  of  age  of  workers, 
working  hours,  wages  and  benefits,  health  and  safety,  and  more. 
Then,  an  independent  monitoring  firm  performs  a  rigorous  inspec-
tion  of  the  factory  to  determine  if  the  information  they’ve  sub-
mitted  to  us  is  accurate.  Frequently,  factories  do  not  pass  on  the 
first inspection. There are some areas of noncompliance we will not 
tolerate, such as prison labor, child labor, serious health-and-safety 
abuses,  and  physical  abuse.  A  certification  is  generally  valid  for  1 
year.  And  it  gives  companies  considering  using  the  factory  a  rea-
sonable  assurance  that  the  factory’s  in  compliance  with  accepted 
standards. Since the year 2000, over 5,000 factories have registered 
with WRAP. 

We  also  created  an  audit  methodology  that,  in  most  parts  of  the 
world, is effective in gaining a true understanding of what goes on 
inside  factories.  We  regularly  conduct  unannounced  follow-up  au-
dits  of  certified  factories  to  maintain  their  ongoing  compliance.  If 
they  don’t  maintain  compliance,  and  if  those  noncompliances  are 
sufficiently  egregious,  we  decertify  the  factory  and  advise  that  fac-
tory  of  its—our  actions.  Clearly,  there  are  strong  economic  incen-
tives for factories to maintain compliance with WRAP standards. 

There  are  other  initiatives  similar  to  WRAP.  Their  codes  of  con-
duct and audit methodologies might be a little different than ours, 
but we’re all trying to do essentially the same thing: eliminate abu-
sive  working  conditions  and  protect  the  health,  safety,  and  rights 
of workers through positive force of economic incentives. Our expe-
rience  has  shown  that  training  and  education  are  essential  to  im-
proving  working  conditions,  and  crucial  at  building  capacity  at  the 
local level. 

In 2000, we received a grant from the U.S. Department of Labor 
to  conduct  factory  training  in  35  countries  around  the  world.  That 
grant expired long ago, but our work continues. 

In  February  of  2006,  we  participated  in  a  USAID-funded  trade 
capacity-building  project  related  to  technical  barriers  to  trade  in 
Colombia, South America. 

For  the  past  35  years,  I’ve  worked  in  a  variety  of  government, 
manufacturing,  and  consulting  environments,  and,  for  the  last  12 
years,  in  the  area  of  code  of  conduct  and  factory  monitoring.  I’ve 
literally visited hundreds of factories in 44 countries on this planet. 
I’ve seen, firsthand, the good, the bad, and the ugly. Are there bad 
factories  out  there?  Yes,  there  are.  But  I’ve  also  seen  a  lot  of  very 
good progress in the last 5 years. We still have a lot of work to do. 
We need to help apparel-producing nations strengthen their rule 
of  law  and  build  expertise  within  their  labor  ministries.  And  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

need  to  help  employees  understand  their  rights  under  the  laws  of 
their  sovereign  states.  WRAP  has  been  helping  to  do  this,  and  we 
plan to do more. 

As  we’ve  learned  from  behavioral  psychologists  and  economists, 
the best way to achieve positive and sustainable change is through 
market incentives and rewarding positive behavior. For us, that be-
havior  is  being  in  compliance  with  WRAP  standards,  and  we  be-
lieve we’re on the right track. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  your  leadership  on  this  issue.  We 
appreciate  the  opportunity  to  submit  this  testimony  and  would  be 
happy to answer any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Jesseph follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVEN A. JESSEPH, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

WORLDWIDE RESPONSIBLE APPAREL PRODUCTION (WRAP) 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for inviting me here today to discuss this critically im-
portant issue and for the opportunity to testify before this Committee on the subject 
of  working  conditions  in  factories  around  the  world.  The  views  I  express  today  are 
mine  and  represent  the  Worldwide  Responsible  Apparel  Production  program,  best 
known  as  WRAP.  My  remarks  do  not  represent  the  views  of  any  trade  association, 
retailer  or  branded  company.  As  President  and  CEO  of  WRAP,  I  deal  with  these 
issues every day. 

From  1997–2000,  the  American  Apparel  &  Footwear  Association,  or  the  AAFA, 
funded a task force of outside consultants and industry experts to examine working 
conditions in apparel and textile facilities in the major apparel producing countries. 
Member  companies  made  a  clear  commitment  that  it  did  not  want  to  be  associated 
with  ‘‘sweatshops’’  and  child  labor  conditions  and  believed  the  best  way  to  address 
the  challenge  was  to  create  an  industry-wide,  global  code  of  conduct  enforced 
through  a  factory-based  monitoring  and  certification  program.  In  January  2000, 
WRAP started operations as an independent, 501 (c)(6), non-profit organization with 
its own 10-member Board of Directors and funding dedicated to ensuring legal, eth-
ical  and  humane  production  of  sewn  products.  We  believe  WRAP  is  the  most  rig-
orous  and  comprehensive  code  of  conduct  for  labor-intensive  manufacturing  of  con-
sumer products covering not only labor and human rights issues, but addressing en-
vironmental protection, customs compliance and security as well. 

WRAP  is  completely  separate  from  the  AAFA.  However,  we  do  enjoy  the  support 
of the AAFA and 20 other trade associations around the world that encourage their 
members  to  have  the  factories  in  their  supply  chains  certified  to  the  WRAP  stand-
ard.  Last  week,  Caribbean-Central  America  Action,  a  trade  promotion  group  based 
in  Washington,  D.C.,  issued  the  report  of  its  recent  annual  meeting  in  which  it  en-
couraged all apparel and textile factories in the region to become certified by WRAP. 
WRAP  has  no  members  and  therefore  no  dues.  We  do  not  rely  on  government 
grants to sustain our operations. We are funded by registration fees from applicant 
factories, training fees and monitor accreditation fees. 

The  WRAP  certification  process  involves  a  lengthy  application  that  must  be  sub-
mitted  by  the  factory  seeking  to  be  certified.  The  application  requires  the  factory 
to  answer  detailed  questions  regarding  its  practices  in  areas  such  as  minimum  age 
of workers, working hours, regular and overtime wages, and health and safety, and 
more.  When  the  application  is  complete,  an  independent  monitoring  firm  then  per-
forms  a  rigorous  inspection  of  the  factory  to  determine  if  the  written  information 
previously  submitted  is  accurate.  Frequently,  factories  do  not  pass  on  the  first  in-
spection. Since our goal is to help them achieve certification, we advise them of the 
non-compliances  so  they  can  correct  them  and  receive  a  certification  recommenda-
tion during a subsequent audit. 

However,  there  are  some  areas  of  non-compliance  that  will  not  be  tolerated  such 
as prison labor, child labor and physical abuse. A certification is generally valid for 
1 year and gives companies considering using the factory reasonable assurance that 
the  factory  is  in  compliance  with  accepted  standards.  Since  2000,  over  5,000  fac-
tories have registered with WRAP and in 2006 we certified factories in 71 countries. 
WRAP has created an audit methodology that in most parts of the world is effec-
tive in gaining a true understanding of what goes on inside factories. We certify fac-
tories  that  are  in  compliance  with  the  WRAP  standards.  We  also  refuse  to  certify 
and decertify factories that aren’t. We regularly conduct unannounced follow-up au-
dits of certified factories to ensure they maintain on-going compliance. If they don’t, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

and  if  those  non-compliances  are  sufficiently  egregious,  I  have  no  hesitation  to  de-
certify  a  factory  and  advise  that  factory’s  customers  of  our  actions.  Accordingly, 
there  are  strong  economic  incentives  for  factories  to  maintain  compliance  with  the 
WRAP standards. 

There  are  other  initiatives  similar  to  WRAP.  Their  codes  of  conduct  and  audit 
methodologies might be a little different than WRAP but we are all trying to do es-
sentially  the  same  thing:  eliminate  abusive  working  conditions,  and  protect  the 
health, safety and rights of the workers through the positive force of economic incen-
tives. 

WRAP is also working with other certification programs, trade associations, tech-
nical training schools and universities to help develop courses and seminars for fac-
tory  managers  and  owners  in  the  areas  of  management  systems,  health  &  safety, 
compensation  and  benefits,  working  hours,  environmental  protection,  regulatory 
compliance and more. We hope that eventually these courses and will lead to certifi-
cations and degrees in the area of corporate social responsibility. 

WRAP’s  experience  with  its  factory  certification  program  has  demonstrated  to  us 
that positive efforts such as education and training are essential to improve working 
conditions.  In  2002,  WRAP  received  a  grant  from  the  U.S.  Department  of  Labor  to 
conduct  factory  training  in  35  countries  around  the  world.  That  grant  expired  long 
ago  but  our  training  work  continues.  February  2006,  WRAP  participated  in  a 
USAID-funded  Trade  Capacity  Building  project  related  to  Technical  Barriers  to 
Trade  (TBT)  in  Colombia.  And,  WRAP  is  also  participating  in  a  similar  USAID- 
funded program in Morocco. We believe education and training, at all levels are cru-
cial to building capacity at the local level. 

For  the  past  thirty  years,  I’ve  worked  in  a  variety  of  government,  manufacturing 
and  consulting  environments,  and  for  the  past  twelve  years  in  the  areas  of  codes 
of  conduct  and  factory  monitoring.  I’ve  visited  hundreds  of  factories  in  44  different 
countries  on  five  continents  and  have  seen  first-hand  the  good,  the  bad  and  the 
ugly. I understand this industry and its complexities very well. I’ve seen tremendous 
progress  in  the  quality  of  management  and  working  conditions  in  factories,  espe-
cially in the past 5 years. However, with all the progress that has been made, there 
is still much work to do. 

here. 

We  need  to  help  apparel  producing  nations  strengthen  the  rule  of  law  and  build 
expertise  within  labor  ministries  and  with  their  inspectors.  And,  we  need  to  help 
employees  understand  their  rights  under  the  laws  of  their  sovereign  states.  WRAP 
has been helping do this, and more. 

As  we’ve  learned  from  behavioral  psychologists  and  economists,  the  best  way  to 
achieve positive and sustainable change is through market incentives and rewarding 
positive  behavior.  For  us,  that  behavior  is  being  in  compliance  with  WRAP  stand-
ards. We believe we’re on the right track. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  for  your  leadership  on  this  issue.  We  appreciate  the 
opportunity  to  submit  this  testimony.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions 
you might have. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Jesseph,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

Let me thank all three of you for your testimony today. I think— 
as I hear the testimony, Ms. Jesseph, I don’t think you are at odds 
with—at  least  your  goals  are  not  at  odds  with—the  testimony  of 
the  other  two  witnesses.  You  indicate  that  the  goals  of  WRAP  are 
to  attempt  to  make  certain  that  factories  are  adhering  to  the  local 
standards  and  local  laws,  and  that  the  industry  is  not  interested 
in  bringing  into  this  country  the  product  of  sweatshop  labor.  So, 
the  legislation  that  we  will  attempt  to  move  through  the  Congress 
should not be at odds with your goals, in any event. 

Let  me  talk  just  a  little,  by  virtue  of  asking  questions  of  the 
three  of  you,  and  then  I’ll  turn  to  my  colleague  Senator  DeMint. 
Ms.  Nazma,  you  are  describing,  in  your  testimony,  a  young 
woman named Halima, who is an 11-year-old worker. Your descrip-
tion of that particular plant—you dwelled on that particular plant. 
What is the timeframe of the investigation of that plant? Was that 
just within the past year or so? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

now. 

Ms. NAZMA. From last June, they started the investigation, until 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  that  is  a  plant  that  produces  products  to 
be shipped to this country. You’re describing an 11-year-old worker 
named Halima, 11 to 14 hours a day, 7 days a week, and the scores 
of  children,  11,  12,  13  years  of  age,  working  at  that  factory.  What 
kind of evidence exists to corroborate that, Ms. Nazma? 

Ms.  NAZMA.  She’s  saying  that  they  have  testimony  from  them 
that  there  was  video  taken  at  the  Harvest  Rich  factory  and  that 
her—and her colleagues were also involved in making—getting this 
evidence from the factory workers. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  think  most  of  us  would  probably  agree  that 
a  factory  that  is  producing  products  with  11-year-old  workers, 
working 11 to 14 hours a day, 7 days a week, 2 days off a month— 
I  think  almost  everyone  in  this  room  would  agree,  that  represents 
a  sweatshop  condition  that  probably  is  in  violation  of  the  local 
laws. The question is, Is this just an aberration, a very unusual cir-
cumstance, or is it the kind of thing that we see frequently in parts 
of  the  world  where  one  can  access  cheap  labor  and  access  labor 
with  no  rights,  so  that  workers  really  have  no  legal  capability  to 
complain? 

Ms. Fuentes, you described workers in Colombia who, in support 
of  trying  to  better  their  situation,  formed  a  labor  union  that  you 
indicated  was  a  legal  labor  union  under  Colombian  law.  The  com-
panies  then  sponsored  another  labor  union  to  try  to  undercut  the 
ability  of  workers  to  organize.  Can  you  describe,  in  slightly  more 
detail, what happened there? 

Ms.  FUENTES.  One  of  the  main  things  that  I  already  mentioned 
was  that  they  offered  money  to  our  union  affiliates  so  that  they 
would join the other union instead. Also, company representatives, 
such  as  those  from  human  resources,  and  supervisors,  and  com-
pany social workers, approached workers inside the workplace and 
told  them  that  this  was  an  unethical  union,  that  they  were  trying 
to bankrupt the company, and that they should not join this union. 
They  also  prohibited  us  from  distributing  any  materials  that  ex-
plained  what  the  union  was  about  and  what  we  were  trying  to  do, 
and  they  held  meetings  inside  the  workplace,  where  they  told 
workers that it was prohibited to read these things or comment on 
them.  And  many  workers  who  belong  to  the  board  of  directors  of 
the  union  were  isolated,  moved  to  a  different  part  of  the  factory, 
where they wouldn’t be able to talk to other workers. 

Another  flower  worker  who  works  at  another  plantation  and  is 
also a union leader was put to peeling potatoes in an isolated part 
of the flower plantation, so that she wouldn’t be able to talk to her 
co-workers. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I’m  going  to  call  on  Senator  DeMint  in  just  a 
moment,  but  I  wanted  to  point  out  the  BusinessWeek  farticle,  of 
November  of  last  year,  just  3  months  ago  entitled  ‘‘Secrets,  Lies, 
and  Sweatshops,’’  which  describes  the  circumstance  around  the 
country—and in this case, in China, in which there is very substan-
tial abuse of workers and sweatshops. 

Mr.  Jesseph,  you  know,  I  read  your  testimony,  and  I  think  it’s 
important  that  you  do  the  work  you  do.  The  question  that  I  have 
is,  How  effective  are  you?  For  example,  I  described  the  cir-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

cumstance of Wal-Mart going in, in a plant in China, on four occa-
sions, and then, on the last occasion, a consultant explained to the 
company  how  you—how  do  you  hide  what  you’re  doing  so  that  the 
company can’t see it? My understanding is, in your case, where you 
issue  certifications,  that  you  had  actually  issued  a  certification  to 
the  plant  that  Ms.  Nazma  talked  about,  and  had  certified  it  as 
meeting  approval.  You  know,  I  have  a  picture  of  the  11-year-old 
girl,  whom  I  think  is  the  subject  of  much  of  the  testimony.  This  is 
that  young  woman  named  Halima,  working  11,  14  hours  a  day,  7 
days a week. Clearly, that’s violative. And I assume that your orga-
nization would think that is a sweatshop condition, hiring a young 
child  in  contravention  of  existing  laws  in  Bangladesh.  But  tell  me 
what kind of capability do you have, as you go take a look at a fac-
tory like this, which, incidentally, has now been—I believe the con-
tract  for  this  company  has  been  yanked  by  the  Hanes  company— 
producing Hanes underwear. And let me just quote: ‘‘We had audits 
that  did  not  catch  some  of  the  excessive  working  hours,  did  not 
catch  some  of  the  double  books.  Our  first  clue  to  the  double  books 
issue  was  making  a  midnight  visit  to  the  plant  and  finding  about 
50 employees who were still working.’’ So, Hanes yanked their con-
tract from this. But what kind of capability exists for them to show 
you enough to allow you to certify them, when, in fact, they’re prob-
ably hiring 11-year-olds? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

Mr.  JESSEPH.  Senator,  those  are  great  questions,  and  ones  we 
struggle with every day, We certified this factory about a year ago. 
And  one  of  the  challenges  we  have  is,  a  lot  of  us  have  seen  in  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
t
a
e
w
s

18 

cent  issues  with—issues  such  as  Enron  and  others—where  compa-
nies try and purposely deceive and lie to their auditors, conceal in-
formation,  create  double  books,  coach  employees,  and  so  forth,  as 
outlined  in  the  BusinessWeek  article;  it  becomes  increasingly  chal-
lenging for groups like ours to identify what the specific issues are. 
I  personally  visited  the  Harvest  Rich  factory  in  November—got  on 
a  plane,  flew  to  Dacca,  and  went  through  that  factory  from  top  to 
bottom. I met with representatives, the Bangladesh Committee Sol-
idarity  Workers  Groups,  along  with  Robert  Wong,  with  the  U.S. 
State  Department,  who’s  the  labor  attache  there,  and  specifically 
asked the question—and I was looking to meet a number of the em-
ployees  who  were  alleged  to  have  worked  in  that  factory.  The  fac-
tory  told  me  they  could  find  absolutely  no  record  of  Halima  ever 
having  worked  in  that  factory.  I  asked  the  Workers  Committee  if 
I  could  meet  with  her,  because  I  was  looking  for  proof  and 
verification.  As  you  pointed  out  earlier  in  your  questions,  What 
kind  of  verification  do  we  have  of  these  allegations?  That’s  pre-
cisely why I went there. 

What  did  we  find?  We  did  find  there  were  double  books.  We  did 
find  there  were  excessive  working  hours.  And  what  I  found  was  a 
management  team  that  had  been  specifically  working  to  subvert 
the  system  that  we’ve  put  in  place  to  try  and  certify  factories.  We 
were  looking  for  verification  of  information,  not  to  make  a  snap 
judgment, and not to make an off-the-cuff judgment, but to look for 
verified  information.  And  when  we  found  that  information,  we  de-
certified the factory. They’re out of the system, period. 

Part  of  that  decertification  is  also  notifying  customers  that  do 
business  in  that  factory  that  we  no  longer  certify  it.  So,  there  are 
some  economic  incentives.  As  you  saw,  Hanes  decided  to  leave  the 
factory  in  December.  We  think  some  of  the  best  incentives  for  fac-
tories to maintain compliance are the economic incentives of retain-
ing  business,  and,  if  they’re  way  out  of  compliance,  they  lose  busi-
ness. 

Senator DORGAN. That’s only to the extent that someone catches 
them.  And  I  might  suggest  that  if  the  managers  there  were  sub-
verting  with  respect  to  double  bookings  and  various  things,  you 
would  expect  they  would  subvert  on  a  number  of  things,  including 
child  labor.  But  I  only  make  the  point  that  I  think  organizations 
that are attempting to try to clean up this mess are valuable addi-
tions here. My only point is that the BusinessWeek article suggests 
that  this  is  rampant,  number  one;  number  two,  it’s  very  hard  to 
find and detect, and very hard to stop. 

I  have  a  couple  of  other  questions,  but  I  want  to  call  on  my  col-

league Senator DeMint, who I know has some time issues. 

Senator DeMint? 
Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  really  appreciate 

all the testimony. 

Mr.  Jesseph,  I  want  to  focus  on  you  for  a  minute,  because  I  do 
believe,  as  the  Chairman  has  pointed  out,  that  the  goals  of  the  in-
dustry sponsors of your group, as well as his goal, are basically the 
same.  I  think  the  question  here  is,  What  would  really  work  to  im-
prove  what’s  going  on?  And  I  think  you  know,  as  I  think  most 
media  who  reported  on  this,  that  we  are  making  a  lot  of  progress. 
I  believe,  as  you  do,  that  decertifying  one  or  two  plants  will  send 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

shockwaves  around.  These  folks  know  not  to  do  it  because  they’ll 
lose a lot of business. 

But my concern is the legal liability, which Senator Dorgan’s bill 
would  create,  and  we  know—I  know,  from  being  in  business  for 
years, you can be set up for these kind of lawsuits, in this country, 
for  not  being  handicap  accessible  or  whatever,  and  be  sued  before 
you  have  a  chance  to  even  know  you’ve  got  a  problem.  I’m  con-
cerned, just as a testimony today—well, I’ll just take Colombia, for 
instance—Ms.  Fuentes  says  there  was  pregnancy  testing.  And  I’m 
sure  it’s  correct,  but  it’s  against  the  law  to  do  that  in  Colombia. 
Dole  says  they  do  not  do  it.  But,  under  the  Chairman’s  bill,  Dole 
would have to prove that they didn’t do it in a foreign country, and, 
like you said, in a situation that could have changed, and it would 
be  very  difficult  for  companies  to  defend  themselves.  Instead  of  a 
lawsuit,  in  Bangladesh,  you  have  decertified  and  accomplished,  I 
think, much of the same goals, and probably created a warning for 
a  lot  of  other  companies.  I’m  just  concerned  if  we’re  going  to  come 
in  with  a  sledgehammer  here,  creating  a  legal  playground  where 
companies throughout America may have bought something from a 
company  that  may  have  been  a  sweatshop,  that  they  cannot  pos-
sibly defend themselves against, and we’ve got the same legal prob-
lem  that  we  have  with  our  own  companies,  here  in  this  country 
now, with plaintiffs’ lawyers who are just eating them alive. 

What do you think would be the effect of—and I don’t know how 
familiar  you  are  with  the  Chairman’s  bill,  and  I  know,  with  him 
here,  you’ve  got  to  be  very  careful  what  you  say,  but  what  would 
be  the  effect  of  going  in  with  this  system  that,  I  think,  will  create 
a playpen for lawyers? 

Mr.  JESSEPH.  Senator,  you  did  ask  a  loaded  question,  especially 
with  Senator  Dorgan  here.  I’m  not  a  lawyer,  and  I’m  not  a  legis-
lator, and I am certainly not in a position to render, I think, a rea-
sonable opinion on this bill. My great-grandfather was a represent-
ative of the State of Washington legislature, as a Democrat, and he 
believed  less  is  more.  I  do  believe  that  the  kinds  of  market  incen-
tives and positive reinforcing incentives that we’re trying to create, 
the  market-based  incentives,  to  make  sure  factories  are  doing  the 
right  thing  on  behalf  of  their  customers,  obeying  the  law,  is  the 
most effective kind of incentive there is, which is precisely why we 
put this into place. 

If—and what we would—the question you asked earlier, How can 
we  make  this  better?—I  think  is  by  having  more  and  more  retail-
ers,  brands,  factories  around  the  world  participating  in  programs 
like  WRAP  and  making  a  stand,  as  some  companies  do,  in  saying, 
‘‘We’re  not  going  to  tolerate  working  in  factory—working  with  fac-
tories  that  have  abusive  working  conditions.  We  are  leaving,  and 
we’re  leaving  now.’’  If  you  have  multiple  and  repeated  audits  and 
repeated audits and repeated audits, and continually reinforce that 
kind  of  behavior,  that  working  in  substandard  conditions  is  OK, 
then  I  think  that  becomes  a  challenge  and  a  different  message  for 
everybody. I think the answer, for me, is, let’s create positive mar-
ket  incentives,  which  is  what  we’re  trying  to  do  with  WRAP,  and 
move everybody to the same standard. If buyers refuse to buy from 
factories with substandard conditions, I think it’s the most effective 
and quickest way to handle it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Senator  DEMINT.  Do  you  think—and  I  know  I’m  biased  on  this, 
and  I  do  believe  that  trade,  not  aid,  is  the  best  way  to  improve 
working  conditions,  particularly  as  we  have  been  insistent,  in  our 
country,  on  labor  standards  in  our  agreements.  I’m  afraid  that  if 
we create liability, that certain countries, because of their, perhaps, 
inability  to  enforce  a  lot  of  laws  or  to  assist  us  in  how  we  enforce, 
that there will be a lot of job loss or economic problems in countries 
where American businesses just decide not to buy from. Do you see 
a  downside  do  creating  a  legal  liability  system  in  this  country,  at 
all, or—I know you said you weren’t a lawyer, but—— 

Mr. JESSEPH. Well— 
Senator DEMINT.—we’re just trying to figure out the best way to 
move  forward.  It  seems  like  your  organization  has  made  some  sig-
nificant strides, and we’re just trying to decide if creating this legal 
liability is a good way to move ahead. 

Mr.  JESSEPH.  I  don’t—again,  I  don’t  have  a  firm  opinion  on  the 
best  way  to  do  that.  That—I  read,  in  the  papers,  like  everybody 
else,  that  the  court  systems  are  clogged,  and  it  takes  2  and  3  and 
4  years  sometimes  to  get  cases  to  court.  This  may  be  an  effective 
measure.  Again,  I  don’t  know.  We’re  focusing  on  the  market  side, 
and, hopefully, on the positive-enforcement side. 

Senator DEMINT. Good. That’s very helpful. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. It appears to me that Senator DeMint may well 

be opposed to the legislation, based on his questions. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. Senator DeMint and I— 
Senator DEMINT. I’m very open-minded. 
Senator DORGAN.—have great respect for each other, but I would 
disagree  with  the  central  premise  of  his  first  statement,  ‘‘a  lot  of 
progress  has  been  made.’’  And  that’s  the  purpose  of  the  hearing 
and the bipartisan legislation. I don’t think nearly enough progress 
has  been  made,  I  would  say  to  my  colleague,  and  I  would  put  up 
the  BusinessWeek—and  BusinessWeek,  as  you  know,  is  a  conserv-
ative journal of American business—and they’ve done their own in-
vestigation. ‘‘Secrets, Lies, and Sweatshops: How Chinese Suppliers 
Hide the Truth From U.S. Companies’’—this only applies to China, 
but  the  fact  is  I  think  we  have  a  very  serious  problem.  Yesterday, 
there was a $832-billion trade deficit. It’s hard for anyone to argue 
that  that  is  a  success,  but  embedded  deep  in  the  recesses  and  the 
crevices of that policy represents, in my judgment, substantial fail-
ure, because the market system itself—the market system—will be 
a persuasive element to try to move the lowest-cost goods into this 
country.  The  lowest-cost  goods  will  come  from  a  company  that  you 
can  employ  in  Bangladesh  or  in  Northern  Jordan,  with  Chinese 
textiles  and  Bangladeshi  workers  being  jetted  in  to  work  in  unbe-
lievable  conditions.  That  will  be  the  lowest-priced  products,  and 
perhaps  the  best  way  to  compete.  But  as  BusinessWeek  says  in  a 
document  obtained  last  year  of  a  Chinese  fabric  factory—let  me 
just  read  what  BusinessWeek  obtained  from  a  factory—and  I  don’t 
think this is unusual, ‘‘If they are going to be audited’’ if an auditor 
shows up unexplained and unscheduled, ‘‘First, notify the underage 
trainees,  underage  full-time  workers,  and  workers  without  identi-
fication  to  leave  the  workshop  through  the  back  door.  Order  them 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

not  to  loiter  near  the  dormitory  area.  Second,  immediately  order 
the receptionist to gather all relevant documents and papers.’’ 

I  guess  Senator  DeMint  and  I  will  have,  I  think,  a  longer  con-
versation  about  these  issues,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with 
him  on  it.  But  liability  is  exactly  the  point  of  this  legislation.  If 
you’re abusing foreign workers, if you are producing in sweatshops 
for  the  purpose  of  undercutting  competitors  in  this  country,  you 
ought to be liable. At this point, you are not. You ought to be liable. 
That’s why Senator Lindsey Graham and I have introduced the leg-
islation. 

So, Senator DeMint, you and I will have, I assume, long and en-

tertaining conversations about trade and related matters. 

Mr.  Jesseph,  your  conversation  with  this  committee,  saying 
you’re interested in trying to track down these companies and stop 
these  practices,  that’s  not  at  odds  at  all  with  the  legislation  that 
we  propose.  To  the  extent  that  you’re  successful,  I  commend  you, 
but  evidence  of  today  indicates  something  different.  You  certified 
the  very  plant  that  we  heard  testimony  on,  that’s  the  Hanes  Cor-
poration—Hanes  underwear  corporation—subsequently  decided  to 
decertify;  the  fact  is,  it  has  become  a  game  and  a  practice  to  try 
to make certain that people coming into the plants in some of these 
foreign  countries  are  not  able  to  see  what’s  really  happening.  And 
I  think  all  of  us  in  this  room  would  agree,  and  I  expect  that  my 
colleague Senator DeMint would agree, if we see a factory in which 
an 11-year-old is working 11 to 14 hours a day 7 days a week, with 
2  days  off  a  month,  then,  by  God,  there’s  something  wrong  with 
that. That is not the product of which we want to make purchases 
in  this  country.  That  is  sweatshop  labor.  And  there  ought  to  be 
someone liable and accountable for it. 

And so, let me thank the three witnesses. We have another panel 
of  witnesses.  And  I  understand,  Senator  DeMint,  you  have  a  com-
mitment,  but  I  appreciate  your  participation  today.  And,  as  I  indi-
cated,  Senator  DeMint  and  I  will  work  on  a  wide  range  of  trade 
problems,  I  assure.  Thank  you  very  much  for  being  here,  Senator 
DeMint. 

I  would  like  to,  Mr.  Jesseph,  perhaps  submit  a  couple  of  ques-
tions  to  you,  but  in  the  interest  of  time,  I  want  to  proceed,  and  I 
hope that this has helped your scheduling circumstance. And I ap-
preciate your being with us. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  you  to  succeed.  I  don’t  believe  your 
work,  alone,  is  sufficient.  That’s  why  I’ve  introduced  legislation. 
But  I  have  great  concern  about  this,  and  I  believe  that  Congress 
needs to pass legislation. You should keep up the work that you do 
but  understand  that  they  will  do  for  you  what  this  BusinessWeek 
article  describes  they’ve  done  for  others.  And  you’ll  show  up  at  a 
plant  and  come  out  of  there  saying,  ‘‘Things  look  fine,’’  and  the 
minute you’re gone, 11-year-olds are on the factory floor, producing, 
and they bring out the other book of records. 

So— 
Mr. JESSEPH. Well, Senator, what I can tell you, with great hon-
esty,  is  that  our  chairman  is  a  forensic  accountant,  former  inspec-
tor  general  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Labor.  Our  investigation 
techniques  and  our  audit  methodologies  are  changing  rather  rap-
idly,  and  as  we  speak,  to  identify  the  kinds  of  issues  brought  out 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

in that article, and to make sure that we don’t walk away with bad 
information, and we get better information all the time. This is not 
something  static  for  us.  We’re  taking  some  very  positive  steps  in 
this regard. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Jesseph, thank you. 
Ms.  Fuentes  and  Ms.  Nazma,  thank  you  for  standing  up  for 
workers.  I  know  you  do  so  at  risk  to  yourselves.  It  is  not  easy  to 
do what you are doing, to stand up for workers’ rights and to speak 
out  publicly,  but  we  owe  you  a  debt  of  gratitude,  and  I  appreciate 
your being here. Thank you very much. 

For  the  next  panel,  we  will  call  Mr.  David  Socolow,  the  commis-
sioner of the New Jersey Department of Labor and Workforce; Mr. 
James  English,  on  behalf  of  Mr.  Leo  Gerard,  who  is  the  President 
of the United Steelworkers; Mr. Charles Kernaghan, Executive Di-
rector  of  the  National  Labor  Committee;  and  Mr.  Daniel  Griswold, 
the Director of the Center for Trade Policy Studies at the Cato In-
stitute. 

If you would all please come forward and take a chair, we would 

appreciate that. 

We will ask that the record include the statement by Mr. William 
Jones, who is unable to be with us because of weather-related trav-
el issues, but we will make that a part of the record, without objec-
tion. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Jones follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM JONES, CHAIRMAN, CUMMINS-ALLISON CORP.; 

MEMBER, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, U.S. BUSINESS AND INDUSTRY COUNCIL 

Good afternoon, everyone. I am very grateful to be here today to provide the per-

spective of an American manufacturer. 

Thank you, Senator Dorgan for inviting me to testify on the problem of sweatshop 
labor.  This  is  a  critical  issue  for  many  corporations  committed  to  manufacturing  in 
the  United  States  and  I  applaud  you  for  your  leadership  in  trying  to  correct  this 
problem. 

My  name  is  William  Jones  and  I  am  the  Chairman  of  Cummins-Allison  Corp.,  a 
privately held Chicago corporation founded in 1887. Today, Cummins is a manufac-
turer  of  security  equipment,  particularly  focused  on  the  processing  of  coin  and  cur-
rency at high speeds. We employ approximately 900 individuals in the U.S. and pro-
vide  work  for  another  10,000  Americans  employed  by  our  key  U.S.  suppliers.  Nine-
ty-five  percent  of  the  products  Cummins  sells  worldwide  are  manufactured  in  Chi-
cago, Illinois. 

Perhaps  some  Senators  are  not  familiar  with  the  challenges  facing  our  domestic 
manufacturers, or the benefits that we bring to the American economy. Manufactur-
ers  are  so  often  the  backbones  of  our  communities—creating  wealth,  providing  de-
cent-paying  jobs  with  good  benefits.  Our  companies  pay  taxes,  company  manage-
ment  pays  taxes,  and  our  employees  pay  taxes.  Those  taxes  make  possible  schools, 
roads,  water  treatment  plants,  first  responders,  libraries,  social  services,  and  hos-
pitals. 

Our  Company  headquarters  and  manufacturing  are  in  Mt.  Prospect,  Illinois. 
About  2  years  ago,  the  head  of  the  Mount  Prospect,  IL  school  district  called  me  up 
and invited me out to lunch. I said sure but why call on me. He said because you’re 
the  largest  taxpayer  in  our  town  and  we  wouldn’t  have  the  schools,  facilities,  and 
classes we do without you. 

Let me give you my views on sweatshop labor and then turn to some of the other, 
broader issues facing domestic American manufacturers. First and foremost, sweat-
shop  and  slave  labor  are  one  of  the  moral  outrages  of  our  time  and  must  be  abol-
ished.  Something  is  very,  very  wrong  when  wealthy  people  and  corporations  get 
even wealthier on the backs of the working poor. 

In addition, sweatshop and slave labor can end in economic catastrophe for us all. 
This  abuse  does  not  create  a  healthy  middle  class  of  consumers  in  the  sweatshop 
countries, who in turn embrace democratic political values to protect what they have 
gained  by  the  fruits  of  their  hard  labor.  It  does  not  advance  these  countries’  econo-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

mies  more  than  marginally—with  a  robust  middle  class  of  consumers  driving  the 
economy. 

Why  not?  Because  unlike  the  sweatshops  of  America’s  past,  today’s  sweatshops 
are found in very low-income countries with towering rates of un- and underemploy-
ment.  Whereas  the  chronic  scarcity  of  labor  throughout  American  economic  history 
eventually helped our wages rise, the mammoth glut of labor throughout the devel-
oping world is bound to keep wages at rock bottom for, at least, many decades. 

At  the  same  time,  sweatshops  have  sucked  much  of  the  life  out  of  the  remaining 
labor-intensive sectors of American manufacturing—which remain far and away the 
best  hopes  for  middle-class  lives  for  our  own  poor.  If  unchecked,  these  trends  will 
threaten  much  of  our  remaining  domestic  manufacturing  base—a  manufacturing 
base  which  underpins  our  national  defense  and  prosperity.  Ultimately,  the  demise 
of  so  much  manufacturing  will  undermine  the  entire  American  economy,  which  is 
the engine of world growth. 

The  owners  of  the  sweatshops  may  get  rich;  the  owners  of  the  brand  names  may 
get  rich;  and  the  retailers  who  trade  in  these  goods  in  the  American  market  may 
get  rich—but  at  the  expense  of  American  workers  and  factory  owners.  There  are 
those who mistakenly suggest that sweatshops bolster U.S. living standards by pro-
viding  cheap  goods  for  consumers.  A  first  world  country  raises  its  living  standards 
on a sustainable basis by helping workers become employed, genuinely more produc-
tive and earn higher wages, not by helping consumers get cheaper socks or toasters. 
I am not aware of any country in history that become a great power by consuming, 
rather than by producing. 

So I commend you for introducing S. 367, your bipartisan measure to prohibit the 
import, export and sale of goods made with sweatshop labor. My company, Cummins 
Allison, and the U.S. Business and Industry Council, of which I am a member, both 
heartily  endorse  this  bill.  A  $10,000  fine  for  violations  combined  with  the  right  to 
sue  for  damages  for  those  who  produce  the  goods  under  fair  working  conditions  is 
a fair and balanced approach to solving the scourge of slave and forced labor. 

Across  the  developing  world  from  large  countries  like  China  to  smaller  competi-
tors like Jordan, slave and forced labor is epidemic. These nations need to do a bet-
ter  job  enforcing  their  own  laws  and  commitments  on  the  issue.  S.  367  gives  them 
and  some  of  the  shady  players  that  are  manufacturing  illegitimately,  the  right  in-
centives  to  clean  up  their  acts  and  improve  working  conditions  for  millions  of  indi-
viduals. Again, I am most appreciative of the spotlight that you have shone on these 
horrible practices and look forward to the enactment of this vital legislation. 

Now I want to discuss some of the broader American trade and international eco-

nomic policies that are contributing to the demise of domestic manufacturing. 

In  the  last  few  years  the  Governors  of  four  States  have  contacted  me  asking  me 
to  move  from  Illinois  to  their  states.  I’ve  politely  declined  because  no  matter  what 
tax  breaks  they  offer  me,  they  can’t  change  the  U.S.  trade  policies  that  are  killing 
companies like mine. Only you in Washington can do that. But in fact over the last 
three  decades,  Washington  has  taken  my  tax  dollars  and  used  them  to  try  to  put 
me out of business. 

Some  corporate  leaders  would  say  I  should  move  to  Europe,  where  the  govern-
ments would protect me because my creating jobs would mean that they don’t have 
to  carry  people  on  welfare  rolls.  Most  governments  there,  of  course,  provide  health 
care and pension coverage that would reduce the competitive pressures on my com-
pany.  Others  might  say  that  I  should  go  to  China  so  my  business  could  survive  by 
paying  low  wages  and  minimal  benefits.  Some  who  move  their  manufacturing  to 
China  subcontract  with  firms  that  use  forced  or  penny-wage  labor  in  order  to  gain 
a competitive advantage. That, too, is an available option. 

So, I could take the high road and move my manufacturing to Europe where they 
have  industrial  policies  to  keep  their  nations  competitive,  or  I  could  take  the  low 
road  and  go  to  a  low  wage  area  that  would  reduce  my  production  costs.  Those  are 
the  choices  that  U.S.  trade  and  international  economic  policy  force  on  companies 
like mine. 

But  don’t  worry,  I’m  not  going  anywhere.  I  intend  to  stay  right  here  in  the  USA 
providing great machines and great jobs, and fighting to preserve the domestic man-
ufacturing base. 

It  is  clear  to  me  that  the  Federal  Government’s  trade  policies  of  the  past  three 
decades—through  Republican  and  Democratic  administrations  alike—have  vastly 
eroded  our  domestic  manufacturing  base.  Three  million  manufacturing  jobs  have 
been lost since 1997—and believe me, it’s not just because American manufacturing 
has  become  so  much  more  efficient  and  productive,  as  you  often  hear  from  the 
globalization  cheerleader  crowd.  No,  tens  of  thousands  of  companies  have  closed 
their  doors  for  good—not  because  they  got  more  productive  but  because  they  were 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

put out of business by unfair foreign competition, whether subsidies, non-tariff bar-
riers, currency manipulation, dumping, or other anti-competitive practices. 

So I hope I’m starting to convince you that we have a lot in common and we share 
a  certain  vision  for  the  American  people:  work  with  dignity,  with  good  wages,  and 
good benefits, healthy families, and healthy cities and rural areas. 

The inequalities brought about by the decline in domestic manufacturing are pro-
found  and  far  reaching.  They  affect  every  segment  and  institution  in  our  society, 
and yet Washington has been asleep at the switch while our trade deficits soar and 
the East Asians hold so much of our public debt. How much longer can the current 
situation continue before the dollar collapses and we enter a serious worldwide eco-
nomic adjustment? 

We  must  approach  trade  policy  as  more  than  just  winning  legislative  battles  in 
Washington—Our  chief  concern  must  be  about  helping  to  put  America’s  living 
standards  and  economic  power  back  on  a  rising  path  by  strengthening  our  econo-
my’s  ability  to  produce.  We  need  to  restore  our  country’s  ability  to  earn  its  way  in 
the  world.  That’s  the  only  way  to  create  lasting,  broadly  shared  prosperity  for  the 
American people, and ensure our national security. 

That’s  also  the  only  way  that  we’ll  be  able  to  preserve  a  functioning  global  econ-
omy  that  can  provide  expanding  opportunity  around  the  world—because  an  eco-
nomically  healthy  American  import  market  is  central  to  growth  prospects  every-
where.  Don’t  ever  let  anyone  call  you  a  protectionist  because  you  are  challenging 
current trade policy—what you are doing is to try to restore balance to a world trad-
ing  system  that  is  completely  out  of  whack  essentially  because  foreigners  are  gam-
ing the system to grab more than their fair share of the wealth. 

Achieving  this  goal  means  enacting  into  law  measures  that  strengthen  in  major, 
concrete  ways  companies  like  mine  and  the  tens  of  thousands  of  others  like  it  that 
create  middle-class  jobs  and  anchor  communities.  And  it  means  enacting  into  law 
concrete measures to help new companies realize the advantages of starting up and 
creating jobs in America. 

If  our  legislative  strategies  don’t  seek  these  results,  they  will  not  save  a  single 
existing job or create a single new one. Indeed, domestic manufacturing and all the 
employment benefits it creates will start shrinking faster than ever. 

How can Congress help? By strongly supporting new trade policies that will make 

much bigger changes than most critics have been talking about so far. 

By  all  means,  let’s  keep  pressing  for  better  labor  and  environmental  provisions 
in new trade agreements. Let’s use trade with our market, by far the largest in the 
world  to  abolish  slave  and  forced  labor.  But  let’s  also  realize  that  actually  helping 
boost production and employment and wages in the United States will require much 
more. 

The  United  States  Business  and  Industry  Council  we  will  be  working  hard  for 
prompt  passage  of  the  Ryan-Hunter  bill,  which  would  enable  domestic  manufactur-
ers  to  win  import  relief  against  Chinese  currency  manipulation.  It  attracted  some 
170  co-sponsors  in  the  last  Congress.  This  bill  deserves  to  be  a  very  high  priority 
of  yours  this  session  as  well.  Let’s  get  it  passed  in  the  House  quickly—and  intro-
duced and passed in the Senate in short order as well. 

In  addition,  we  need  to  do  something  about  inequalities  created  for  our  domestic 
producers  by  the  widespread  use  of  Value-Added  Taxes  by  136  of  our  trading  part-
ners. All of our major trading competitors rebate all Value-Added taxes on their ex-
ports  and  levy  the  full  VAT  on  American  imports  coming  into  their  markets.  This 
creates,  on  average,  a  30  percent  competitive  disadvantage  with  our  major  trading 
partners. 

Today,  the  VAT  disparity  is  a  huge  factor  for  U.S.  producers.  The  total  yearly 
VAT penalty paid by American producers of goods and services is roughly $380 bil-
lion. We need to put in a border equalization tax, so that goods imported into Amer-
ica  face  the  same  hurdle  that  American  goods  do  going  into  foreign  companies.  I 
know  it  is  a  very  technical  issue,  but  $380  million  is  real  money  and  the  resulting 
distortions  of  trade  flows  have  destroyed  hundreds  of  thousands  of  American  jobs. 
We will be working hard to help attract more co-sponsors for the Trade Balancing 
Act that Rep. Mike Michaud from Maine introduced in the House at the end of the 
last  session—and  to  find  Senate  co-sponsors  to  introduce  a  companion  bill.  The 
Trade  Balancing  Act  makes  use  of  Article  XII  of  the  WTO  and  puts  into  place  an 
emergency import surcharge until major trade imbalances are corrected. 

The  president  has  announced  that  he  will  seek  renewal  of  Fast  Track  authority, 
which  expires  in  July.  We  desperately  need  to  block  traditional  Fast  Track  author-
ity, under which all these bad trade deals have been passed for the last thirty years. 
Fast  Track  is  an  abdication  of  the  authority  that  the  Constitution  gives  the  Con-
gress.  It  has  allowed  the  Executive  Branch  to  mostly  ignore  the  Congress  all  these 
years  and  the  results  have  been  devastating.  We  need  for  Congress  to  reclaim  its 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

trade authority. We need to develop an entirely new way of negotiating trade agree-
ments. 

In fact, we need to announce a moratorium on all further trade agreements until 
we figure out what we are doing wrong and how to get our trade deficit under con-
trol—which specifically includes enforcing the trade agreements we have. Those who 
support the failed trade policies of the past maintain that just one more trade agree-
ment  will  help  us  export  our  way  out  of  the  mess  we  are  in.  That’s  nonsense.  We 
need  a  set  of  comprehensive  solutions  to  solve  our  trade  problems—and  piecemeal 
new trade agreements are not among them. 

Finally,  anyone  genuinely  concerned  about  preserving  American  jobs  and  living 
standards  must  help  us  find  ways  of  protecting  American  intellectual  property  bet-
ter and preventing dumping of foreign products in the American market below their 
cost  of  manufacture.  I  know  that  there’s  some  resentment  surrounding  the  use  of 
IP trade laws by American multinational companies. But the very survival of count-
less smaller domestic companies like mine heavily depends on strengthened intellec-
tual  property  protection.  If  there  have  been  abuses,  let’s  correct  them.  But  let’s 
make  sure  not  to  do  anything  that  could  set  precedents  that  wind  up  throwing  the 
baby  out  with  the  bath  water.  Otherwise,  you’ll  deal  a  fatal  blow  to  many  of  our 
country’s best companies and best employers. 

Make  no  mistake  about  it.  Domestic  companies  like  mine,  who  are  passionately 
devoted  to  keeping  their  production  and  their  work  force  in  the  United  States,  are 
under  attack  in  the  world  economy.  We  and  our  workers  are  under  attack  from 
high-income  countries  like  Germany  and  Japan.  We  are  under  attack  from  low-in-
come countries like China and India. Foreign governments do what they can, what-
ever  it  takes,  to  advance  their  national  interests  and  those  of  their  companies—de-
spite the negative consequences for other countries and other peoples. 

American  domestic  companies  and  their  workers  also  deserve  policies  from  their 
government  that  further  their  interests—not  abandon  them.  Unfortunately,  Wash-
ington’s  priorities  have  long  been  elsewhere,  but  we  live  in  a  democratic  system 
where  the  ineffective  trade  policies  of  the  past  can  be  changed.  With  enough  help 
from this committee and other Members of Congress, that’s exactly what we can do. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Kernaghan,  I’m  going  to  start  with  you 
today.  Mr.  Kernaghan,  you  are  the  Executive  Director  of  the  Na-
tional Labor Committee. I know that you have spent some years in-
vestigating these issues, and bringing to the attention of the Amer-
ican  public—and  to  the  Congress,  for  that  matter—labor  abuses 
and sweatshop conditions around the world. I personally appreciate 
the  work  of  your  organization.  I  think  it  has  been  productive  and 
helpful,  and  I  appreciate  the  fact  that  you  have  come  today.  And 
you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF CHARLES KERNAGHAN, EXECUTIVE 

DIRECTOR, NATIONAL LABOR COMMITTEE 

Mr.  KERNAGHAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  it 
is  an  honor  to  be  here  to  discuss  worker-rights  standards  in  the 
global economy. 

I’d like to just make a quick comment on the Harvest Rich case, 
because,  after  we  released  our  report  on  the  Harvest  Rich  factory 
in  Bangladesh,  the  company  sent  their  monitors  back  again,  and, 
I  believe,  including  WRAP.  They  found  no  violations.  They  told  us 
the  factory  was  excellent.  It  wasn’t  until  we  invited  Hanes,  Marks 
&  Spencer,  and  Tesco  to  return  to  Bangladesh,  and  we  set  up  a 
meeting  with  the  workers,  and  the  workers  themselves  said  to  the 
Hanes  representative,  ‘‘You  must  go  to  the  factory  tonight.  You’ll 
see  workers  working.  You’ll  see  them  working  at  midnight,  and 
past midnight’’—It was only when Hanes did that, and paid a rare 
unannounced  visit  at  night,  and  marched  into  the  factory,  they 
found  dozens  of  workers  making  Faded  Glory  jeans  for  Wal-Mart. 
They  were  161⁄2 hours  into  their  19-hour  shift.  It  was  only  at  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

moment  that  Hanes  said  they  understood  that  they  were  being 
misled by the factory. 

So, they didn’t catch it on their own. They only caught it because 
the  workers  themselves  had  the  courage  to  meet  with  them,  tell 
them  the  truth,  and  tell  them  to  go  to  the  factory.  That’s  the  only 
reason  that  that  factory  was  decertified.  It  did  not  happen  under 
the normal monitoring programs. 

Well, I want to quickly address the Jordan issue, and China. 
The  U.S./Jordan  Free  Trade  Agreement  was  initiated  in  Decem-
ber  of  2001.  And  it  looked  miraculous,  because,  within  the  next  5 
years, apparel exports from Jordan to the U.S. soared by 2,300 per-
cent. They went from $52.1 million to $1.2 billion in 2006. But, un-
fortunately,  the  Jordan  Free  Trade  Agreement  quickly  descended 
into  human  trafficking  of  guest  workers  from  Bangladesh,  China, 
Sri  Lanka,  India—36,100  guest  workers  were  trafficked  to  Jordan 
to  work  in  114  factories,  producing  clothing  for  the  United  States. 
Ninety percent of those factories were foreign-owned, mostly Asian- 
owned.  In  those  factories,  the  workers  were  stripped  of  their  pass-
ports,  not  given  their  identity  residency  permits,  so  they  couldn’t 
even  go  out  on  the  street.  Once  they  were  trapped  in  those  fac-
tories, stripped of their passports, and held under conditions invol-
untary servitude—for example, in the Al Shahaed factory, 115 Ban-
gladesh  workers  found  themselves  working  15  hours  a  day,  38 
hours a day, 48 hours a day—or 48-hour shifts, and 72-hour shifts. 
They  actually  worked  3  days  in  a  row  without  sleep.  They  would 
go 2 or 3 days at work without sleep. When the workers passed out 
at  the  factory,  they  were  beaten  with  sticks  to  wake  them.  The 
workers  were  supposed  to  be  paid  $250  a  month  with  overtime. 
They  got  2  cents  an  hour.  They  got  $2.31  for  98  hours  of  work. 
When they complained about their wages, they were imprisoned in 
Jordan  for  3  days  without  food.  When  the  workers  finally  de-
manded  their  wages,  they  were  beaten  and  forcibly  deported  back 
to  Bangladesh  without  any  of  the  back  wages  owed  them.  At  the 
Western  garment  factory,  which  made  fleece  jackets  for  Wal-Mart, 
there  were  14-  and  15-year-old  kids  in  that  factory,  working  16  to 
20  hours  a  day.  They’d  work  from  8  o’clock  in  the  morning  until 
midnight  or  until  4  a.m.  They  did  this  7  days  a  week.  They  didn’t 
get paid at all. For the first 4 months of 2006, they did not receive 
one cent in wages. They were working as slave labor. They had not 
any  wages.  And  when  they  passed  out,  they  were  hit  with  rulers. 
When they passed out from exhaustion, they were struck with rul-
ers to wake them up. There were four girls in the factory who were 
raped  by  management,  one  of  them,  a  16-year-old  girl.  These  were 
the conditions in these factories. 

In  the  Al  Safa  factory,  which  made  clothing  for  Gloria  Vander-
bilt, a young woman—we believe, about 20 years old—a young Ban-
gladesh  woman  hung  herself  in  the  bathroom,  committed  suicide, 
after she was raped by a manager. Such terrible feelings, such hu-
miliation,  she  hung  herself.  And  they  kept  her  body  in  Jordan  for 
many months before it was even sent back to Bangladesh. 

After  we  put  out  our  report,  in  July  2006,  the  Trade  Minister  of 
Jordan  admitted,  bravely,  that  their  inspection  regime  may  have 
failed them. And he said, ‘‘may have failed them miserably,’’ which 
was, of course, the case. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Jordan had 88 labor inspectors for 98,000 businesses in the coun-
try.  The  labor  inspectors  were  really  just  there  to  hand  out  work 
permits  to  the  guest  workers.  There  was  no  monitoring  of  the  fac-
tories.  There  were  no—there  was  absolutely  no  oversight.  And  the 
situation deteriorated into human trafficking. 

I  must  say,  under  pressure,  there  has  been  a  positive  response 
on  the  part  of  the  Jordanian  Government.  And  today,  because 
they’ve  started  to  implement  their  own  law,  under  pressure,  we 
think that the major—the major direct-contract factories in Jordan, 
the larger factories—there’s 59 of them—that those factories large-
ly now adhere to Jordanian law. Those workers have received their 
passports  back.  They’re  working  11  hours,  not  15  hours.  They’re 
getting  at  least  the  minimum  wage.  However,  in  the  smaller  sub-
contract factories, of which there are 55, violations continue. At the 
Classic factory in Bangladesh, workers are working 14 hours a day, 
7 days a week, today—and collapsing of exhaustion. 

In  the  Hussein  Jordan  factory,  workers  have  not  received  their 
passports back. If they come to work 1 minute late, they’re beaten. 
So,  there  are  still  problems.  But  the  good  news  is  that  the  Jor-
danian  Government,  under  pressure,  is  moving  definitely  in  the 
right  direction.  In  fact,  they’ve  closed  about  a  dozen  factories  and 
relocated  1,000  workers  to  better  factories.  So,  they’re  acknowl-
edging these very, very terrible conditions. 

Regarding China, we did a recent investigation of a factory called 
Kaisi, which has 700 to 800 workers making furniture parts for ex-
port  to  the  U.S.  And,  in  fact,  one  company  in  the  United  States, 
based in Michigan, Knape & Vogt, imported $10.4 million worth of 
furniture parts from this factory in a recent 3-month period. In this 
factory,  workers  are  working  14  and  a  half  to  15  hours  a  day, 
forced  overtime,  8  o’clock  in  the  morning  until  10:30  or  11:30  at 
night.  The  workers  are  working  7  days  a  week.  They’re  routinely 
working  80  hours  a  week.  They’re  often  at  the  factory  100  hours 
a  week.  The  workers  are  cheated  of  their  minimum  wage.  This  is 
going  on  in  broad  daylight.  They’re  not  paid  their  minimum  wage, 
they’re  not  paid  any  overtime  premium.  Our  estimate  is  they’re 
cheated  of  half  the  wages  that  they’re  legally  owed  under  China’s 
law. 

It  gets  even  worse.  The  factories  are  a  dangerous  place  to  work, 
and  management  in  the  factory  has  set  these  wildly  excessive  pro-
duction  goals.  All  the  workers  are  paid  by  a  piece  rate.  And  man-
agement  has  actually  set  production  goals  of  7,800  pieces  a  day  to 
11,800 pieces a day. That means workers are getting—they have to 
produce  a  piece  every  4  to  6  seconds,  and  they  pay  them  six-hun-
dredths  of  a  cent  for  each  operation  they  do.  So,  the  workers  are 
frantically  going  through  this  pace  all  day  long,  they’re  doing  this 
141⁄2 to  151⁄2 a  day,  and  they’re  doing  it  under  dangerous  condi-
tions. 

So,  a  24-year-old,  Dai  Kehong,  working  at  a  stamp  molding  ma-
chine  in  the  factory,  9  o’clock  at  night,  13  and  a  half  hours  into  a 
shift that was going go on to 10:30 at night, both of his hands were 
crushed  in  the  molding  machine,  and  his  right  hand  was  com-
pletely  mangled  and  deformed.  He  lost  all  the  fingers,  except  his 
thumb and his forefinger, which are frozen in place and just jutting 
out.  He  can’t  use  the  hand.  His  left  hand  was  crushed  into  a  claw 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

grip.  He  can’t  open  it.  He  can’t  move  the  fingers.  He  has  no  use 
of  either  hand  now.  He  needs  an  artificial  limb.  The  factory  is  not 
paying for it, they’re not helping him at all. 

On  September  29,  2006,  a  worker  by  the  name  of  Zhao 
Chengquang  was  working  on  furniture  parts  for  export  to  Knapp 
& Vogt in Michigan, and his stool slipped out from under him, and 
his  left  hand  got  stuck  in  the  machine  and  crushed  it.  He  lost  the 
whole  left  side  of  his  hand.  His  fingers,  his  knuckles,  and  a  large 
part of his left hand is gone. 

That  September—September,  2006,  five  workers  were  injured  at 
the factory, seriously. We estimate that six fingers were severed in 
that  1  month.  You  know,  there’s  an  estimate,  in  the  Pearl  River 
Delta  area  of  factories,  that  40,000  fingers  a  year  are  severed  in 
China.  They  don’t  have  workman’s  comp.  They  have  workman’s 
comp,  as  a  law,  but  the  factories  just  ignore  it  completely,  so  they 
don’t  have  work  injury  insurance  for  the  workers.  So,  when  the 
workers are injured, they’re basically just abandoned with nothing. 
Living  conditions  are  abysmal.  Workers  are  housed  in  dor-
mitories, six to eight workers to a room. Double-level bunkbeds line 
the  wall.  Workers  hang  plastic  over  the  openings  for  a  little  bit  of 
privacy.  They’re  fed  food  that  the  workers  describe  as  absolutely 
horrible.  There’s  no  hot  water;  so,  when  they  want  to  bathe  in  the 
wintertime,  they  actually  have  to  walk  down  four  flights  of  stairs, 
get  a  little  plastic  bucket,  get  hot  water,  and  walk  it  back  up  to 
their room and do a sponge bath with it. The conditions are off the 
charts. 

This  is  a  dangerous  factory,  where  every  single  labor  right  in 
China  is  violated,  every  single  labor  right,  and  every  single  inter-
nationally  recognized  worker-rights  standard  is  violated  in  broad 
daylight. 

The U.S. companies would never tolerate a similar treatment for 
their  products.  In  this  very  factory,  the  U.S.  companies  worked 
with  the  Kaisi  management  to  bring  their  factories  up  to  inter-
national  standards  for  their  packaging,  because  they  demanded 
their products reach the United States unharmed. So, they worked 
for a year with management to bring them up to speed with inter-
national  standards—packing  standards,  so  that  their  goods  would 
arrive  in  the  United  States  safely.  They  never  uttered  one  word 
about the young workers in the factory who are being seriously in-
jured  and  maimed  for  life—whose  lives  are  now  destroyed.  They 
never  said  a  word  about  the  low  payment  of  the  minimum  wage. 
They  never  said  a  word  about  no  overtime  payment.  They  never 
said  a  word  about  the  miserable  primitive  living  conditions.  But 
they protected their products. 

I believe that the legislation which you and your colleagues have 
introduced,  the  Decent  Working  Conditions  and  Fair  Competition 
Act,  is  the  single  most  important  action  that  can  be  taken  in  to-
day’s  global  economy  to  end  the  sweatshop  abuse  and  to  end  the 
race  to  the  bottom.  This  legislation  would  favor  U.S.  companies 
that try to live up to the law, that strive to live up to the law. And 
it would also have the impact of raising worker-rights standards in 
China  and  in  Bangladesh,  and  in  countless  other  countries  across 
the  world.  And  it  would  lift  tens  of  millions  of  workers  up  to  im-
proved conditions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

It’s wrong—— 
Senator DORGAN. I want you to summarize, if you would. I didn’t 

want to interrupt you, until you had—— 

Mr. KERNAGHAN. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN.—properly supported the legislation I had intro-

duced. 

you—— 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. KERNAGHAN. But—— 
Senator DORGAN. But—— 
Mr. KERNAGHAN. It—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  But  I  need  to  have  you  summarize  it,  if 

Mr. KERNAGHAN. I think the legislation is the single most impor-
tant thing to end sweatshop abuse in the United States and around 
the world. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kernaghan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES KERNAGHAN, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL LABOR COMMITTEE 

Mr. Chairman, members of the Committee, I appreciate the opportunity to testify 
at this very important hearing regarding worker rights standards in the global econ-
omy. 

The U.S.-Jordan Free Trade Agreement went into effect in December, 2001. Over 
the  next  5  years,  apparel  exports  from  Jordan  to  the  U.S.  soared  by  2,300  percent, 
growing from $52.1 million in 2000 to $1.2 billion in 2006. 

The  U.S.-Jordan  Free  Trade  Agreement  was  reported  to  be  a  model  agreement, 
since for the first time, worker rights standards and environmental protections were 
included in the core of the agreement. 

Yet  something  went  terribly  wrong,  as  the  U.S.-Jordan  Free  Trade  Agreement 
quickly  descended  into  Human  Trafficking  and  involuntary  servitude.  At  least 
36,149  foreign  guest  workers  are  employed  in  Jordan’s  114  garment  factories,  at 
least  90  percent  of  which  are  foreign-owned,  mostly  by  Asian  investors.  The  guest 
workers come from Bangladesh, China, Sri Lanka and India. 

Bangladeshi  guest  workers  had  to  pay  $1,000  to  $3,000  each  to  unscrupulous 
manpower agencies in Bangladesh to purchase a two-to-three-year contract to work 
in Jordan. This is an enormous amount of money in Bangladesh, and as poor work-
ers,  they  had  to  borrow  the  money  on  the  informal  market  at  exorbitant  interest 
rates of five to 10 percent per month. 

From  the  minute  they  took  the  loans,  these  workers  were  in  a  trap,  and  a  race 
against  time  to  pay  off  their  large  debts.  But  the  workers  were  promised  that  they 
would  be  able  to  earn  $134.28  a  month  for  regular  hours  and  up  to  $250  a  month 
with  overtime.  All  housing,  food  and  medical  care  would  be  free.  The  workers  were 
told they would live well, ‘‘like they do in the West.’’ They would get at least 1 day 
off a week, sick days, vacation time and national holidays. 

But  there  was  a  catch:  The  contract  tied  the  guest  workers  to  just  one  factory, 

prohibiting them from working elsewhere. 

One  hundred  and  fifteen  workers  from  Bangladesh  purchased  contracts  to  work 

at the Al Shahaed Garment factory in Irbid, Jordan. 

Upon  their  arrival  at  the  airport,  management  immediately  confiscated  their 
passports.  Nor  were  the  workers  provided  with  residency  permits,  without  which 
they  could  not  go  out  on  the  street  without  fear  of  being  detained  by  the  police  for 
lack of the proper papers. 

Once  in  the  Al  Shahaed  factory,  the  workers  found  themselves  forced  to  work 
shifts  of  15,  38,  48  and  even  72  hours  straight,  often  going  two  or  3  days  without 
sleep.  They  worked  7  days  a  week.  Workers  who  fell  asleep  at  their  sewing  ma-
chines would be slapped and punched. Instead of being paid the $250 a month that 
the ad promised, the workers earned two cents an hour, or $2.31 for a 98-hour work-
week.  Workers  who  asked  for  their  legal  wages  could  be  imprisoned  up  to  3  days 
without  food.  Workers  who  criticized  the  food  the  company  provided  were  beaten 
with  sticks  and  belts.  Twenty-eight  workers  had  to  share  one  small  12-by-12-foot 
dorm room, which had access to running water only every third day. These workers 
sewed clothing for Wal-Mart. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

When, in desperation, the workers demanded their legal wages, they were forcibly 
deported  and  returned  to  Bangladesh  without  their  back  wages.  Many  of  these 
workers  are  now  hiding  in  Dhaka  City  and  peddling  bicycle  rickshaws  to  survive. 
They cannot return to their home villages because they have no possible way to pay 
off the mounting debt they incurred to go to Jordan in the first place. 

At  the  Western  factory,  also  in  Irbid  and  producing  clothing  for  Wal-Mart, 
Bangladeshi guest workers who were trafficked to Jordan faced much the same fate. 
They  too  were  stripped  of  their  passports  and  forced  to  work  16  to  20  hours  a  day, 
7  days  a  week.  Despite  working  109  hours  a  week,  the  workers  routinely  went  for 
months without being paid. In the first 4 months of 2006, the Western workers were 
not  paid  a  single  cent  in  wages.  There  are  also  credible  of  reports  of  sexual  abuse, 
including  the  rape  of  a  sixteen  year-old  girl.  Workers  who  asked  for  their  wages 
would be beaten and threatened with forcible deportation. 

At  the  Al  Safa  factory  in  the  Al  Hassan  Industrial  Estate,  a  young  Bangladeshi 
woman  no  more  than  20  years  of  age  hung  herself  after  being  raped  by  a  factory 
manager.  This  happened  in  February  2005.  She  hang  herself  in  a  bathroom  using 
her  scarf.  Her  body  was  not  immediately  returned  to  Bangladesh,  but  rather,  re-
mained at the local morgue for several months. In this factory, they sewed clothing 
for the Gloria Vanderbilt label. 

The  National  Labor  Committee  released  our  report  on  Jordan  in  May  2006.  By 
July 2006, Jordan’s Trade Minister at the time, Mr. Sharif Al Zuibi, declared: ‘‘Our 
inspection  regime  may  have  failed  us  and  may  have  failed  us  miserably.’’  Jordan’s 
labor department had just 88 labor inspectors to oversee 98,000 business operations. 
The  primary  role  of  the  labor  department  inspectors  was  to  issue  work  permits  to 
foreign  guest  workers.  By  law,  Jordan’s  unions  were  not  permitted  to  organize  for-
eign workers. 

Acting  quickly,  the  Jordanian  Government  to  date  has  closed  at  least  ten  of  the 
worst garment factories and relocated over 1,000 workers to better factories. Across 
Jordan,  especially  in  the  59  larger  direct  contract  factories,  conditions  have  im-
proved.  Guest  workers  passports  have  been  returned  and  most  workers  now  have 
their  necessary  residency  permit.  At  most,  workers  are  toiling  11  hours  a  day  and 
not  the  15-plus-hour  shifts  that  were  routine  in  the  past.  Most  workers  are  being 
paid  at  least  the  legal  minimum  wage.  Factory  conditions  and  treatment  have  im-
proved. 

However,  problems  continue  in  some  of  the  55  smaller  subcontract  factories  in 

Jordan. 

In  the  Concord  Garment  factory  in  Cyber  City  Industrial  Park  near  Irbid,  350 
workers  have  not  been  paid  for  the  last  3  months,  despite  the  fact  that  they  are 
forced to work 15 to 16 hours a day, from 8 a.m. to 11 p.m. or 12 midnight, 7 days 
a  week.  Women  workers  report  being  cursed  at,  slapped  and  punched  by  factory 
managers. There is no heat or hot water in the dorm, and even the toilets lack run-
ning  water  several  days  a  week.  Many  of  the  workers  are  falling  ill.  If  any  worker 
asks  for  their  legal  rights,  they  will  be  immediately  attacked,  beaten  and  deported. 
Nor  has  management  returned  the  workers’  passports  or  issued  their  necessary 
work permits. 

At the Classic Fashion factory in Jordan, 500 workers are required to work 7 days 
a  week,  putting  in  routine  14-hour  shifts  from  7:30  a.m.  to  9:30  p.m.  As  a  result, 
the  workers  are  sick  and  exhausted  There  are  no  sick  days  and  management  pro-
vides  no  medical  care.  This  factory  produces  for  Jones  Apparel,  the  Gloria  Vander-
bilt label. 

At  the  Hussein  Jordan  Garment  factory  in  the  Al  Hassan  Industrial  City,  the 
workers  are  being  forced  to  work  10  regular  hours  rather  than  the  legal  8  hours. 
If workers arrive 1 minute late to the factory, they are beaten. Nor have these work-
ers  received  their  passports  and  residency  permits.  They  are  being  paid  below  the 
legal minimum wage and the factory is illegally charging workers for food and med-
ical  care.  All  overtime  is  obligatory  and  sick  days  and  national  holidays  are  not  re-
spected. The Hussein Jordan factory produces for Victoria’s Secret. 

On  balance  however,  much  has  improved  in  Jordan’s  garment  industry,  and  the 
government  is  seriously  responding  to  reports  of  continued  violations.  But  must  re-
mains still to be done. The guest workers are still denied the freedom of association 
and the right to organize. 

We  do  not  know  of  a  single  prosecution  of  factory  owners  for  human  trafficking 
and holding tens of thousands of workers under conditions of involuntary servitude. 
Nor  do  we  know  of  any  case  where  the  foreign  guest  workers  were  paid  the  out-
standing  back  wages  legally  due  them.  But  there  is  hope  that  the  significant  im-
provements will continue. 

A  second  concrete  example  I  want  to  raise  is  that  of  the  Kaisi  Metals  factory  in 
Guangzhou  in  the  south  of  China,  where  600  to  700  workers  toil  under  dangerous 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

and illegal conditions producing furniture parts for export to U.S. companies. Among 
those  companies  is  the  Knape  &  Vogt  Manufacturing  Company—located  in  Grand 
Rapids,  Michigan—which  imported  $10.4  million-worth  of  goods  from  the  Kaisi  fac-
tory  in  a  recent  three-month  period.  Every  single  labor  law  in  China  is  routinely 
violated at the Kaisi factory, along with the International Labor Organization’s core 
worker  rights  standards,  while  the  U.S.  companies  sourcing  production  there  say 
and do nothing. 

Grueling, exhausting, numbing, dangerous and poorly paid would be the only way 
to  describe  the  workday  at  the  Kaisi  Metals  factory.  Kaisi  workers  are  routinely 
forced  to  toil  14  1⁄2 to  15  1⁄2 hours  a  day,  from  8  a.m.  to  10:30  or  11:30  p.m.,  often 
7  days  a  week.  It  is  not  uncommon  for  the  workers  to  be  at  the  factory  100  hours 
a week, while toiling 80 or more hours. 

Workers  are  paid  on  a  piece  rate  basis.  It  is  standard  for  management  to  arbi-
trarily  set  wildly  excessive  production  goals  requiring  workers  to  complete  7,780  to 
11,830  pieces  in  a  day,  which  is  640  to  980  operations  an  hour—or  one  piece  every 
four  to  6  seconds—for  which  they  are  paid  an  astounding  six-hundredths  of  a  cent 
per piece. The work pace is brutal, relentless and dangerous. 

Workers  are  paid  below  the  legal  minimum  wage  and  cheated  of  their  overtime 
premium,  earning  less  than  half  of  what  they  are  legally  owed.  Workers  are  paid 
just  $24.33  for  a  77-hour  work  week,  and  32  cents  an  hour.  The  workers  should  be 
earning at least $52.56. The current minimum wage is 58 cents an hour. 

It is a dreary life for the 600 to 700 workers at the Kaisi factory, who are housed 
in primitive over-crowded company dorms located on the seventh floor of the factory. 
Each  room  measures  11  feet  by  24  feet  and  its  walls  are  lined  with  double-level 
metal  bunk  beds.  There  is  no  other  furniture,  not  even  a  bureau,  a  table  or  chair. 
Six to eight workers share each room. For privacy, the workers drape old sheets and 
plastic over the openings to their bunks. There is a tiny bathroom, which the work-
ers  say  is  filthy.  There  is  no  hot  water  and  any  workers  who  want  to  bathe  during 
the winter must walk down four flights of stairs to fetch hot water in a small plastic 
bucket  and  return  to  their  dorm  room  for  a  sponge  bath.  The  dorms  are  very  over- 
crowded and the air reeks of perspiration and sweaty feet. 

Married couples must live ‘‘off campus’’ under equally deplorable conditions, since 
they are able to afford only the smallest, most primitive one-room apartments. Zhu 
Shenghong,  who  lost  three  fingers  at  the  Kaisi  factory,  lives  in  a  single  room  with 
his  wife.  Their  only  furniture  consists  of  a  bed,  which  is  broken,  a  few  primitive 
wooden tables and three tiny chairs Zhu made himself before he was injured, using 
scraps of wood he picked up on the street. They cannot afford a television. The toilet 
is  an  outhouse,  and  the  kitchen  is  in  a  hallway  partitioned  with  some  planks  of 
wood.  Zhu  and  his  wife  often  cook  with  wood,  largely  subsisting  on  turnips.  This 
is all that two people, both working in export factories, can afford. 

Much  worse  still  is  the  fact  that  the  Kaisi  factory  is  a  dangerous  place  to  work, 
where scores of young people have been seriously injured, and some maimed for life. 
Dai Kehong was just 24 years old when both his hands were crushed while work-
ing  on  a  punch  press  molding  machine  producing  furniture  parts  for  export  to  U.S. 
companies.  It  happened  at  9  p.m.  when  Dai  was  13  hours  into  his  routine  15  1⁄2 
hour shift. Dai’s right hand is mangled and deformed, with only the thumb and fore-
finger remaining, but frozen in place. His left hand was also crushed and frozen into 
a  claw,  as  he  is  unable  to  bend  or  straighten  any  of  his  fingers.  He  has  no  ability 
to use either hand and will need an artificial limb. 

On  September  29,  2006,  Zhao  Chengquang’s  left  hand  was  crushed  while  he  was 
working  on  an  order  for  the  U.S.  Knape  &  Vogt  company.  His  stool  suddenly  slid 
out  from  under  him  leaving  his  left  hand  caught  in  the  machine.  His  hand  was 
crushed,  severing  two  fingers  with  the  knuckles  and  a  large  part  of  his  left  hand. 
In September 2006 alone, five Kaisi factory workers were seriously injured, result-

ing in the loss of at least six fingers. 

In direct violation of China’s laws, the Kaisi factory failed to inscribe its workers 
in the mandatory national work injury insurance program, which is China’s equiva-
lent of Worker Compensation. Kaisi management also failed to report these serious 
work  injuries  to  the  local  authorities.  The  Kaisi  factory  refused  to  pay  anywhere 
near  the  full  compensation  these  injured  workers  were  legally  owed.  Management 
is even refusing to pay for Dai Kehong’s artificial limb. 

U.S. companies could never tolerate such abusive treatment of their products and 
have  gone  out  of  their  way  to  work  with  the  Kaisi  factory  to  bring  their  contractor 
into  compliance  with  international  packing  specs  so  that  their  products  will  not  be 
damaged en route to the U.S. Knape & Vogt spent 1 year working with its contrac-
tors  in  China  spelling  out  acceptable  criteria  that  its  packing  must  meet  and  de-
manding that each package pass rigorous tests before shipment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  companies  stood  by  and  did  not  say  a  word  as  scores 
of  young  workers  were  injured  and  maimed  due  to  dangerous  working  conditions. 
Nor  did  the  companies  sourcing  production  at  the  Kaisi  factory  utter  a  single  word 
to  protest  the  7-day,  80-hour  work  weeks,  or  the  fact  that  workers  were  being  paid 
below the legal minimum wage and cheated of their overtime premium while work-
ing  on  their  goods.  Nothing  was  done  to  bring  the  primitive  dorm  conditions  up  to 
a level of acceptable decency. 

In fact, the companies give every indication that they care much more about their 

products than about the human beings in China who make them. 

This  is  just  one  example—and  there  are  hundreds—of  how  easily  the  paper-thin 
labor  laws  in  China  are  flaunted  by  the  multinational  corporations  with  complete 
impunity. Here too, the voluntary corporate codes of conduct and private monitoring 
schemes have failed completely—and with such tragic results for the workers. 

Senator Dorgan, I believe that the Decent Working Conditions and Fair Competi-
tion  Act,  which  you  and  your  colleagues  recently  introduced  in  the  U.S.  Senate,  is 
the  single  most  important  action  that  can  be  taken  to  end  the  race  to  the  bottom 
in the global economy. Once passed, this legislation will reward decent U.S. compa-
nies  which  are  striving  to  adhere  to  the  law.  Worker  rights  standards  in  China, 
Bangladesh  and  other  countries  across  the  world  will  be  raised,  improving  condi-
tions  for  tens  of  millions  of  working  people.  Your  legislation  will  for  the  first  time 
also create a level playing field for American workers to compete fairly in the global 
economy. 

Thank you for allowing me the opportunity to testify on this critical issue, of rais-

ing standards in the global economy rather than lowering them. 

Senator DORGAN. We have your entire statement as a part of the 
record,  and  you’ve  included  a  great  deal  of  the  information,  some 
of  which  you’ve  noted  today,  Mr.  Kernaghan.  And  thank  you. 
Thank you very much for your work and your testimony. 

Mr.  English  is  the  person  who’s  here  on  behalf  of  the  United 
Steelworkers, representing the president, Leo Gerard, who was not 
able to be with us today. 

Mr. English, thank you for being with us. You may proceed. 
STATEMENT OF JAMES D. ENGLISH, INTERNATIONAL 
SECRETARY–TREASURER, UNITED STEELWORKERS 

Mr. ENGLISH. Thank you, Senator Dorgan. 
My name is Jim English, and I’m the Secretary-Treasurer of the 
United Steelworkers of America, and I’m here in support, today, of 
Senate bill 367. 

Senator I would thank you for introducing the bill, thank you for 
having this hearing. And I’d also thank you for ‘‘Take This Job and 
Ship It.’’ It’s a book that we’ve distributed widely among our union 
members.  I  would  note  that  there’s  a  special  piece  in  there  on 
George  Becker,  the  former  president  of  the  United  Steelworkers. 
Mr. Becker was buried, this past Friday. He died after a long bout 
with cancer. He had served on the China Commission. He had real-
ly  been  a  spokesman  on  behalf  of  fair  trade  in  this  country,  and 
I appreciate the fact that you recognized that fact in your book. 

With  me  today—well,  in  your  book,  you  also  make  reference  to 
the  shutdown  of  the  Pennsylvania  House  furniture  plant  in  Penn-
sylvania—with  me  today—and  I’d  ask  them  to  stand  briefly  to  be 
recognized—are  Tom  Riegle  and  Leroy  Reagle.  Their  last  names 
are  spelled—are  pronounced  the  same,  but  they’re  spelled  dif-
ferently. They’re both men that have family—had family supportive 
jobs at making high-end quality wood furniture at a factory owned 
by  Pennsylvania  House,  in  Lewisburg,  Pennsylvania.  Both  Tom 
and Leroy were long-time woodcraftsmen who permanent lost their 
jobs  on  December  the  28th  of  2004,  along  with  425  other  USWA- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

represented  employees  at  Pennsylvania  House.  The  corporate 
owner  of  Pennsylvania  House  decided  to  close  the  Lewisburg  fac-
tory and move production to China, where labor costs and working 
conditions  are  easily  exploited.  Today,  Pennsylvania  House  fur-
niture products are largely made in China. 

It is not unusual for elected officials, when dealing with the ques-
tion of trade, to say that American workers are the most productive 
in  the  world,  and  that  they  can—given  a  level  playing  field,  they 
can  compete  with  anyone.  The  problem  is  that  we  don’t  have  a 
level  playing  field  in  the  global  economy  today.  You  can’t  have  a 
level playing field when American workers are being asked to com-
pete against forced labor. You can’t have a level playing field when 
American workers are being asked to compete against persons who 
are  required  to  work  long  hours  without  getting  paid.  You  can’t 
have  a  level  playing  field  when  workers  are  jailed  for  trying  to 
form  an  independent  union.  You  can’t  have  a  level  playing  field 
when  workers  in  the  United  States  are  forced  to  compete  against 
workers in other countries who are required to work at subsurvival 
wages. 

This  legislation  would  be  a  good  step  in  the  direction  of  trying 
to  create  that  level  playing  field.  And  I  applaud  you,  Senator,  for 
introducing  it,  because  I  think  it  is  a—it’s  a  good,  strong  step  in 
that  direction.  But,  more  important  than  that,  it  is  a  statement  to 
the world that this country stands strong in favor of a moral prin-
ciple  that  people  who  work  for  a  living  should  get  a  decent  wage, 
should  be  able  to  work  in  conditions  that  are  tolerable,  that  they 
should be able to have the right to organize, have the right to bar-
gain collectively. 

On  behalf  of  the  Steelworkers,  I’ve  had  the  privilege  of  visiting 
Mexico  on  a  number  of  occasions  with  George  Becker,  people  who 
work for the Steelworkers have visited China, have visited Jordan. 
And  it  is  a  appalling  to  look  at  the  conditions  in  which  people  are 
forced to live because of the poverty wages that they are paid. And 
I  think  that  this  bill  is  a  good  first  step  in  trying  to  correct  that 
condition. Until we correct that condition, we cannot truly say that 
we have a global economy that works for all people. 

So, I thank you for the legislation, and indicate to you our strong 

support for it. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. English follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES D. ENGLISH, INTERNATIONAL SECRETARY- 

TREASURER, UNITED STEELWORKERS 

Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the  Committee,  on  behalf  of  the  1.2  million  working 
and retired Steelworkers in the United States and Canada, I appreciate this oppor-
tunity  to  testify  in  support  of  Senate  Bill  367,  The  Decent  Working  Conditions  and 
Fair Competition Act. I applaud you for your leadership in authoring this important 
legislation.  And  I  applaud  as  well  Senator  Graham  from  South  Carolina  who  is  a 
primary  co-sponsor  on  the  bill.  All  too  frequently,  policymakers  have  ignored  the 
dark side of increased globalization and its impact on workers both domestically and 
around  the  globe.  Your  actions  suggest  a  growing  bi-partisan  awareness  that  new 
measures are needed to establish effective standards to defend the most vulnerable 
among us if the promise of expanded international trade is to be realized. 

For far too long, the United States Government’s trade agenda has focused on cor-
porate protections while ignoring the lives of human beings toiling within the global 
economy.  One  result  is  that  products  reaching  American  soil  often  come  with  the 
taint  of  being  produced  in  inhumane  conditions.  Many  workers  making  products 
destined  for  the  United  States  do  not  have  the  option  of  rejecting  forced  labor,  un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

safe  conditions,  indecent  pay,  discrimination,  or  other  violations  of  their  rights.  In-
stead,  because  of  their  poverty  and  desperation,  they  are  the  victims  of  a  global 
trading  system  that  allows,  if  not  encourages,  horrendous  working  conditions  to 
swell corporate bottom lines. 

The recent period of trade liberalization has not been kind to working Americans. 
Despite  the  negotiation  of  a  series  of  so-called  free  trade  agreements  over  the  last 
dozen years, real income and wages in the U.S. are stagnating or falling, inequality 
is growing, more people are in poverty, debt is growing faster than income, and mil-
lions of decent, good paying manufacturing jobs have disappeared. Unfair trade poli-
cies, and the massive and ultimately unsustainable trade deficits that have resulted, 
are  a  key  contributing  factor  to  the  job  loss,  destroyed  communities,  and  falling 
wages and benefits that American workers are facing today. 

These  problems  are  not  limited  to  U.S.  workers.  Indeed,  for  workers  in  the  coun-
tries of many of our trading partners, the situation is considerably worse. In export 
processing  zones  alone,  hundreds  of  thousands,  if  not  millions  of  workers  are  traf-
ficked to work in sweatshops, making products for export to the U.S. Many of these 
workers have their passports confiscated and are forced to work inhumane hours for 
pittance  wages,  sometimes  going  months  without  a  paycheck.  These  workers  are 
often denied their basic human rights at the workplace, especially the right to orga-
nize and bargain collectively, even while they make products for some of the largest 
and  richest  corporations  in  the  world.  If  corporations  can  demand  and  win  strong, 
enforceable laws, backed by sanctions to protect their products and intellectual prop-
erty,  certainly  workers  should  demand  and  achieve  laws  to  protect  the  rights  of 
workers  who  make  those  products.  The  enactment  of  S.  367  would  be  a  significant 
step forward in bringing some balance to the global economy. 

The  Decent  Working  Conditions  and  Fair  Competition  Act  simply  states  that  if 
products  are  made  in  sweatshop  conditions,  they  are  not  welcome  in  our  markets. 
A product is considered a sweatshop good if it is produced under conditions that do 
not meet core labor standards. Those standards include the right to associate, orga-
nize and bargain collectively, a prohibition on forced or child labor, and basic condi-
tions of work including wages, safety and health protections, and hours of work. 

The  idea  of  linking  conditions  of  work  to  trade  is  not  new.  It  has  been  present 
in  our  national  dialogue  on  international  economic  affairs  for  more  than  100  years. 
The McKinley Tariff of 1890 included a provision banning the import of prison made 
goods.  In  1912,  the  U.S.  banned  the  import  of  white  phosphorous  matches  because 
of health hazards associated, not with their use, but with their production. The Ad-
ministrations of President Eisenhower, President Nixon, President Reagan, the first 
President  Bush,  and  President  Clinton  all  sought  to  include  worker  rights  and 
standards  in  multilateral  trade  agreements.  Their  collective  reasoning  was  perhaps 
best  expressed  20  years  ago  in  a  1987  letter  to  the  House  Ways  and  Means  Com-
mittee from President Reagan’s Labor Secretary Bill Brock who wrote: 

‘‘Those  countries  which  are  flooding  world  markets  with  goods  made  by  chil-
dren, or by workers who can’t form free trade unions or bargain collectively, or 
who  are  denied  even  the  most  minimum  standards  of  safety  and  health  are 
doing  more  harm  to  the  principle  of  free  and  fair  trade  than  any  protectionist 
group I can think of.’’ 

While sadly little progress has been made at the multilateral level, Congress has 
over  the  last  20  years  introduced  the  concept  of  linking  worker  rights  to  trade  in 
a  variety  of  U.S.  laws.  The  Caribbean  Basin  Initiative,  the  Generalized  System  of 
Preferences,  the  Andean  Trade  Preference  Act,  the  Overseas  Private  Investment 
Corporation, and Section 301 of the 1988 Trade Act, to name just a few, all contain 
some  form  of  worker  rights  conditionality.  While  all  well  intentioned,  enforcement 
of their worker rights provisions has been lacking. 

It  is  in  this  context  that  The  Decent  Working  Conditions  and  Fair  Competition 
Act  holds  the  most  promise.  In  assigning  enforcement  responsibilities  to  both  the 
Customs Service and the Federal Trade Commission, the bill sends a clear message 
that abusive labor conditions in trade will no longer be tolerated. Perhaps more im-
portantly,  by  creating  a  private  right  of  action,  the  indifference  or  passivity  on  the 
part of the Executive Branch will no longer be able to block needed action. I would 
suggest  however,  that  the  section  of  the  bill  that  deals  with  who  has  the  standing 
to  sue,  be  amended  to  include  workers  and  their  unions.  Workers  are  on  the  front 
lines  of  unfair  and  abusive  trade  and  need  to  have  the  ability  to  seek  redress  in 
the same manner as companies or investors. 

The  Decent  Working  Conditions  and  Fair  Competition  Act  seeks  to  address  one 
of  the  questions  that  need  to  be  answered  as  our  Nation  confronts  an  expanding 
global  economy.  This  is  not  about  free  trade  or  protectionism,  but  rather  what  are 
the  rules  that  should  be  in  place  to  insure  just  and  fair  competition.  For  workers, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

the overriding issue in discussions on international trade is not free trade or protec-
tion,  open  markets  or  closed  markets,  or  more  investment  or  less.  Rather,  the  de-
bate for us is over how the gains of economic activity are to be distributed and who 
has  a  say  in  making  that  determination.  If  the  growing  internationalization  of  the 
U.S. economy results in economic growth, we are concerned with who will benefit— 
the  tiny  number  of  people  on  the  top  rungs  of  the  economic  ladder—or  the  vast 
numbers on the bottom and middle rungs. And we certainly do not believe that the 
only choice is between autarky and an unrestrained free market. 

History teaches that there is no reason to expect that an unregulated free market 
will  bring  sustained  equitable  economic  growth  and  progress.  For  trade  unionists, 
most  of  the  historic  achievements  of  our  movement,  the  establishment  of  a  min-
imum  wage,  the  abolition  of  child  labor,  the  development  of  workplace  health  and 
safety  laws,  as  well  as  the  establishment  of  collective  bargaining  were  intended  to 
temper and restrain some of the most brutal effects of the free market. 

We  now  have  to  extend  our  domestic  experience  into  the  international  arena.  By 
setting  a  floor  on  labor  rights  and  standards,  The  Decent  Working  Conditions  and 
Fair  Competition  Act  does  exactly  that.  Consumers  have  a  right  to  know  the  prod-
ucts  they  purchase  are  not  produced  in  sweatshop  conditions.  Businesses  have  the 
right  to  compete  fairly,  and  not  with  companies  that  engage  in  worker  abuses. 
Shareholders  have  the  right  to  invest  with  the  knowledge  that  they  are  not  sup-
porting sweatshop practices. And, most importantly, workers around the globe have 
the right to earn a living without the degradation of toiling in inhumane conditions. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. English, thank you very much. 
Let me make a note about Pennsylvania House furniture. One of 
the things that struck me about that is that it was a high-end fur-
niture  company.  The  furniture,  made  by  craftsmen  and  women, 
who cared a lot about their jobs. Those jobs went to China. And the 
Pennsylvania  wood  is  actually  shipped  to  China  and  then  put  to-
gether  in  China,  sent  back  to  our  country,  still  as  Pennsylvania 
House  furniture.  Apparently  the  skilled  workers,  the  craftsmen  at 
Pennsylvania  House  furniture,  turned  over  the  last  piece  of  fur-
niture  coming  off  the  line  at  Pennsylvania  House  furniture,  as  it 
came  off  the  line,  and  decided  they  would  all  sign  their  names  on 
the  bottom  of  the  last  piece  of  American  domestic-made  Pennsyl-
vania House furniture. Some customer somewhere purchased some-
thing  that  has  the  proud  signature  of  craftsmen  who  cared  about 
their work, and did good work, who signed the bottom of that piece 
of  furniture.  But  they  can’t  compete  with  20-  and  30-cent-an-hour 
labor. And that labor is sufficient to even allow the shipment of the 
wood  to  China  to  be  produced  and  to  then  be  shipped  back  to 
American consumers. 

I think it is a compelling story, and one that deserves the atten-
tion  of  Congress  as  we  consider  this  issue  of  globalization  and  its 
impact on this country. 

Mr. Socolow is the Commissioner of the New Jersey Department 

of Labor and Workforce. 

Mr.  Socolow,  we  appreciate  your  being  here  today,  and  you  may 

proceed. 
STATEMENT  OF  HON.  DAVID  J.  SOCOLOW,  COMMISSIONER, 
NEW  JERSEY  DEPARTMENT  OF  LABOR  AND  WORKFORCE 
DEVELOPMENT 
Mr. SOCOLOW. Senator Dorgan, thank you very much for holding 
this  important  hearing,  and  thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  testify 
about  what  States  like  New  Jersey  are  doing  to  help  stop  workers 
from being abused in sweatshop conditions. 

We are using the purchasing power of State government to coun-
teract sweatshop labor practices. And we’ve recognized that, rather 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

than  buying  goods  based  solely  on  the  lowest  possible  price,  we 
ought  to  include,  in  our  procurement  policies,  a  recognition  of  the 
true cost of the apparel and other goods that we buy. 

Over  the  past  2  years,  New  Jersey  State  government  agencies 
purchased  nearly  $7  million  worth  of  apparel  for  uniformed  staff, 
employees,  and  individuals  for  whom  the  State  provides  clothing 
and linens in our State correctional and developmental institutions. 
And  it’s  estimated  that  all  State  governments  purchase  something 
on the order of $400 million a year worth of those types of apparel 
items. 

In 2002, our State government took a historic step forward to ad-
dress  sweatshop  abuses  by  implementing  Executive  Order  20, 
which requires that all apparel purchased by the State of New Jer-
sey  be  manufactured  in  the  United  States  under  fair  labor  condi-
tions.  And  this  procurement  policy  is  making  a  real  impact,  Mr. 
Chairman,  in  protecting  workers.  We  have  avoided  buying  goods 
that  were  not  manufactured  in  accordance  with  our  required  labor 
practices.  And  there  are  specific  examples  of  that  in  my  written 
testimony,  which  I’ve  submitted  for  the  record.  What  all  of  those 
examples show is that we’re often alerted to these potential abuses 
by  competitors  of  the  contractors  and  bidders  during  the  procure-
ment  process.  And  that  is,  of  course,  a  market-based  mechanism 
whereby  one  bidder  would  notify  us  that  another  bidder  might  be 
attempting to supply us with goods produced under abhorrent labor 
conditions. And that way, we can keep sweatshops out of our State 
supply chain while minimizing the cost to State government. 

It  is  worth  paying  a  small  premium—typically  around  20  per-
cent—to  avoid  supporting  sweatshops  with  our  residents’  tax  dol-
lars in order to uphold the values of the people of New Jersey. 

And  now,  Governor  Corzine  of  New  Jersey  has  acted  to  take  the 
next step toward ending worldwide sweatshop conditions. Last Sep-
tember,  New  Jersey  joined  a  State  and  local  consortium  of  govern-
ments,  which  was  proposed  originally  by  Governor  Baldacci  of 
Maine,  with  the  goal  of  ending  the  use  of  State  taxpayer  funds  to 
purchase  apparel  manufactured  in  sweatshops.  The  inaugural 
meeting  of  this  consortium  is  planned  for  next  month  with  rep-
resentatives  from  the  States  of  Maine,  New  Jersey,  and  Pennsyl-
vania.  And  what  we’re  going  to  do  is  establish  standards  for  pro-
duction  of  apparel,  we’re  going  to  implement  monitoring  to  inves-
tigate  factories  around  the  world,  to  root  out  sweatshop  conditions 
and abuses. But, most of all, we’re going to combine our purchasing 
power to try to create a market niche for fairly produced products. 
Working  together,  State  and  local  governments  can  strike  with 
even  greater  force  against  sweatshop  conditions.  With  the  buying 
power  of  these  many  entities  joined  in  a  national  consortium,  we 
hope  that  global  manufacturers  will  recognize  the  value  of  pro-
ducing  goods  for  our  market  while  meeting  basic  workplace  re-
quirements, paying living wages, offering fixed working hours, put-
ting an end to the use of child labor, ensuring the right to collective 
bargaining, and protecting worker health and safety. 

Mr.  Chairman,  a  single  State,  town,  or  university  cannot,  on  its 
own,  end  the  global  exploitation  of  sweatshop  workers,  but  each  of 
us  can  take  steps  to  combat  the  economic  incentives  that  give  rise 
to sweatshop abuses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

So,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  appreciate  the  op-

portunity to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Socolow follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID J. SOCOLOW, COMMISSIONER, NEW JERSEY 

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT 

State Initiatives to Prevent Abusive Sweatshop Labor Conditions 

Chairman Dorgan, members of the Subcommittee, thank you for this opportunity 
to  come  before  you  to  discuss  what  states  like  New  Jersey  are  doing  to  help  stop 
workers  from  being  abused  in  sweatshops.  I  am  David  Socolow,  and  I  serve  as  the 
Commissioner of the New Jersey Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 
As this committee has heard from the compelling personal stories of witnesses at 
today’s hearing, workers continue to be exposed to sweatshop conditions around the 
world,  leading  to  horrendous  child  labor  abuses,  dangerous  working  conditions  and 
unconscionably  low  wage  levels,  as  global  manufacturers  produce  low-cost  apparel 
for the world’s most affluent nations. 

Here in the United States, governments at both the State and Federal levels have 
worked for almost a century to eliminate these terrible working conditions from our 
economic landscape. As state labor commissioner, I lead an agency whose daily mis-
sion  is  to  ensure  that  the  workers  of  New  Jersey  are  paid  fair  wages  and  are  pro-
vided safe workplaces. However, now that much of the apparel in the global market-
place  is  manufactured  overseas,  we  must  not  turn  a  blind  eye  to  sweatshop  abuses 
elsewhere that we would not tolerate in our own backyard. 

We  can  do  our  part  by  using  the  State’s  purchasing  power  to  counteract  sweat-
shop  labor  practices.  Rather  than  buying  goods  based  solely  on  the  lowest  possible 
price,  we  should  include  in  our  procurement  policies  a  recognition  of  the  real  cost 
of the apparel we buy. Such enlightened procurement policies take into account the 
harm  that  sweatshop  conditions  cause,  not  only  to  those  workers  exploited  in  over-
seas factories, but also to American workers and manufacturers who cannot compete 
against  unscrupulous  contractors  paying  poverty  wages  while  ignoring  workplace 
health and safety. 
New Jersey’s Apparel Procurement Executive Order 

In my home state of New Jersey, over the past 2 years, State governmental agen-
cies purchased more than $7 million worth of apparel for uniformed staff, employees 
and individuals for whom the State provides clothing, and linens in our State correc-
tional and developmental institutions. 

In 2002, our State government took an historic step toward addressing sweatshop 
abuses  by  implementing  Executive  Order  20,  which  requires  that  all  apparel  pur-
chased by the State of New Jersey be manufactured in the United States under fair 
labor conditions. Moreover, this Order requires contractors providing apparel to the 
state to provide the names and locations of all subcontractors involved in the manu-
facture of that apparel and to sign Affidavits certifying that: their workers are paid 
a  ‘‘non-poverty  wage’’;  workers  are  afforded  a  mechanism  to  resolve  employer-em-
ployee  disputes;  the  employer  is  committed  to  neutrality  in  regard  to  union  orga-
nizing  efforts;  and  that  workers  are  afforded  a  safe  and  healthy  work  environment 
free from discrimination. 

This policy is making a real impact in protecting workers. In one recent example, 
a winning bidder swore in an affidavit to supply the State with domestically manu-
factured  apparel  at  a  cost  lower  than  three  other  bidders  who  offered  non-domestic 
product.  When  we  found  in  an  audit  that  the  company  had  supplied  a  mix  of  both 
domestic  and  imported  products,  we  gave  them  a  choice:  give  up  the  contract,  or 
provide only linens manufactured according to the State’s anti-sweatshop standards. 
The  company  agreed  to  provide  sweat-free  products  and  this  was  confirmed  in  sub-
sequent audits. 

In another case, a losing bidder challenged the recommended award of an apparel 
contract  to  another  vendor.  In  responding  to  the  protest,  the  winning  bidder  with-
drew  their  affidavit,  stating  that  they  could  not  supply  the  domestically  made  ap-
parel at the prices they bid. After a re-bid, the original winning bidder made a new 
offer to supply domestically produced apparel at a price 20 percent higher than the 
lowest bid for imported product. New Jersey has found that this is the typical price 
differential  required  to  avoid  purchasing  products  made  in  sweatshops.  It  is  worth 
paying  this  small  premium  with  our  residents’  tax  dollars  to  uphold  the  values  of 
the people of our state. 

In implementing the State’s Apparel Procurement Executive Order, we have been 
alerted  to  potential  abuses  by  competitors  of  contractors  or  bidders  during  the  pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

curement  process.  This  market-based  mechanism  is  vital  to  enforcing  New  Jersey’s 
apparel  procurement  standards  while  minimizing  the  cost  to  State  government.  In 
this way, the State can work for the best interests of the people we represent. 
National  Initiative:  State  and  Local  Government  ‘‘Sweat-Free’’  Consortium 
While  our  Apparel  Procurement  Executive  Order  has  provided  New  Jersey  with 
a useful tool to avoid purchasing sweatshop-produced apparel, Governor Corzine has 
acted  to  take  the  next  step  toward  ending  worldwide  sweatshop  conditions.  Last 
September,  Governor  Corzine  announced  that  New  Jersey  would  join  a  State  and 
Local  government  consortium  proposed  by  Governor  Baldacci  of  Maine,  with  the 
goal  of  ending  the  use  of  State  taxpayer  funds  to  purchase  apparel  manufactured 
in sweatshops. The inaugural meeting of this consortium is planned for next month 
with  representatives  from  the  states  of  Maine,  New  Jersey  and  Pennsylvania,  and 
we are currently recruiting other state and local governments to join this effort. 

This consortium initiative will be modeled on the efforts of more than 160 colleges 
and  universities  that  have  banded  together  to  end  sweatshop  production  for  colle-
giate  apparel  under  the  Workers  Rights  Consortium  (WRC).  The  WRC  sets  high 
standards  for  the  production  of  collegiate  apparel  and  investigates  factories  around 
the world to root out sweatshop conditions and abuses. 

As with colleges and universities, state and local governments are a group of buy-
ers  with  the  common  interest  of  avoiding  sweatshop-produced  goods.  To  date,  more 
than  170  state  and  local  jurisdictions  across  America  have  adopted  procurement 
policies aimed at eliminating sweatshops from their supply chain. Now, working to-
gether,  State  and  local  governments  can  strike  with  even  greater  force  against 
sweatshop conditions. 

With  the  buying  power  of  all  of  these  entities  joined  in  a  national  consortium, 
global  manufacturers  will  recognize  the  value  of  producing  goods  for  this  market 
while meeting basic workplace requirements, including paying living wages, offering 
fixed  working  hours,  putting  an  end  to  the  use  of  child  labor,  ensuring  the  right  to 
collective bargaining and protecting worker health and safety. 

A single state, town or university cannot end the global exploitation of sweatshop 
workers. But each of us can take steps to combat the economic incentives that give 
rise to sweatshop abuses. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to testify today. I look forward to responding 

to your questions. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Socolow,  thank  you  very  much.  That  is  an 
interesting  approach,  and  one  that  gives  me  comfort,  to  see  that 
there is activity at the State level on these issues. 

Mr. Griswold is the director of the Center for Trade Policy Stud-
ies  at  the  Cato  Institute.  We’ve  had  occasion  at  previous  times,  to 
discuss trade. 

Mr. Griswold, welcome, and you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF DANIEL T. GRISWOLD, DIRECTOR, CENTER 

FOR TRADE POLICY STUDIES, THE CATO INSTITUTE 

Mr.  GRISWOLD.  Chairman  Dorgan  and  members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  the  Cato  Institute  to  testify 
today on global working conditions. 

First, we should reject any notion that American workers are pit-
ted  in  zero-sum  competition  with  workers  in  poor  countries.  There 
is  no  race  to  the  bottom  in  labor  standards.  Global  incomes  and 
working  conditions  can  rise  for  workers  in  all  countries  that  par-
ticipate  in  the  global  economy.  As  America  has  become  more 
globalized  in  the  last  25  years,  American  workers  and  their  fami-
lies have enjoyed significant increases in real compensation, dispos-
able incomes, and wealth. 

Nor  has  trade  with  developed  countries  undermined  America’s 
manufacturing  base.  Output  of  America’s  factories  last  year  was 
more than 50 percent higher than it was in the early 1990s, before 
we  joined  NAFTA  and  the  World  Trade  Organization.  American 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

factories  are  producing  more  aircraft  and  pharmaceuticals,  more 
sophisticated  machinery  and  semiconductors,  more  chemicals,  and 
even  passenger  vehicles  and  parts,  than  15  years  ago.  We  can 
produce  more  with  fewer  workers,  because  manufacturing  produc-
tivity has been growing so rapidly. 

When U.S. multinational companies invest abroad, their primary 
motivation  is  not  a  search  for  low  wages  and  low  standards.  More 
than  low  costs,  they  seek  wealthy  consumers,  skilled  workers,  an 
infrastructure  that  works,  the  rule  of  law,  political  stability,  and 
the freedom to trade and repatriate profits. That is why more than 
80  percent  of  U.S.  outward  manufacturing  direct  investment  flows 
to  other  high-income,  high-standard  economies,  such  as  the  Euro-
pean  Union,  Canada,  and  Australia.  Trade  and  globalization  are 
lifting  wages  and  working  conditions  for  hundreds  of  millions  of 
people  in  developing  countries.  The  pay  and  working  conditions  in 
foreign-owned factories and export industries are usually much bet-
ter than in the local domestic economy. Those jobs offer poor work-
ers,  especially  young  women,  their  best  opportunity  at  financial 
independence and the simple pleasures and dignities of life that we 
take for granted. 

According to the World Bank, the share of the world’s population 
living in absolute poverty has been cut in half since 1981, from 40 
percent to 19 percent, and poverty has fallen most rapidly in those 
areas  of  the  world  that  have  embraced  globalization  the  most  ag-
gressively,  including  China.  By  raising  incomes  in  poor  countries, 
free  trade  and  globalization  have  helped  pull  millions  of  kids  out 
of the work force and helped them enroll in school, where they be-
long. 

The  International  Labor  Organization  recently  reported  that  the 
number  of  children  in  the  world,  ages  10  to  14,  who  are  working 
rather than attending school, has dropped by 11 percent since their 
previous report in 2002. There are 20 million fewer Halimas today 
than there were just 4 or 5 years ago. And it’s not because of a leg-
islative  billy  club,  it’s  because  of  trade  and  growth  in  developing 
countries.  The  number  working  in  the  most  hazardous  jobs  has 
dropped  even  more  steeply,  26  percent.  Parents  in  poor  countries 
love  their  children  just  as  much  as  we  love  our  own.  When  they 
rise  above  a  subsistence  income,  the  first  thing  they  do  is  remove 
their children from the work force and put them in school. Studies 
confirm  that  labor-force  participation  rates  by  children  decline 
sharply with rising per capita GNP. 

The overwhelming majority of child laborers toiling in poor coun-
tries  work  in  sectors  far  removed  from  the  global  economy.  More 
than  80  percent  work  without  pay,  usually  for  their  family,  and 
typically  on  subsistence  farming.  I  notice  we  don’t  have  any  rep-
resentative from a rural farming area, where most poor people live 
in  the  world,  and  most  child  laborers  toil.  Most  others  work  for 
small-scale domestic enterprises, typically nontraded services, such 
as shoe-shining, newspaper delivery, and domestic service. 

So-called  sweatshop  conditions  persist  in  poor  countries  today, 
not because of globalization, which is a relatively new phenomenon, 
but  because  of  poverty,  poverty  perpetuated  by  their  own  govern-
ments’  failed  policies  of  protectionism,  inflation,  corruption,  hos-
tility  to  foreign  investment,  and  lack  of  legally  defined  property 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

rights. Globalization is not the cause of bad working conditions, but 
the best hope for improving them. 

Withholding  trade  benefits  because  of  alleged  sweatshops  would, 
in  effect,  punish  poor  countries  for  being  poor.  Trade  sanctions 
would  eliminate  the  very  export-oriented  jobs  that  are  pulling 
standards upwards, forcing workers into informal domestic sectors, 
where  wages  and  working  conditions  and  labor-rights  protections 
are  worse.  Lower  wages  paid  to  parents  would  make  it  more  dif-
ficult  for  families  on  marginal  incomes  to  keep  their  children  in 
school and out of factories or fields. 

If  Members  of  Congress  want  to  encourage  higher  labor  stand-
ards  abroad,  they  should  support  free  trade  and  investment  flows 
so  that  less-developed  countries  can  grow  more  rapidly  and  make 
more progress against poverty. Congress should seek a more robust 
International Labor Organization that could systematically monitor 
and  report  on  enforcement  of  labor  rights  in  member  countries. 
Civil-society  organizations  can  wage  campaigns  of  education  and 
put a spotlights on abusive situations, while importers can cater to 
consumer  preferences  for  higher  standards  through  labeling  and 
other promotions. 

If  members  of  this  committee  want  to  see  fewer  sweatshops  and 
child  workers  in  the  world—and  I  believe  you  do—then  I  rec-
ommend  you  support  more  open  trade  and  investment  ties  with 
workers in developing countries. 

Thank you very much, and I look forward to your questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Griswold follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL T. GRISWOLD, DIRECTOR, CENTER FOR TRADE 

POLICY STUDIES, THE CATO INSTITUTE 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Subcommittee, thank you for inviting the Cato 
Institute to testify today at this hearing on U.S. trade policy and global labor stand-
ards.  My  name  is  Dan  Griswold,  and  I  am  Director  of  the  Institute’s  Center  for 
Trade Policy Studies. 

The  Cato  Institute  is  a  non-profit,  non-partisan,  voluntarily  funded  education  in-
stitution.  Through  research  and  public  events,  we  have  worked  for  three  decades 
now to broaden the parameters of public policy debate to allow consideration of the 
traditional  American  principles  of  limited  government,  individual  liberty,  free  mar-
kets and peace among nations. 

The  constituents  you  represent  have  no  reason  to  fear  America’s  growing  trade 
with people around the world, including trade with workers in developing countries. 
Expanding trade with developing countries not only promotes more U.S. exports, but 
just  as  importantly  it  provides  a  wider  array  of  affordable  products  for  American 
consumers—such  as  shoes,  clothing,  toys,  and  sporting  goods.  Tens  of  millions  of 
American families benefit from more vigorous price competition in goods that make 
our  lives  better  everyday  at  home  and  the  office.  Lower  prices  and  more  choice 
translate  directly  into  higher  real  compensation  and  living  standards  for  American 
workers. 
There Is No ‘‘Race to the Bottom’’ 

American  workers  are  not  pitted  in  zero-sum  competition  with  workers  in  poor 
countries.  There  is  no  global  ‘‘race  to  the  bottom’’  on  labor  standards.  Through  spe-
cialization,  global  incomes  and  working  conditions  can  rise  for  workers  in  all  coun-
tries  that  participate  in  the  global  economy.  American  workers  can  compete  profit-
ably in world markets because we are so much more productive. Because of our edu-
cation, infrastructure, efficient domestic markets, the rule of law, political stability, 
and  a  generally  open  economy,  American  workers  compete  and  prosper  in  a  broad 
range  of  sectors.  As  our  country  has  become  more  globalized  in  the  past  25  years, 
American  workers  and  their  families  have  enjoyed  significant  increases  in  real  in-
comes, compensation, and wealth. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Nor  has  trade  with  developing  countries  undermined  America’s  manufacturing 
base.  According  to  the  latest  figures  from  the  Federal  Reserve  Board,  the  output  of 
America’s factories in 2006 was more than 50 percent higher than in the early 1990s 
before  NAFTA  and  the  World  Trade  Organization  came  into  being.  American  fac-
tories are producing more aircraft and pharmaceuticals, more sophisticated machin-
ery  and  semiconductors,  more  chemicals  and  even  more  passenger  vehicles  and 
parts than 15 years ago. It is true that output of clothing, shoes and other low-tech 
goods  has  been  declining,  but  those  are  not  the  industries  of  the  future  for  the 
world’s  most  sophisticated  economy.  U.S.  factories  can  produce  more  with  fewer 
workers because manufacturing productivity has been growing so rapidly. 

If  there  were  a  ‘‘race  to  the  bottom,’’  then  the  lower  wages  and  labor  standards 
in  less  developed  countries  should  be  attracting  large  shares  of  global  investment. 
Of course, developing countries attract foreign investment in those sectors in which 
they  enjoy  a  comparative  advantage,  such  as  light  manufacturing,  but  in  fact,  the 
large  majority  of  manufacturing  foreign  direct  investment  (FDI)  flows  between  rich 
countries. 1 

When  U.S.  multinational  companies  look  to  invest  abroad,  their  primary  motiva-
tion  is  not  a  search  for  low  wages  and  low  standards.  Far  more  important  than 
lower  costs  are  access  to  wealthy  consumers,  a  skilled  work  force,  modern  infra-
structure, rule of law, political stability, and freedom to trade and repatriate profits. 
That is why most outward U.S. FDI flows to other high-income, high standard coun-
tries.  Between  2003  and  2005,  more  than  80  percent  of  U.S.  direct  manufacturing 
abroad  flowed  to  the  European  Union,  Canada,  Japan,  South  Korea,  Taiwan,  and 
Singapore. 2 

Openness  to  trade  and  investment  leads  to  faster  growth,  which  leads  to  higher 
wages  and  labor  standards,  including  so-called  core  worker  rights.  That  is  why  the 
world’s  most  developed  economies,  which  account  for  most  of  the  world’s  trade  and 
attract most of its foreign direct investment, also pay the highest wages, and main-
tain  the  highest  labor  standards  related  to  freedom  of  association,  discrimination, 
forced labor, and child labor. 
Trade  and  Globalization  Are  Raising  Labor  Standards  in  Developing 

Countries 

Trade  and  globalization  are  lifting  wages  and  working  conditions  for  hundreds  of 
millions of people in developing countries. The pay and conditions offered in foreign- 
owned  factories  are  almost  always  far  higher  than  those  offered  in  the  domestic 
economy.  In  fact,  working  for  multinational  companies  that  export  are  almost  in-
variably the best jobs available in poor countries. Those jobs offer poor workers, es-
pecially young women, their best opportunity at financial independence and the sim-
ple pleasures and dignities of life we take for granted. 

For example, apparel jobs are among the lowest paying manufacturing jobs in our 
country, but they are among the best paying in poor countries. A recent study from 
San Jose University found that the apparel industry actually pays its foreign work-
ers well enough for them to rise above the poverty line in the countries where they 
invest. In Honduras, for example, where college protestors have targeted its alleged 
‘‘sweatshops,’’  the  average  apparel  worker  earns  $13  per  day,  compared  to  the  $2 
a day or less earned by 44 percent of the country’s population. 3 

Rising  levels  of  global  trade  have  lifted  hundreds  of  millions  of  people  out  of  the 
worst  kind  of  poverty  and  working  conditions.  According  to  the  World  Bank,  the 
share  of  the  world’s  population  living  in  absolute  poverty,  defined  as  an  income 
equivalent  to  one  U.S.  dollar  per  day  or  less,  has  been  cut  in  half  since  1981,  from 
40.4  percent  to  19.4  percent. 4 Poverty  has  fallen  the  most  rapidly  in  those  areas 
of  the  world  that  have  globalized  the  most  rapidly,  especially  China.  It  has  fallen 
the  least  or  actually  increased  in  those  regions  that  are  the  least  touched  by 
globalization, in particular sub-Saharan Africa. 

Openness to trade and the growth it brings exert a positive impact on the welfare 
of  children  in  less  developed  countries  by  reducing  rates  of  child  labor.  The  Inter-
national  Labor  Organization  recently  reported  that  the  number  of  children  in  the 
work force rather than in school worldwide has dropped by 11 percent since its last 

1 For a more detailed critique of the ‘‘race to the bottom’’ thesis, see Daniel Griswold, ‘‘Trade, 
Labor, and the Environment: How Blue and Green Sanctions Threaten Higher Standards,’’ Cato 
Trade Policy Analysis no. 15, August 2, 2001. 

2 U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  Survey  of  Current  Business,  Bureau  of  Economic  Analysis, 

September 2006. 

3 Benjamin  Powell  and  David  Skarbek,  ‘‘Sweatshops  and  Third  World  Living  Standards:  Are 
the Jobs Worth the Sweat?’’ Journal of Labor Research, 2006, Volume 27, Issue 2, pp. 263–274. 
4 World  Bank,  World  Development  Indicators,  2006,  available  at  devdata.worldbank.org/ 

wdi2006/contents/Section2.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

report  in  2002,  to  about  200  million.  The  number  working  in  the  most  hazardous 
jobs has dropped even more steeply, by 26 percent. 5 

Globalization is a major reason for the positive trend in child labor. As household 
incomes  rise  in  developing  countries,  especially  wages  paid  to  adult  females,  fewer 
families  face  the  economic  necessity  of  sending  their  children  to  work.  Studies  con-
firm  that  labor  force  participation  rates  by  children  aged  10  to  14  decline  signifi-
cantly with rising GNP per capita. 6 

The overwhelming majority of child laborers toiling in poor countries work in sec-
tors far removed from the global economy. More than 80 percent work without pay, 
usually for their parents or other family members and typically in subsistence farm-
ing. 7 Most  other  child  laborers  work  for  small-scale  domestic  enterprises,  typically 
non-traded  services  such  as  shoe  shining,  newspaper  delivery,  and  domestic  serv-
ice. 8 A  report  by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Labor  found,  ‘‘Only  a  very  small  percent-
age of all child workers, probably less than 5 percent, are employed in export indus-
tries  in  manufacturing  and  mining.  And  they  are  not  commonly  found  in  large  en-
terprises;  but  rather  in  small  and  medium-sized  firms  and  in  neighborhood  and 
home settings.’’ 9 

Parents in poor countries do not love their children any less than we love our own. 
When  they  succeed  in  rising  above  a  subsistence  income,  the  first  thing  they  typi-
cally do is remove their children from working on the farm, domestic service, or fac-
tory and enroll them in school. By raising incomes in poor countries, free trade and 
globalization have helped to pull millions of kids out of the work force and put them 
in school where they belong. 

In Central America, trade liberalization and other reforms of the past two decades 
have  spurred  not  only  growth  in  incomes  but  also  measurable  social  progress.  Ac-
cording  to  the  World  Bank,  literacy  rates  for  men  and  women  15  and  older  have 
risen  significantly  in  every  one  of  the  six  DR–CAFTA  countries  since  1980.  In  fact, 
between  1980  and  2001,  the  average  literacy  rate  in  the  region  has  increased  from 
67  percent  to  above  80  percent.  At  the  same  time,  the  percentage  of  children  aged 
10  to  14  who  are  in  the  work  force  has  been  steadily  declining  in  all  six  countries. 
The average share of children in the labor force across the six countries has dropped 
from  17.4  percent  in  1980  to  10.0  percent  in  2002. 10 Expanding  trade  with  the 
United States will likely accelerate those positive trends. 

It  is  certainly  true  that  working  conditions  in  less  developed  countries  can  strike 
Western  observers  as  unacceptable  if  not  appalling.  But  two  points  need  to  be  con-
sidered.  First,  wages  and  working  conditions  are  likely  to  be  even  worse  in  non- 
trade-oriented  sectors,  such  as  services  and  subsistence  agriculture,  sectors  that 
have  been  largely  untouched  by  globalization.  Second,  poor  working  conditions  in 
those  countries  are  not  a  new  development  but  have  always  been  a  chronic  fact  of 
life.  ‘‘Sweatshop’’  conditions  persist  today  not  because  of  globalization,  a  relatively 
new  phenomenon,  but  because  of  previous  decades  of  protectionism,  inflation,  eco-
nomic mismanagement, hostility to foreign investment, and a lack of legally defined 
property  rights.  Globalization  is  not  the  cause  of  bad  working  conditions  but  the 
best hope for improving them. 
Punitive  Tariffs  Aimed  At  Sweatshops  Will  Only  Hurt  the  People  We  Are 

Trying to Help 

Perversely,  withholding  trade  benefits  because  of  allegedly  low  standards  would 
in  effect  punish  those  countries  for  being  poor.  It  would  deprive  them  of  the  ex-
panded market access that offers the best hope to raise incomes and standards. The 
use of trade sanctions would target the very export industries that typically pay the 
highest wages and maintain highest standards in those countries. 

The  effect  of  sanctions  would  be  to  shrink  the  more  globally  integrated  sectors 
that are pulling standards upwards, forcing workers into informal, domestic sectors 
where  wages,  working  conditions,  and  labor-rights  protections  are  much  lower. 
Lower  wages  paid  to  parents  would  make  it  more  difficult  for  families  on  marginal 
incomes  to  keep  children  in  school  and  out  of  fields  or  factories.  ‘‘Tough’’  sanctions 
to  allegedly  enforce  higher  standards  would  be  tough  only  on  the  poorest  people  in 
the world. 

5 International  Labor  Organization,  ‘‘The  End  of  Child  Labor:  Within  Reach,’’  Geneva,  2006. 
6 Keith  E.  Maskus,  ‘‘Should  Core  Labor  Standards  Be  Imposed  Through  International  Trade 

Policy?’’ Policy Research Working paper no. 1817, The World Bank, August 1997, p. 14. 

7 ILO, p. 8 
8 ‘‘Breaking  the  Labor-Trade  Deadlock,’’  Carnegie  Endowment  for  International  Peace,  Inter- 

American Dialogue, Working Papers 17, February 2001, p. 17. 

9 U.S.  Department  of  Labor,  ‘‘By  the  Sweat  &  Toil  of  Children  (Volume  I):  The  Use  of  Child 

Labor in U.S. Manufactured and Mined Imports,’’ 1994, p. 2. 

10 The World Bank, World Development Indicators. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Demanding  that  poor  countries  eliminate  child  labor  under  threat  of  trade  sanc-
tions  can  easily  backfire.  In  1993,  Congress  seemed  poised  to  pass  the  U.S.  Child 
Labor  Deterrence  Act,  which  would  have  banned  imports  of  textiles  made  by  child 
workers. Anticipating its passage, the Bangladeshi textile industry dismissed 50,000 
children from factories. Most of those children did not end up in school but instead 
fell into prostitution and other ‘‘occupations’’ far more degrading than weaving cloth 
in a factory. 11 

America’s trade policy is already biased against workers in poor countries without 
making  it  more  so  through  ‘‘anti-sweatshop’’  legislation.  The  United  States  and 
other  rich  countries  currently  impose  their  highest  trade  barriers  against  products 
of  most  importance  to  poor  countries:  clothing,  textiles,  and  agricultural  products. 
In  fact,  our  average  tariff  imposed  on  imports  from  poor  countries  is  about  four 
times higher than those imposed on imports from other rich countries. 

Our  regressive  tariff  system  imposes  punitive  tariffs  on  workers  in  some  of  the 
poorest  countries  in  the  world.  According  to  the  Progressive  Policy  Institute,  the 
U.S.  Government  collects  more  tariff  revenue  on  the  $2  billion  in  mostly  hats  and 
t-shirts we import from Bangladesh in a year than on the $30 billion in planes, com-
puters, medicines and wine we import from France. Imports from Cambodia face an 
average  tariff  of  16,  ten  times  higher  than  the  average  1.6  percent  we  impose  on 
all imports. 12 

Our trade policies also hurt the world’s poorest farmers and their children. A 2002 
study  for  the  National  Bureau  of  Economic  Research  found  that  higher  rice  prices 
in  Vietnam  were  associated  with  significant  declines  in  child  labor  rates.  Specifi-
cally, a 30 percent increase in rice prices accounted for a decrease of children in the 
work  force  of  1  million,  or  9  percent.  The  drop  was  most  pronounced  among  girls 
aged 14 and 15. As the incomes of rice-growing families rose, they chose to use their 
additional resources to remove their children from work in the field and send them 
to  school. 13 If  U.S.  rice  subsidies  are  indeed  depressing  global  rice  prices,  as  evi-
dence  confirms,  then  those  same  programs  are  plausibly  responsible  for  keeping 
tens  of  thousands  of  young  girls  in  Vietnam  and  other  poor  countries  in  the  labor 
force rather than school. 

Attempts to ‘‘enforce’’ labor and environmental standards through trade sanctions 
are  not  only  unnecessary  but  also  counterproductive.  Sanctions  deprive  poor  coun-
tries  of  the  international  trade  and  investment  opportunities  they  need  to  raise 
overall  living  standards.  Sanctions  tend  to  strike  at  the  very  export  industries  in 
less developed countries that typically pay the highest wages and follow the highest 
standards,  forcing  production  and  employment  into  less-globalized  sectors  where 
wages  and  standards  are  almost  always  lower.  The  end  result  of  sanctions  is  the 
very opposite of what their advocates claim to seek. 

If  Members  of  Congress  want  to  encourage  higher  labor  standards  abroad,  they 
should  support  policies  that  encourage  free  trade  and  investment  flows  so  that  less 
developed  nations  can  grow  more  rapidly.  As  a  complementary  policy,  Congress 
could seek a more robust International Labor Organization that could systematically 
monitor and report on enforcement of labor rights in member countries. Meanwhile, 
civil society organizations are free to raise public awareness through campaigns and 
boycotts,  while  importers  can  cater  to  consumer  preferences  for  higher  standards 
through labeling and other promotions. 

The  demand  for  trade  sanctions  as  a  tool  to  enforce  labor  standards  confronts 
Americans  with  a  false  choice.  In  reality,  the  best  policy  for  promoting  economic 
growth  at  home  and  abroad—an  economy  open  to  global  trade  and  investment—is 
also the best policy for promoting higher labor standards. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Griswold, thank you very much. 
First, let me ask you, Mr. Griswold—you have a couple of people 
sitting behind you that lost their jobs because businesses now ship 
Pennsylvania  furniture  to  China.  You  indicated  that  that,  gen-
erally, is not a search for cheaper labor. Do you really believe that 
La-Z-Boy  didn’t  close  down  a  Pennsylvania  plant  and  ship  those 
jobs  to  China  in  order  to  create  a  piece  of  furniture  and  ship  the 

11 Jagdish  Bhagwati,  In  Defense  of  Globalization  (New  York:  Oxford  University  Press,  2004), 

12 Edward  Gresser,  Testimony  before  the  Senate  Subcommittee  on  International  Trade,  Octo-

p. 71. 

ber 27, 2005. 

13 Eric Edmonds and Nina Pavcnik, ‘‘Does Globalization Increase Child Labor? Evidence from 

Vietnam,’’ NBER Working Paper no. 8760, July 2002.) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

furniture  back  here  for  sale.  Do  you  really  believe  that  they  did 
that for reasons other than cheap labor? 

Mr.  GRISWOLD.  No,  I  think  labor  costs  were  an  important  driver 
there.  My  point  is,  that  isn’t  the  primary  driver  for  most  invest-
ment decisions made by U.S. companies. Eighty percent or more of 
our investment goes to Europe, Japan and Australia and countries 
like  that  where,  if  anything,  the  labor  standards  are  higher.  I’m 
just  saying  it’s  one  factor  of  many.  There  are  some  industries 
where  labor  is  particularly  important,  labor-intensive  industries— 
the  apparel  industry,  the  footwear  industry.  Obviously,  those  are 
going  to  go  to  less-developed  countries.  It’s  all  about  comparative 
advantage.  Their  comparative  advantage  is  lower  labor  cost,  and 
that is important in labor-intensive industries. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I—you  know,  I  wonder  if  Ricardo  wouldn’t  be 
rolling  in  his  grave  at  your  definition  of  ‘‘comparative  advantage.’’ 
The  doctrine  of  comparative  advantage  had  nothing  to  do  with  all 
of  this.  That  was  country  to  country,  before  corporations  existed, 
and  the  doctrine  of  comparative  advantage  has  nothing  to  do  with 
what  I  call  a—an  advantage  created  by  the  Chinese,  for  example, 
for  their  workers.  I’ll  give  you  the  names  of  Chinese  workers  who 
are  in  prison  because  they  wanted  to  organize  workers.  I  can  give 
you  examples  of  the  plants  in  China  where  they’re  having  kids 
work.  That’s  not  a  comparative  advantage,  some  sort  of  natural 
comparative advantage, that is a political advantage that is created 
by a Chinese Government that doesn’t enforce labor laws and envi-
ronmental laws and so on. 

But let me try to understand where we are on this. I think you’re 
saying—and  I’ll  give  you  a  chance  to  respond  to  this—I  think 
you’re  saying,  and  some  others  have  said,  ‘‘Look,  things  are  going 
pretty  well,  dramatic  improvement,  fewer  kids  working,  fewer 
sweatshops, and so on. The market system will deal with this.’’ 

Mr.  Kernaghan,  you’re  saying,  ‘‘That’s  not  true  at  all.  There  are 
substantial sweatshop abuses. In fact, the market system probably 
won’t  even  detect  them.  And,  to  the  extent  the  market  system  is 
at work here, the companies try to get the cheapest goods into this 
marketplace  and  have  a  competitive  advantage  by  employing  peo-
ple in sweatshops.’’ 

So, reconcile that. Mr. Kernaghan, you first. 
Mr.  KERNAGHAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  this  speaks  a  thousand  words, 
that  the  U.S.  corporations  would  never  allow  voluntary  codes  of 
conduct and private monitoring schemes to defend their intellectual 
property rights or their labels or their trademarks. In other words, 
they want laws, enforceable laws, backed up by sanctions. It’s only 
when you say to the companies, ‘‘Excuse me, but can we have simi-
lar laws to protect the rights of the 14-year-old girls in Bangladesh 
who  made  this  garment?’’  And  the  companies  frequently  say,  ‘‘No, 
that  would  be  an  impediment  to  free  trade.’’  So,  there  are  laws  to 
protect  the  label  and  the  trademark,  but  no  laws  to  protect  the 
human being. This is something companies themselves would never 
accept. 

We  did  reach  a  232-and-a-half-billion  dollar  trade  deficit  with 
China,  just  this  year.  The  figures  just  came  out.  Foreign  invest-
ment’s  pouring  into  China,  and  the  companies  themselves  are  say-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ing, ‘‘U.S. wages and benefits are no longer competitive in the glob-
al economy.’’ And this is Wall Street talking. 

45 

We  see  what’s  happening.  We  see  the  conditions  in  China.  The 
workers at the Kaisi factory making that furniture were getting 32 
cents an hour, and being maimed and cheated of their wages. And, 
by  the  way,  after  we  put  out  our  report,  the  factory  agreed  that 
they were violating the law. I don’t know why they did it, but they 
came  out  and  told  Associated  Press  that,  ‘‘Yes,  we  have  been  vio-
lating  the  laws,  but  we’re  going  to  do  our  best  to  clean  up  the  fac-
tory.’’ 

Right  now,  it’s  a  race  to  the  bottom,  where  workers  are  pitted 
against  each  other  over  who  will  take  the  lowest  wages,  the  least 
benefits,  and  the  most  miserable  living  and  working  conditions. 
This is what workers are experiencing. They need the right to orga-
nize.  They  don’t  need  patronizing.  They  need  the  right  to  organize 
to fight for their legal rights. 

Senator DORGAN. All right. Now, Mr. Griswold, I think what you 
have  said,  generally,  is,  ‘‘Third  World  workers  are  better  off—even 
with sweatshops, because they have a job—than not having a job.’’ 
And I guess I’d ask you to answer the question that might be a re-
flection of the impact on Third World workers: What about the im-
pact  on  American  workers?  Because  we’re  talking,  here,  about  pol-
icy in one of the most advanced countries in the world. Alan Blind-
er, Former Vice Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board, has writ-
ten  that  there  are  about  42  to  56  million  American  jobs  that  are 
so-called  tradable  or  outsourceable.  Not  all  of  them  will  be 
outsourced,  he  says,  but  even  those  that  remain  will  have  down-
ward pressure on their income, because of the global economy. 

So,  what  about  that  group  of  Americans?  What  about  American 
policy, when you talk about Third World workers being advantaged 
by at least having a job, even if it’s in a sweatshop? 

Mr.  GRISWOLD.  Well,  first,  I  think  there’s  a  huge  amount  of  evi-
dence that American workers are better off today than we were 10, 
20, 30 years ago, by virtually every measure. We are living better. 
We are living longer. Our wealth is greater. Our disposable income 
is greater. And globalization has played a role in that. 

Yes,  some  workers  are  put  out  of  work  because  of  trade.  And 
there  are  some  in  this  room.  Three-hundred  thousand  Americans 
line  up  every  week  for  unemployment  insurance.  The  churn  in  the 
job market is a natural, healthy feature of a dynamic market econ-
omy  like  ours.  Far  more  Americans  are  put  out  of  work  each  year 
because  of  technology.  You  know,  Kodak  has  laid  off  30,000  work-
ers  because  of  digital  cameras  that  you  and  I  own.  Are  we  going 
to tax digital cameras to save those jobs? No. We’re going to let the 
marketplace sort it out. There’s things we can do to help people re-
train,  to  offer  unemployment  insurance,  to  soften  the  transition. 
But  to  throw  up  walls  and  say,  ‘‘We’re  going  to  stop  change  from 
happening,’’  is  not  the  right  policy.  It’s  going  to  leave  America  a 
poorer, more isolated country. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I’m  wondering,  though:  My  impression  of  this 
economy is that it has produced about 5 and a half million people, 
added to the poverty rolls in the last 6 or 7 years. Wages and sala-
ries  are  the  method  by  which  most  workers  get  their  income;  they 
are  the  lowest  percent  of  GDP  since  they  started  keeping  score  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

1947.  And  so,  I  always  hear  these  things  about  averages.  And  you 
would,  perhaps,  say  ‘‘on  average,’’  are  the  numbers.  I  think  of  the 
story  about  nine  guys  sitting  in  a  bar,  nine  working  guys  sitting 
in  a  bar,  and  Bill  Gates  walks  in.  Now,  on  average,  all  ten  are 
wealthy.  Nothing  has  changed  in  the  lives  of  the  other  nine;  it’s 
just, on average, all ten are wealthy. 

We’ll  have  a  longer  discussion,  perhaps,  about  the  plight  of  the 
American worker trying to face competition from low-wage workers 
elsewhere and from companies that want to access low-wage work-
ers, to produce a product to ship back to this country. For the pur-
pose  of  providing  a  less-expensive  product  for  consumers?  Maybe. 
But,  more  importantly,  for  the  purpose  of  expanding  profits.  And 
that’s  the  kind  of  economy  we  have.  The  question  that  I  have  is— 
having  built,  over  a  century,  basic  standards  that  don’t  exist  in 
many  other  parts  of  the  world—fair  labor  standards,  minimum 
wage,  safe  workplace,  child  labor,  and  so  on—are  we  seeing  those 
standards diminished by virtue of the so-called global economy and 
the presence of sweatshops? I think the compelling evidence is yes. 
I’ll  give  you  a  chance  to  answer  that  in  just  a  moment,  if  you’ll 

hold that thought. 

Maine—— 

Mr.  Socolow,  how  extensive  are  the  States  involved  in  this? 
You’ve mentioned your Governor and others. It gives me some good 
feelings  to  understand  that  you  are  developing  policies  that  really 
care about conditions under which these products are produced. So, 
how extensive is it? 

Mr. SOCOLOW. Well, right now, we’ll be starting our first meeting 
with just three States, although we are—we appreciate this oppor-
tunity  to  expand  our  outreach  to  all  of  the  Governors.  And  we  are 
actively  seeking  other  State  governments,  as  well  as  local  govern-
ments. You know, cities, by virtue of having police forces and other 
needs, buy a lot of apparel, as well as State governments, by virtue 
of,  you  know,  all  of  our  corrections  institutions  and  others.  So, 
there’s a lot—there’s a big market, that could be as big as a billion 
dollars annually, of apparel procurement, just by government. 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  your  three  States  are  New  Jersey, 

Mr. SOCOLOW. New Jersey, Maine, and Pennsylvania. The—Gov-
ernor  Baldacci,  of  Maine,  Governor  Rendell,  of  Pennsylvania,  and, 
of  course,  my  own  Governor,  Governor  Corzine,  your  former  col-
league  here  in  the  Senate,  who  are  leading  the  way  on  this.  And 
so,  we’re  hopeful  that  we  can  really  create  a  consortium  that  in-
cludes  a  number  of  different  governments,  so  we  get  as  many  of 
them  as  possible,  all  agreeing  to  create  a  market  niche  for  buying 
fairly produced domestic apparel and linens. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  English,  Mr.  Griswold  calls  the  legislation 
a ‘‘billy club,’’ I think. Respond to that. You apparently support the 
legislation  that  I  and  Lindsey  Graham  have  introduced.  He  says 
it’s  a  ‘‘billy  club.’’  You  respond  to  that,  if  you  would,  and  then  I’ll 
ask Mr. Griswold to respond. 

Mr.  ENGLISH.  Well,  I  think,  if  you  look  back  at  the  development 
of  labor  laws  in  this  country,  we  created  labor  laws  to  help  allow 
workers  to  organize  and  bargain  collectively.  We  didn’t  go  to  cor-
porations  and  say,  ‘‘Be  nice,  and  treat  people  nice.’’  We  created  a 
‘‘billy  club,’’  if  you  will.  We  created  a  measure  of  compulsion,  be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

cause we felt that—the people that passed the Wagner Act felt that 
compulsion  was  necessary.  And  I  think  any  fair  evaluation  of  the 
global  trading  system  and  of  the  tremendous  incentive  of  compa-
nies to exploit the poverty around the world, would lead one to the 
conclusion  that  we  need  a  measure  of  compulsion  here,  as  well. 
And I think that’s what this piece of legislation does. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Griswold,  in  the  1930s,  FDR  pushed  the 
Fair  Labor  Standards  Act.  We  have  since  passed  child  labor  laws, 
safe  workplaces,  and  so  on.  My  guess  is—I  shouldn’t  ascribe  this 
to  it—my  guess  is  that  you  might  have  come  to  testify  against  all 
of  those.  Certainly,  American  business,  in  most  cases,  took  posi-
tions  against  all  of  those  kinds  of  initiatives  that  raised  standards 
in this country. I think, looking back, in most cases, they’re pretty 
generally  accepted  to  have  done  something  important  for  America. 
But would you—looking back at these things that we have done to 
raise  American  standards,  would  you  think  you  would  have  sup-
ported  them  as  they  were  proposed  over  the  period  of  time,  or 
would  you  have  come  in  to  say,  ‘‘You  know  what?  Let  the  market 
system  decide  that.  This  is  the  ‘billy  club’  of  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  trying  to  tell  a  factory,  ‘Here  are  the  records  you  have  to 
keep,  here  is  where  you  have  to  pay  overtime,’ ’’  and  so  on?  Give 
me where that extension of your philosophy might lead. 

Mr.  GRISWOLD.  I  don’t  know  how  I  would  have  testified  back 
then.  It  was  a  different  time,  a  different  era.  I  do  know  that  our 
overall  living  standards  have  risen,  not  because  of  legislation  Con-
gress  has  passed,  but  because  of  rising  productivity  in  our  econ-
omy,  because  we  have  the  resources.  You  can  legislate  all  you 
want.  India  has  labor  laws  that  are  comparable  to  ours,  in  terms 
of  controlling  the  ability  of  employers  to  fire  workers,  and  setting 
minimum  wages,  and  all  that;  and  yet,  they’re  still  a  very  poor 
country.  And  so,  laws  themselves  do  not  lift  people  out  of  poverty; 
they’re  lifted  out  of  poverty  by  increasing  production  and  wealth. 
The  other  difference  is,  we  didn’t  have  some  foreign  power  wav-
ing  that  billy  club  over  us.  It  was  a  decision  we  made  about  our 
own  laws.  Here,  you  are  trying  to  dictate  and  legislate  conditions 
in  other  countries.  And  I  think  that  creates  resentment  at  a  time 
when  American  policies  are  creating  enough  resentment  around 
the world the way it is. 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  legislation  is  not  an  attempt  to  do  any-
thing  to  other  countries;  it  is  an  attempt  to  say  to  companies  that 
want to produce in foreign sweatshops, ‘‘You can’t sell that product 
in America, because it doesn’t meet the basic standards of fairness 
and decency and humanity that we have spent a century building.’’ 
So,  we’re  not  in  the  business  of  enforcing  something  in  foreign 
countries.  We  are  talking  about  the  conditions  under  which  those 
products could be sold to the United States. 

I might mention one other issue. Recently, I guess it’s been about 
a  year  or  2  now,  the  President  of  the  Philippines  announced  that 
she  thought  there  should  be  an  increase  in  the  minimum  wage  in 
the  Philippines.  And  a  well-known  American  corporation  that  is 
doing  business  in  the  Philippines  by  hiring  people  in  the  Phil-
ippines  immediately,  the  very  next  day,  said,  ‘‘You  increase  the 
minimum  wage  in  the  Philippines,  we  are  gone.’’  My  point  is,  the 
same naysayers in this country, over a century, when we built the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

standards—and,  by  most  accounts,  have  dramatically  improved 
standards  of  work  in  this  country—the  same  naysayers  who  op-
posed that every step of the way do the same with respect to condi-
tions in China, conditions in the Philippines and elsewhere. By and 
large,  I  think  that  they  are  there  to  access  cheap  labor.  And  any-
thing  that  would  in  any  way  dramatically  increase,  or  incremen-
tally  increase,  labor  costs  abroad,  they  will  resist.  Do  you  disagree 
with that? 

Mr.  GRISWOLD.  I  guess  we  disagree  on  how  humans  progress.  I 
think  it’s  through—largely  through  market  and  rising  creation  of 
wealth,  and  that  allows  these  standards  to  rise.  But  let’s  just  look 
at the example of China. There are 400 million fewer people living 
in absolute poverty in China today than 25 years ago. Is it because 
of  legislation  that  this  committee,  or  Congress,  passed?  Is  it  be-
cause of legislative labor laws passed by the Chinese Government? 
No. It’s because of rising trade, globalization, and markets being al-
lowed  to  work.  Yes,  you  need  a  framework  of  the  rule  of  law.  Yes, 
there  needs  to  be  laws  against  abusive  child  labor  and  slave  labor 
and  that  sort  of  thing.  I’m  all  for  those.  But  I’m  afraid  that  some 
of  the  ideas  being  talked  about  in  Congress  would  interfere  with 
those forces that are bringing about these advantages that I talked 
about in declining global poverty and child labor. 

Senator  DORGAN.  At  least  a  part  of  the  experience  you  describe 
in  China,  with  about—is  it  1.3  billion  people?—so  400  million 
would  leave  another  900  million  in  a  different  situation—at  least 
part  of  their  progress,  I  suppose,  is  jobs  that  are  producing  Huffy 
bicycles,  Radio  Flyer  little  red  wagons,  Pennsylvania  House  fur-
niture,  Levis,  Fruit  of  the  Loom,  among  many  others.  And  I  could 
go on for about 20 minutes. It might well be nice that the Chinese 
have  those  jobs.  It  would  be  much  nicer,  in  my  judgment,  if  those 
jobs  were  in  Trenton,  New  Jersey,  and  Philadelphia,  and  places  in 
this country. 

However,  having  said  all  that,  that’s  a  different  discussion— 
whether  the  global  economy,  which  produced,  last  year,  an  $832 
billion  trade  deficit  with  this  country,  is  beneficial  to  this  country. 
I think free trade is not much more than a chant. I think fair trade 
is  an  essential  ingredient  for  the  way  we  should  view  trade  agree-
ments. Trade agreements should be mutually beneficial between us 
and  those  with  whom  we  have  agreements.  And,  in  my  judgment, 
that has not been the case. 

Let  me  ask  a  couple  of  additional  questions,  getting  back  to  the 

basic issue of sweatshops. 

Mr.  Kernaghan,  you  support  the  legislation  that  we  have  intro-
duced.  Mr.  Griswold—and  I  think  some  others,  and  my  colleague 
Senator  DeMint—have  concern  about  it.  Senator  DeMint  talks 
about  the  liability  side  of  it.  Mr.  Griswold  talks  about  the  ‘‘billy 
club’’  side.  You  describe  it  differently.  You  describe  it  as  giving 
rights to American business that are being injured by this practice. 
Go through that again for me, if you would. 

Mr. KERNAGHAN. Companies in the United States that are trying 
to  do  the  right  thing  and  live  up  to  the  law  are  being  undercut  by 
companies  which  are  blatantly  violating  the  law.  So,  for  example, 
we have workman’s compensation in New York State. The workers 
at the Kaisi factory in China had no workman’s compensation, even 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

though they were supposed to have it by law. We have a minimum 
wage.  They  have  a  minimum  wage  in  China,  but  the  minimum 
wage  is  violated.  They  have  overtime  laws.  Overtime  laws  are  vio-
lated.  They  have  right-to-organize  laws.  They’re  violated.  Compa-
nies that want to do the right thing in the global economy are hav-
ing their legs cut out from under them by unscrupulous companies 
and—and  countries,  for  that  matter—that  want  to  abuse  worker 
rights. 

Having  gone—probably  have  spoken  to  more  workers  in  the 
world  than  anybody  I’ve  met—workers  don’t  want  to  work  in  a 
sweatshop.  No  worker  has  ever  said  to  me,  ‘‘Oh,  we  need  more 
sweatshops  in  our  country.  This  is  exactly  what  we  need.’’  Every 
single  worker  wants  a  job.  Every  person  wants  a  job.  But  there’s 
an—even  if  they  don’t  know  the  laws  of  the  land,  they  know  that 
their  legal  rights—they  know  that  there’s  basic  human  rights  that 
should  be  respected.  And  that’s  what  they  want.  They  want  their 
legal  rights  respected.  And  yes,  they  want  the  right  to  organize  so 
that they can stand up and collectively bargain and have some sort 
of a democratic voice on the shop floor. 

I  think  that  workers—frankly,  the  hundreds  of  millions  of  work-
ers  around  the  world,  when  they  hear  of  this  legislation,  will  en-
dorse  it,  because  this  is  a  ticket  for  them  to  raise  worker-rights 
standards  in  their  country,  and  legal  standards  in  their  country, 
which will then lift tens and tens of millions of workers out of mis-
ery,  and  at  least  into  poverty.  And  I  think  it  would  be  the  single 
most important act that could be taken to end this race to the bot-
tom and put a floor on it, that there are certain standards beneath 
which you cannot go in the global economy. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  William  Jones,  who  is  the  Chairman  of 
Cummins-Allison Corporation in Chicago, was to be a witness here 
today. He was not able to be here, because of travel problems. But 
I want to read three sentences from his testimony. 

This  is  a  CEO  of  a  significant  corporation:  ‘‘Sweatshops  have 
sucked  much  of  the  life  out  of  remaining  labor-intensive  sectors  of 
American  manufacturing,  which  remain,  far  and  away,  the  best 
hope for the middle class and for our own poor. If unchecked, these 
trends  will  threaten  much  of  our  remaining  domestic  manufac-
turing  base,  a  manufacturing  base  which  underpins  our  national 
defense  and  prosperity.  Ultimately,  the  demise  of  so  much  manu-
facturing  will  undermine  the  entire  American  economy,  which  is 
the engine of world growth.’’ 

Let  me  thank  all  four  of  the  witnesses  today  for  being  here.  I’d 
be  happy  to  entertain  any  additional  thoughts  you  have  before  we 
close this hearing. 

This  is  the  first  hearing  on  legislation  of  this  type.  I  recognize 
that  the  legislation  will  be  resisted  by  some,  supported  by  others, 
including  support  from  people  in  the  business  community  who  be-
lieve  they  are  disadvantaged  by  being  told  they  have  to  compete 
with  others  that  are  willing  to  hire  children  in  conditions  of— 
sweatshop  conditions  abroad  in  order  to  drive  down  the  price  of 
their  product  here  at  home.  I  recognize  that  this  can  be  controver-
sial. 

I  don’t  think  there’s  a  disagreement  among  us  that  trade  can  be 
beneficial. I believe in trade. I believe in plenty of trade. But I also 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

believe  in  rules  of  trade  that  are  fair  to  us,  and  I  think  that  has 
been sadly lacking in our trade policy. 

Mr.  Griswold,  you  and  I  have  previously  discussed  all  of  these 
issues,  and  we  have  a  disagreement  about  them.  I  think  we  want 
the same thing for our country. We just have different views of how 
to achieve those things. 

Mr. Socolow, you have described to me something I wasn’t aware 
of,  and  that  is  an  effort  by  several  States,  which  I  both  commend 
and think makes a great deal of sense. 

Mr.  English,  your  discussion  of  the  steelworkers  who  lost  their 
jobs  and  the  Pennsylvania  House  furniture  is  another  example  of 
what  is  happening  with  the  inevitable  pull  of  good-paying  jobs, 
which  has  expanded  the  middle  class  in  this  country,  to  get  those 
jobs  moving  to  parts  of  the  world  where  you  can  pay  a  fraction  of 
the price that you now pay in this country. 

And,  Mr.  Kernaghan,  your  organization  has  done  a  lot  of  work 
over  a  long  period  of  time,  and  I  know  that,  without  your  work, 
much  of  the  disclosure  that  has  existed  would  still  be  undisclosed, 
and  we  would  still  have  abuses  in  those  areas  where  you  have  de-
scribed them and where you have been successful in trying to shut 
them down. 

So, I want to thank all of you. Anybody have any final comments 

you wish to make today? 

Mr. Griswold? 
Mr. GRISWOLD. Just two quick points, Senator. 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Mr.  GRISWOLD.  First,  this  isn’t  a  choice  of  whether  we  have  a 
manufacturing base in this country or not, it’s about what we man-
ufacture.  And  I  will  be  the  first  to  point  out  that  we’re  producing 
less furniture and fewer shoes and T-shirts than we were, and that 
they’re  producing  more  in  China.  But  our  overall  manufacturing 
output is up 50 percent. Our manufacturing capacity has continued 
to  increase  because  of  rising  productivity.  We  are  producing  more 
semiconductors,  chemicals,  sophisticated  machinery,  pharma-
ceuticals,  even  passenger  vehicles  and  parts.  This  is  trade  in  ac-
tion. We’re specializing in the higher-end parts. 

Let me make one other point. This is also a consumer issue. You 
know,  my  friend  to  the  right  here,  he  pointed  out  that  the  State 
of  New  Jersey  is  happy  to  pay  a  20-percent  premium.  And  that’s 
fine. The State of New Jersey can just pass the costs on to the tax-
payers,  and  they  may  not  even  know.  But  if  you’re  a  middle-class 
or  poor  family  in  North  Dakota,  a  20-percent-higher  bill  for  your 
expenses  is  real  money,  and  that  translates  into  lower  real  wages 
and a lower standard of living. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Since  you  raised  it,  Mr.  Griswold,  let  me  ask 
you,  as  a  consumer:  if  you  knew  that  a  product  that  was  coming 
from  the  work  of  an  11-year-old  working  11  to  14  hours  a  day,  7 
days  a  week,  in  a  sweatshop—if  you  knew  that,  would  you  prefer 
to  pay  a  premium  for  a  product—identical  product  that  was  pro-
duced  in  circumstances  that  were  not  coming  from  a  sweatshop 
from an 11-year-old child? 
Mr. GRISWOLD. Well—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  Would  you  make  that  choice,  as  a  consumer? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Mr. GRISWOLD. I would ask myself, Would that child—would her 
family be better off if I did not buy that product? And I’m not sure. 
You know, we had an experience in the early 1990s when Congress 
was  considering  quite  stringent  legislation  aimed  at  child  labor 
abroad.  In  Bangladesh,  they  laid  off  50,000  child  workers,  rapidly, 
to  avoid  coming  under  that  law.  It  never  became  law,  but  just  the 
threat  of  it  displaced  50,000  workers.  The  ILO,  UNICEF,  and 
Bangladeshi  labor  activists  went  and  investigated,  and  they  found 
that most of those 50,000 kids did not go to school, they either were 
unemployed  and  their  families  were  worse  off,  or  many  of  them 
ended up in occupations that were even less acceptable than a gar-
ment  factory—stone  crushing,  street  hustling,  some  of  them  even 
ended  up  in  prostitution.  So,  I  buy  products  from  poor  workers  in 
poor countries, and I make no apologies. 

Senator  DORGAN.  There’s  been  a  separate  study  since  that  time 
that  debunks  the  study  you  described,  so  we  can  put  both  studies 
in the record. * 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  I  think—your  answer,  kind  of,  stuns  me, 
because  your  answer  suggests  that  an  11-year-old,  and  the  family 
of  an  11-year-old,  would  be  better  off  having  that  11-year-old  in  a 
sweatshop,  working  11  to  14  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week,  and, 
therefore, you would not have any moral objections to either buying 
the  product  or  suggesting  that  the  presence  of  that  sweatshop  is 
not in any way objectionable to you. I—— 

Mr. GRISWOLD. It is. 
Senator  DORGAN.—I  find  it  personally  and  morally  objectionable 
that  anyone  would  put  children  in  these  circumstances.  Are  their 
parents better off having them earn an income? Well, I don’t know. 
But I—but is this about money to parents while we abuse children? 
In  my  judgment,  there’s  a  pretty  clear  moral  demarcation  here 
where you and I differ. 

Mr.  GRISWOLD.  It’s  about  survival,  for  many  of  these  families, 
unfortunately,. That’s the moral objection. Why are so many people 
living in poverty? It’s because of the failed policies of their govern-
ments—protectionism, corruption—— 

Senator DORGAN. But—— 
Mr. GRISWOLD.—the long list. 
Senator  DORGAN.  But  abusing  children  for  the  purpose  of  sur-
vival  is—I  mean,  that’s  the  very  purpose  of  this  hearing,  I  guess, 
and  I  think  we’ve  penetrated  to  the  roots  of  some  of  the  disagree-
ment. 

Mr. Kernaghan? 
Mr.  KERNAGHAN.  Senator,  if  I  may,  when  the  children  were  re-
moved  from  the  garment  factories  in  Bangladesh,  the  industry, 
since  that  time,  has  grown  from  800,000  workers  to  2.2  million 
workers, because the factories had to hire their older brothers and 
sisters  and  the  parents,  and  couldn’t  hire  children  anymore.  So,  it 
was  a  victory.  They  didn’t  need  children.  They  wanted  them  be-
cause you could pay them less and you can exploit them more. The 
industry  has  boomed.  But  it’s  boomed  now  with  older  children 
and—their older brothers and sisters. 

* The  information  referred  to  has  been  retained  in  Committee  files  and  can  be  found  at 
http://www.unicef.org/sowc97/download/sow1of2.pdf.  and  http://www.ilo.org/public/english/ 
standards/ipec/publ/download/2001lsynlbgmealen.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

I’d  also  like  to  point  out  that  we  run  a  $37-billion  trade  deficit 
with China on advanced technology goods, that five out of six ships 
that come from China to the United States return to China empty, 
and that one ship that goes back off and carries trash and garbage 
to  be  recycled.  We  have  a  big  problem.  It’s  not  just  in  manufac-
turing. It’s also in advanced technology and engineering and so on. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. English? 
Mr.  ENGLISH.  I  would  point  one  other  evil  out  about  child  labor. 
When that child is in the factory, working to try to help his family 
make a living, that child is not in school. And that means that we 
continue  the  cycle  of  poverty  that  exists  as  a  result  of  that.  We’ve 
got to break the cycle. And I think this piece of legislation is a good 
start  in  trying  to  break  that  cycle,  because  it  says  to  the  world, 
‘‘We are not going to allow sweatshop-made goods into this country, 
and we’re not going to allow it to be made here in this country, ei-
ther.  We’re  going  to  stand  up  for  the  rights  of  workers  around  the 
world.’’ 

Senator DORGAN. Let me, just as a final point, say we don’t have 
to  look  abroad  to  find  sweatshops.  You  can  find  them  in  the  his-
tory—the  dark  history  of  this  country,  and  a  century  and  a  half 
ago,  you  could  find  them  in  children  going  into  coal  mines.  And 
we’ve changed that. I mean, we, I think, have made great progress. 
But when I hear, as I have, stories of very young children working 
on the looms in carpet factories having their fingers scarred by put-
ting sulfur on the top of their fingertips, setting them on fire to cre-
ate  burns  to  create  scars  so  that,  as  they  use  the  needles  with 
these  rugs,  they’re  not  going  to  stick  themselves  and  hurt  them-
selves  and  bleed  on  the  rugs—when  I  hear  those  kinds  of  stories, 
I ask myself, Isn’t that the sort of thing that we decided, as a coun-
try, long, long ago, that we were not going to tolerate? Why should 
we,  as  a  global  economy,  tolerate  it?  We  should  not.  The  global 
economy  is  simply  a  definition  that  has  been  created  and  branded 
by  some  to  suggest  that  we  should  accept  that  which  we  long  ago 
decided we would not tolerate. 

The issue of sweatshops and the conditions under which products 
are  imported  into  this  country  is  a  very  important  issue  for  this 
country.  We’ve  already  decided  that  the  product  of  prison  labor  is 
unfair and should not come to this country. You cannot go to a big- 
box retailer and buy a pair of tube socks made in a foreign prison. 
It’s  illegal.  The  question  is,  Should  you  be  able  to  go  to  a  big-box 
retailer,  or  to  some  other  store,  and  purchase  those  same  products 
if they are made under conditions of sweatshop labor in which chil-
dren  are  abused?  The  answer,  in  my  judgment,  should  be  no.  And 
I  believe  those  companies  in  America  who  are  having  to  compete 
with  companies  that  are  importing  the  product  from  that  cir-
cumstance  ought  to  have  a  remedy.  And  that  would  be  a  market 
remedy,  rather  than  a  billy  club,  Mr.  Griswold—a  market  remedy 
by  which  other  companies  would  begin  to  work  to  enforce  this  by 
disclosing  and  exposing  the  unfair  shipment  of  products  from 
sweatshop labor into our market. 

This  has  been  an  interesting  discussion.  Mr.  Griswold,  I  assume 
we’ll  have  you  back,  given  the  disagreement  Senator  DeMint  and 
I have about trade. We will have other trade hearings because this 
is  a  very  important  issue.  Yesterday’s  $832-billion  trade  deficit 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

demonstrates dramatic failure, in my judgment, of our trade policy. 
So,  we’re  going  to  have  trade  hearings  in  this  subcommittee,  and 
my  colleague  and  I  will  make  certain  that,  Mr.  Griswold,  you  and 
others  who  take  your  position  will  be  invited.  We  think  debate  is 
good and important in order to hear different viewpoints. 

So,  I  want  to  thank  all  of  the  witnesses  who  have  come  today 
and  who  have  given  us  their  evaluation  of  a  very  important  piece 
of legislation. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
Mr. Chairman, thank you for calling this meeting. Although I have just joined the 
Subcommittee  on  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade  and  Tourism  this  year,  the  issue  we 
discuss  here  today  is  by  no  means  new  to  me.  The  scourge  of  foreign  sweatshops 
and its impact on U.S. workers is, indeed, distressingly familiar to me as a Mainer 
and a long-time member of the Senate Committee on Finance, which oversees trade 
policy. 

Early  in  the  twentieth  century,  the  mills  flanking  the  falls  of  the  Androscoggin 
River  in  my  hometown  of  Lewiston-Auburn  produced  one  quarter  of  the  Nation’s 
textiles.  Today,  those  mills—which  supported  my  family  and  thousands  like  it—are 
silent. A bellwether of what was to befall other American manufacturing sectors, the 
U.S.  textile  industry  is  nearly  extinct—the  domestic  jobs  it  once  supplied  now  al-
most all overseas. 

It would be one thing if so total a shift in production could be attributed to honest 
means  of  securing  a  comparative  advantage—if,  for  example,  foreign  factories  were 
more  efficient  or  its  workers  more  skilled,  both  of  which  are  demonstrably  untrue. 
It  is  quite  another,  however,  where  advantage  is  gained  by  market-distorting,  im-
moral  means  of  reducing  costs  long  outlawed  and  vigorously  policed  in  the  United 
States. 

That is why I was particularly troubled by reports that emerged last May of labor 
abuses  in  Jordanian  factories  that  made  goods  destined  for  the  U.S.  market.  These 
claims  of  forced  labor  and  human  trafficking  would  be  horrifying  no  matter  where 
they  took  place—but  in  this  case,  such  inhumane  practices  were  taking  place  in  a 
country with which the United States already had a Free Trade Agreement! 

During its subsequent consideration of the Oman Free Trade Agreement this past 
May, I was heartened to see the Senate Committee on Finance fulfill its duty under 
the procedures set forth in the Trade Promotion Authority to carefully consider each 
negotiated  agreement,  by  unanimously  passing  an  amendment  to  the  agreement 
that  would  deny  its  benefits  to  goods  made  with  the  use  of  forced  labor.  Therefore, 
like the other members of that committee, I was extremely disappointed to find that 
the  Administration  has  refused  to  reflect  the  Finance  Committee’s  amendment  in 
the implementing legislation it later officially submitted to Congress in June. 

The  unanimous  will  of  that  committee  to  improve  the  labor  provisions  of  the 
Oman FTA in light of nearly identical agreements’ obvious failure to adequately pro-
tect workers should not have been dismissed so lightly. Lacking the necessary labor 
protections, such agreements will put U.S. workers and businesses- which must ad-
here to our robust labor laws—at risk from unfair competition by overseas producers 
who  willfully  exploit  workers  in  their  facilities.  It  is  vital  that  we  continue  to  seek 
such protections not only in all our present and future trade agreements, but in our 
domestic laws as well. 

That is why Senator Rockefeller and I introduced the Trade Complaint and Litiga-
tion Accountability Improvement Measures Act—also called the Trade CLAIM Act— 
in January of this year. That act would give U.S. businesses and workers a greater 
say in whether, when, and how U.S. trade rights are enforced by amending Section 
301  of  the  Trade  Act  of  1974—the  statute  setting  forth  general  procedures  for  the 
enforcement of U.S. trade rights—to limit the U.S. Trade Representative’s ability to 
decline  an  interested  party’s  petition  to  take  formal  action  against  unfair  foreign 
trade  practices,  and  make  those  determinations  reviewable  by  the  U.S.  Court  of 
International Trade. 

With  U.S.  exporters  supporting  over  12  million  jobs  and  paying  an  average  of  18 
percent higher wages, the U.S. Government has an obligation to create and consist-
ently use enforcement mechanisms to protect them from the unfair or underhanded 
trade  practices  of  foreign  governments  and  businesses,  especially  those  as  vile  as 
labor exploitation. 

Thank you. 

(55) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

JOINT PREPARED STATEMENT OF BAMA ATHREYA AND NORA FERM, 

INTERNATIONAL LABOR RIGHTS FUND (ILRF) 

Introduction 

The International Labor Rights Fund (ILRF) has since its inception fought to end 
the  scourge  of  sweatshops  around  the  world.  Over  the  past  two  decades,  we  have 
witnessed the limitations of current legislative and voluntary strategies. During this 
period, while we have observed some gains for workers in some industries, we have 
also seen the much more widescale flight of domestic production in virtually all sec-
tors  to  low-wage  countries  with  unsafe  and  exploitative  working  conditions.  We  are 
not an organization that opposes global trade, per se, but we cannot ignore the fact 
that  the  flight  of  these  industries  is  driven  by  the  ‘‘race  to  the  bottom.’’  Multi-
national  corporations  seek  out  production  destinations  where  there  is  little  or  no 
regulation  of  labor  or  environmental  conditions;  they  find  such  destinations  in  the 
developing world. 

In  this  statement  we  seek  to  provide  an  assessment  of  anti-sweatshop  initiatives 
to  date,  to  highlight  the  cut  flower  sector  as  an  example  of  the  sweatshop  problem 
in today’s global economy, and to make the case for why new and binding legislative 
efforts are needed to regulate workers’ rights in global supply chains. 
History of ‘‘CSR’’ Initiatives 

There have been numerous expose´s of child labor, forced overtime, and inhumane 
wages  and  working  conditions  in  factories  overseas  producing  garments,  shoes,  and 
toys  for  the  U.S.  market.  The  typical  response  of  companies  or  industries  exposed 
by  the  media  is  to  adopt  and  publicize  voluntary  codes  of  conduct  as  a  non-binding 
promise  to  consumers  that  the  problems  will  be  corrected.  This  is  a  device  we  see 
used,  for  example,  by  Wal-Mart  today  to  explain  why  binding  regulations  are  not 
needed  to  correct  human  rights  abuses.  Collectively  the  various  codes  and  moni-
toring initiatives that have emerged over the past two decades are referred to under 
the broader rubric of ‘‘Corporate Social Responsibility,’’ or CSR. 

Interestingly  enough,  if  we  look  back  to  the  early  history  of  the  codes  of  conduct 
trend, we find an excellent case for the need for U.S. regulation to bind the behavior 
of US-based multinational corporations overseas. In the 1970s, revelations of the in-
volvement of International Telephone and Telegraph and other U.S. corporations in 
the bloody coup against the Allende government in Chile in 1973, and of huge bribes 
paid by the Lockheed Corporation to Japanese political figures to gain military con-
tracts  in  1975,  led  to  a  movement  by  non-governmental  organizations  (NGO’s)  and 
governments of developing countries to demand greater corporate accountability. In 
1975,  the  United  Nations  created  a  Commission  on  Transnational  Corporations 
which  set  out  to  negotiate  a  U.N.  Code  of  Conduct  on  Transnational  Corporations. 
However, during the 1980s, the U.N. Commission found it impossible to develop any 
mechanisms to make this code relevant, or even to research the level of compliance 
by  companies  or  countries  with  the  terms  of  the  codes.  By  the  end  of  the  decade, 
the  Commission  itself  was  virtually  without  funds  and  unable  to  carry  out  even  a 
fraction of its original mandate. 

Thankfully  at  that  time  U.S.  Congress  did  not  leave  the  matter  in  the  hands  of 
voluntary  initiatives,  but  enacted  strong  Federal  legislation,  the  Foreign  Corrupt 
Practices Act (FCPA). We will return to a discussion of the FCPA later in this testi-
mony. 

We  would  like  to  mention  two  additional  multilateral  voluntary  initiatives  and 
their  weaknesses,  in  order  to  put  to  rest  the  notion  that  human  rights  and  labor 
standards  can  be  safely  trusted  to  multilateral  organizations  or  to  voluntary 
changes  in  corporate  behavior.  We  have  now  had  thirty  years  to  witness  the 
progress  of  such  initiatives  and  it  should  be  clear  that  they  have  failed.  In  1976, 
the  Organization  of  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  (OECD)  passed  guide-
lines  on  multinational  corporations  that,  on  paper,  uphold  the  basic  core  rights  of 
workers.  To  date,  while  a  number  of  complaints  have  been  brought,  there  has  not 
been  a  single  instance  of  actual  enforcement  of  the  OECD  code.  In  1977,  the  Inter-
national  Labour  Organization  (ILO)  adopted  a  Tripartite  Declaration  of  Principles 
Concerning  Multinational  Enterprises  and  Social  Policy,  a  code  which  encompasses 
a broad range of rights and principles, and which includes a detailed complaint pro-
cedure  which  allows  for  an  ILO  Standing  Committee  on  Multinational  Enterprises 
to  investigate  a  company’s  practices.  However,  this  code  has  no  sanctions  or  other 
enforcement  mechanisms,  and  the  Standing  Committee  has  been  unable  even  to 
launch investigations. For example, in 1993 the committee received a request to re-
view  labor  practices  at  a  PepsiCo  bottling  facility  in  Guatemala  following  severe 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

harassment  and  intimidation  of  trade  union  members  there. 1 The  employer  rep-
resentatives  on  the  ILO  Standing  Committee  blocked  the  request  and  the  case 
ended  at  that.  These  examples  are,  arguably,  the  strongest  and  most  developed  of 
the  CSR  initiatives;  their  limitations  provide  a  compelling  argument  for  the  need 
for legally binding and enforceable alternatives. 
Case Study: The Cut Flower Sector 

What,  exactly,  is  the  problem?  We  will  use  a  description  of  the  cut  flower  sector 
to  illustrate  conditions  in  industry  after  industry  producing  goods  for  U.S.  con-
sumers  today.  The  cut  flower  sector  is  far  from  the  most  egregious  of  sectors  in 
terms  of  labor  rights  violations;  it  is  precisely  the  fact  that  the  violations  we  are 
about  to  describe  are  so  routine,  so  mundane,  in  so  many  sectors  that  make  this 
an appropriate illustrative case. 

Consumers  of  cut  flowers  associate  roses,  daisies  and  other  flowers  with  beauty 
and  romance.  Unfortunately  the  reality  for  the  workers  who  produce  those  flowers 
is not so lovely. A mere 10 years ago, most of the cut flowers retailed by U.S. florists 
were produced in the United States. In a decade, thanks to the expansion of global 
trade  agreements  and  preferential  access  to  the  U.S.  market,  the  flower  industry 
has changed entirely, consolidating distribution in the hands of a few very powerful 
corporations and relocating most flower production onto plantations in South Amer-
ica. 

It  is  particularly  appropriate  that  we  focus  on  this  industry  today,  as  Valentine’s 
Day  is  the  most  important  retail  day  in  the  United  States  for  cut  flowers.  Most  of 
the  flowers  we  will  buy  for  loved  ones  today  are  imported  from  greenhouses  in  Co-
lombia  and  Ecuador.  The  U.S.  buys  a  third  of  Ecuador’s  yearly  production  just  for 
one holiday: Valentine’s Day. 2 

We  mentioned  the  consolidation  of  the  cut  flower  industry.  No  longer  are  small 
cultivators  selling  to  ‘‘mom  and  pop’’  florists.  Today  cut  flowers  are  a  concentrated 
and  lucrative  business  for  a  small  handful  of  multinational  corporations.  Colombia 
exports  85  percent  of  its  cut  flowers  (approximately  $600  million)  to  the  United 
States. 3 In 2005, the Colombian flower industry provided 111,000 jobs directly, and 
an  additional  94,000  indirectly.  US-based  Dole  Fresh  Flowers,  a  subsidiary  of  the 
Dole  Food  Company,  is  the  largest  flower  plantation  owner  and  exporter  in  Colom-
bia, and the biggest exporter of flowers from Latin America. 

Ecuador exports 70 percent of its cut flowers to the U.S. market. Flowers are Ec-
uador’s  5th  largest  export.  The  flower  industry  employs  nearly  40,000  workers  di-
rectly and another 15,000 jobs are created indirectly. 4 
Poverty-level Wages 

The  majority  of  Colombian  flower  workers  receive  no  more  than  the  minimum 
wage,  $180  per  month,  which  covers  less  than  half  of  what  a  family  needs  to  meet 
basic  human  needs. 5 A  similar  situation  exists  in  Ecuador,  where  the  minimum 
wage is $160 a month. 

Obligatory and unpaid overtime is common. The Colombian non-governmental or-
ganization CACTUS produced a report covering the period of January 2000 through 
June 2004, which found that the most common reason for Colombian flower workers 
to seek legal advice was failure to pay salaries, including unpaid overtime. The sec-
ond most common reason was unfair dismissal, which leads to a high turnover rate 
within the industry. 
Child Labor 

Child labor is common in the cut flower plantations of Ecuador. The International 
Labor  Organization’s  2000  Rapid  Assessment  estimated  that  there  were  at  least 
12,000 15- to 18-year olds hired by Ecuadorian flower plantations. This work is con-
sidered one of the worst forms of child labor, because of the risks posed by intensive 
and  repetitive  work,  injuries  from  thorns,  use  of  sharp  tools,  prolonged  exposure  to 
heat,  cold,  and  sun,  and  exposure  to  toxic  pesticides. 6 The  IPEC  project  found  that 
45.8 percent of surveyed children working in the flower industry had suffered some 

1 Correspondence  from  the  International  Union  of  Food,  Agricultural,  Hotel,  Restaurant,  Ca-
tering, Tobacco and Allied Workers’ Associations to the International Labor Rights Fund, on file 
at ILRF. 

2 ‘‘Ecuador Fears Valentine’s Flower War,’’ BBC News, January 29, 2003. 
3 Asocolflores 2006. 
4 FUNDESS. 
5 DANE. ‘‘Encuesta Nacional de Hogares,’’ 2001. 
6 IPEC Aug 2003 Project Document. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

kind of occupational accident or illness, including respiratory problems, wounds, le-
sions, and digestive tract problems (2003). 
Discrimination and Sexual Harassment 

In a poll of almost 1400 Colombian flower workers, CACTUS found that 84.8 per-
cent  of  female  workers  had  been  required  to  undergo  a  pregnancy  test  as  a  pre-
requisite for employment. CACTUS also reports that an average of two flower work-
ers arrive at their office daily after being fired as a result of pregnancy, in violation 
of national labor laws. 

Obligatory  pregnancy  testing  is  also  routine  in  Ecuador.  An  Ecuadorian  woman 
interviewed  by  ILRF  in  late  2006  recounted:  ‘‘I  have  been  working  in  flowers  for  a 
total  of  7  years.  I  was  working  in  a  small  plantation  for  almost  a  year  when  I  got 
pregnant.  They  saw  that  my  pregnancy  became  quite  advanced.  I  was  8  months 
pregnant.  The  new  supervisor  wanted  me  to  do  the  same  work,  and  I  told  him  no, 
because  in  my  condition  I  couldn’t  do  the  same  things.  One  has  to  work  bending 
over and it is dangerous. The supervisor told me: ‘‘If you want to keep working here, 
you  have  to  do  all  of  the  work,  and  if  not,  you  can  just  leave . . . the  truth  is  I 
don’t  want  to  have  problems,  the  truth  is  I  don’t  want  pregnant  women  here,’’  he 
told  me.  They  fired  me.  In  July  they  didn’t  pay  me,  or  compensate  me  for  the 
months I worked before they fired me.’’ 

A 2005 study by the International Labor Rights Fund and Ecuadorian researchers 
found  that  over  55  percent  of  Ecuadorian  flower  workers  have  been  the  victims  of 
some kind of sexual harassment. 7 is was higher for 20–24 year old workers (71 per-
cent). Many women also said that they had been asked out by their bosses or super-
visors,  who  offered  to  improve  their  jobs  in  exchange.  Alarmingly,  we  also  found 
that  19  percent  of  flower  workers  have  been  forced  to  have  sex  with  a  coworker  or 
superior and 10 percent have been sexually assaulted on the job. Workers on flower 
plantations  have  no  recourse  to  any  sort  of  grievance  or  complaints  process  to  ad-
dress this serious problem. 
Violation of the Right to Associate 

The  Latin  American  flower  industry  is  characterized  by  a  lack  of  respect  for  core 
worker rights, reflected primarily in the industry’s failure to address freedom of as-
sociation,  the  right  to  organize  and  the  right  to  bargain.  This  industry  has  a  long 
history  of  vigorous  and  effective  opposition  to  the  formation  of  independent  demo-
cratic  unions,  using  a  variety  of  tactics  to  block  union  organizing,  including  illegal 
firings,  threats  to  close  plantations  where  workers  are  organizing,  anti-union  dis-
crimination, and bringing in company-favored unions. 

In Ecuador, only two plantations, out of a total of about 380, have unions. In Co-
lombia, to date, independent flower unions have been unable to win a single collec-
tive bargaining agreement despite nearly two decades of organizing efforts. 8 

In late 2004, workers founded a new independent union, Sintrasplendor. This was 
the  first  independent  union  that  had  been  successfully  established  in  a  Dole-owned 
flower company in Colombia. When Sintrasplendor received its registration from the 
Ministry of Social Protection, the company presented a list of objections, asking the 
Ministry to revoke the registration. Splendor Flowers used various forms of persecu-
tion against Sintrasplendor, including threats that union affiliates will be fired; as-
signing  extra  work  on  days  when  the  union  has  planned  assemblies  and  other  ac-
tivities;  hostility,  including  via  the  presence  of  members  of  the  Armed  Forces  and 
police at union activities held off company property. 

The  company  successfully  convinced  the  Ministry  to  revoke  the  union’s  registra-

tion, but after a lengthy appeal the workers reinstated the union. 

Dole  has  also  used  a  variety  of  ploys  to  deny  Sintrasplendor  its  right  to  a  collec-
tive  bargaining  agreement,  such  as  signing  a  different  collective  bargaining  agree-
ment  with  the  company-backed  union,  and  refusing  to  support  a  fair  process  to  de-
termine union representation at the company. 

On October 12, 2006 Dole announced that it is closing the Corzo farm at Splendor 

Flowers. 
Health Impacts 

Consumers  of  bouquets  from  Latin  America  may  be  interested  to  note  the  range 
of  chemicals  applied  to  the  flowers  before  they  bring  a  bouquet  to  their  noses.  A 
study  of  8,000  Colombian  flower  workers  found  that  they  were  exposed  to  127  dif-
ferent pesticides, three of which are considered extremely toxic by the World Health 
Organization. In addition, 20 percent of these pesticides are either banned or unreg-

7 Study by ILRF, Norma Mena (IEDECA), and Silvia Proan˜ o (INNFA), 2005. 
8 US/LEAP, February 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

istered  for  use  in  the  U.S.  because  they  are  extremely  toxic  and  carcinogenic.  To 
make matters worse, greenhouses are not always completely cleared of people before 
fumigation begins. Doctors in the floricultural regions of Colombia report up to five 
cases of acute poisoning each day. A survey by the International Labor Organization 
(ILO)  found  that  only  22  percent  of  Ecuadorian  flower  companies  trained  their 
workers  in  the  proper  use  of  chemicals.  Two-thirds  of  Colombian  and  Ecuadorian 
flower  workers  suffer  from  work-related  health  problems,  according  to  the  Victoria 
International Development Education Association (VIDEA). 

According to CACTUS, when entirely unprotected workers are exposed to the toxic 
pesticides regularly used on flower plantations, reactions including headaches, vom-
iting, and fainting can be felt immediately. Other short term effects include rashes, 
impaired  vision,  and  skin  discoloration.  Repeated  exposure  to  these  chemicals  can 
lead to asthma and neurological problems. 

Women  workers  suffer  particular  health  problems  as  a  result  of  pesticide  expo-
sure,  including  miscarriages  and  stillbirths.  Furthermore,  a  1990  study  by  the  Co-
lombian  National  Institute  of  Health  found  that  17  percent  of  children  born  to 
former  flower  workers  had  congenital  malformations.  Almost  80  percent  of  Ecua-
dorian flower workers and 70 percent of Colombian flower workers are women. 

Other  health  problems  often  result  from  the  intensive,  repetitive  work,  and  long 
working  hours.  In  2006,  a  Colombian  woman  told  ILRF  about  her  problems  with 
carpal  tunnel  syndrome:  ‘‘I  had  been  working  at  this  plantation  for  4  years  when 
my  hands  started  to  fall  asleep.  I  would  work  from  6  am  until  5  or  6  pm,  using 
clippers all day long. The pain went all the way up to my shoulder. I have had sur-
gery  on  my  right  hand  three  times.  I  feel  like  I  am  going  to  lose  this  finger.  It  is 
really  hard  to  bend  it  or  move  it.  I  get  to  work  at  6  am,  and  by  8:30  am  my  hands 
hurt so much I can’t stand it. They didn’t give me enough time to recover from the 
surgery  before  sending  me  back  to  work.  I  haven’t  recovered,  and  every  day  my 
hand hurts more.’’ 
Voluntary CSR Initiatives in the Cut Flower Sector 

All of the abuses described above exist despite the industry’s participation in two 

voluntary CSR initiatives, Florverde and Social Accountability International. 

In  1996,  the  Colombian  cut  flower  industry,  in  the  form  of  the  Association  of  Co-
lombian  Flower  Exporters  (ASOCOLFLORES),  developed  its  own  voluntary  re-
sponse  to  forestall  consumer  pressure  to  end  labor  rights  abuses.  This  program, 
Florverde,  was  essentially  a  better  business  practices  association  that  evolved  into 
a  certification  system.  The  Florverde  program  is  ‘‘based  on  the  principle  of  self- 
management . . . aiming  at  gradual  but  continuous  progress’’. 9 It  requires  signed 
work  contracts  with  employees,  trainings  on  first  aid  and  pesticide  use,  adequate 
and  clean  toilets  and  other  facilities.  It  also  monitors  issues  regarding  salary,  bo-
nuses, overtime, disciplinary measures, and health care. Florverde has remained re-
sistant,  however,  to  adopting  the  right  to  free  association  and  collective  bargaining 
as  part  of  its  certification  standards,  even  though  this  is  one  of  the  ILO’s  funda-
mental labor conventions. 

As for Dole Fresh Flowers, which has a lion’s share of distribution of South Amer-
ican  cut  flowers  for  the  U.S.  market,  its  parent  company  Dole  also  responds  to  all 
criticism of its abuse of workers by pointing to its membership in a weak and unen-
forceable voluntary CSR initiative, the Social Accountability International program. 
However,  its  membership  in  SAI  has  not  prevented  it  from  violating  key  labor 
rights,  including  freedom  of  association,  and  even  ignoring  SAI’s  direct  encourage-
ment to comply with these standards. The NGO US/LEAP worked with SAI in 2005 
to  pressure  Dole  to  recognize  and  negotiate  a  collective  bargaining  agreement  with 
the  legally  established  union  Sintrasplendor  at  its  plantations  Splendor  Flowers  in 
Colombia.  On  September  15,  2005,  Dole  agreed  to  sit  down  and  negotiate  with 
Sintrasplendor  in  good  faith.  SAI  assisted  in  negotiating  the  agreement  with  Dole 
and  promised  to  help  ensure  that  the  agreement  was  fully  and  promptly  imple-
mented.  US/LEAP,  Dole,  SAI,  and  a  Sintrasplendor  member  met  on  September  20, 
2005 to begin discussing next steps toward carrying out the agreement. By October 
2005  it  was  clear  that  Dole  was  not  honoring  these  new  agreements  with  SAI  and 
with  US/LEAP.  A  year  later,  Dole  still  had  not  sat  down  at  the  negotiating  table 
with Sinatrasplendor, and in October 2006, Dole announced it would close Splendor 
Flowers  in  2007.  As  a  voluntary  initiative,  SAI  did  not  have  the  power  to  help 
Sintrasplendor workers get any response from Dole except to cut and run. 

9 Asocolflores  1999,  cited  in  ‘‘On  Export  Rivalry  and  the  Greening  of  Agriculture—The  Role 

of Eco-Labels.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

New Strategies to End Sweatshops 

60 

Surely  we  can  do  better  than  to  leave  these  horrific  abuses  to  the  market  to  ad-
dress  through  such  weak  and  voluntary  efforts.  None  of  the  systems  noted  above 
contain any truly meaningful sanction for bad behavior. The need for voluntary CSR 
initiatives  to  continue  a  business  relationship  with  participating  corporations  has 
compromised their real ability to expose problems. Consumers need and deserve an 
independent  watchdog  rather  than  the  current  ‘‘fox  guarding  the  henhouse’’  pro-
grams. 

Nor  can  we  simply  rely  on  the  enforcement  of  domestic  laws  in  most  developing 
countries.  Just  as  employers’  interests  are  the  determining  factor  in  the  voluntary 
CSR  systems,  so  too  do  employers  exercise  much  greater  influence  than  workers  in 
the political landscape of countries such as Colombia and Ecuador. As we have seen 
first-hand  in  our  current  case  against  Wal-Mart,  retailers  who  have  played  such  a 
strong  role  in  the  development  of  voluntary  systems  are  usually  loath  to  see  such 
systems assist in holding the companies themselves legally liable for non-compliance 
with  local  labor  laws.  This  alone  is  evidence  enough  that  local  law  enforcement  is 
not the answer. 

Corporate behavior generally is hardly on the upswing, despite many years of ex-
poses  by  human  rights  advocates;  ILRF’s  recent  investigative  work  has  uncovered 
cases of brutal exploitation of child workers, continued instances of forced labor, and 
torture  and  murder  of  trade  unionists.  Multinational  corporations  continue  to  be 
heavily  implicated  in  such  practices,  despite  the  supposed  world  consensus  that 
these acts constitute fundamental human rights violations. Apparently corporations 
can only be convinced to respond to such abuses when there is a real threat of sanc-
tions. 

That  is  why  we  are  so  grateful  for  the  initiative  of  Senator  Byron  Dorgan  and 
Senator  Lindsey  Graham  to  promote  a  new  legislative  remedy  for  worker  rights 
abuses in the global supply chains that bring consumer goods to the United States. 
It  is  truly  a  pleasure  to  find  ourselves  in  a  political  moment  where  the  debate  is 
no longer, is binding legislation necessary? but rather, what shape should such leg-
islation  take.  There  are  sufficient  precedents  in  U.S.  legislation  already  to  begin  to 
move  toward  the  long-term  goal  of  ending  the  trade  in  sweatshop-made  goods.  We 
will summarize some important precedents below, and look forward to a lively, sub-
stantive  exchange  on  the  contribution  the  S.  367  Bill  to  amend  the  Tariff  Act  of 
1930  to  prohibit  the  import,  export,  and  sale  of  goods  made  with  sweatshop  labor 
will add to the efforts that have gone before. 

There  is  ample  precedent  in  U.S.  law  to  support  the  new  steps  now  proposed  in 
S.  367.  The  U.S.  Government  has  long  defined  the  repression  of  the  right  to  orga-
nize as an unfair trade practice, through Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974. How-
ever, this section of the Trade Act has never been effectively enforced. Current ILRF 
work includes representation of workers who have been severely harassed, detained, 
‘disappeared’  and  tortured  by  paramilitaries  in  Central  America  for  attempting  to 
organize  unions.  It  is  high  time  the  sweatshop  movement  take  on  such  cases  and 
argue  publicly  that  U.S.  tradeofficials  treat  the  torture  and  murder  of  workers  as 
at  least  as  serious  a  problem  as  dumping.  We  believe  the  public  arguments  can  be 
effectively  made,  and  that  companies  benefiting  from  extreme  repression  of  trade 
unionists  can  and  should  be  penalized  both  under  current  trade  rules  and  through 
new legislation. 

The Tariff Act of 1930 itself has long contained a prohibition against the importa-
tion  of  prison-made  goods;  in  the  late  1990s,  that  language  was  amended  by  then- 
Representative  (now  Senator)  Bernie  Sanders  and  Senator  Tom  Harkin  to  include 
prohibitions against the importation of goods made by forced child labor. Again, the 
language  of  this  act  provides  for  a  potential  mechanism  to  sanction  offending  cor-
porations directly, by designating their imports as ‘‘hot’’ goods; however, to date en-
forcement  of  this  act  has  been  weak.  Sweatshop  advocates  working  specifically  on 
cases  of  child  labor  or  forced  labor  should,  however,  continue  to  push  the  process 
created  under  this  act  as  it  raises  at  least  the  possibility  of  real  sanctions  against 
offenders. 

In  recent  years,  additional  legislation  with  a  broader  scope  than  thes  acts  has 
been proposed, though never passed. As early as 1991, the U.S. Congress attempted 
to legislate a code of conduct for U.S. corporations doing business in China. The code 
would have required an annual review of the practices of all corporations in China, 
and would have provided for some sanction to those companies that failed to imple-
ment the code. The initiative has been revived a number of times over the past dec-
ade, and at different moments was passed by both the House of Representatives and 
the U.S. Senate. During the debate over whether to grant Permanent Normal Trade 
Relations status for China in 1999, a new version was circulated, allowing for public 
review of corporate behavior, and sanctioning non-compliant corporations by prohib-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

iting  them  from  access  to  any  commercial  support  from  the  U.S.  Government.  The 
legislation  was  not  adopted.  A  parallel  initiative  was  taken  by  the  European  Par-
liament,  which  passed  a  resolution  calling  for  EU-based  corporations  to  abide  by  a 
set  of  human  rights  principles  in  their  operations  worldwide.  However,  while  the 
European  Parliament  may  be  empowered  to  review  corporate  behavior,  it  is  unable 
to impose sanctions on violators. 

Finally,  we  note  again  the  tremendous  example  set  by  the  U.S.  Foreign  Corrupt 
Practices  Act  (FCPA)  and  request  that  Congress  look  to  the  moral  example  set  by 
Senator  Frank  Church  and  that  bill’s  supporters  in  the  1970s  as  a  model  for  the 
way  forward  today.  The  FCPA  empowers  Federal  authorities  to  launch  investiga-
tions  and  to  sanction  offending  corporations.  This  power  exists  in  U.S.  law  today 
and  therefore  provides  an  important,  and  workable,  precedent  for  the  proposed  S. 
367 bill. The FCPA demonstrates that laws governing corporate accountability glob-
ally  can  be  enforced.  Countries  around  the  world  have  seen  the  FCPA  as  a  model 
and it has been a shining example of moral leadership by the United States on the 
critical global issue of corruption. 

We need more such examples of moral leadership by the United States today. We 
extend  once  again  our  gratitude  to  Senators  Dorgan  and  Graham,  and  the  co-spon-
sors of S. 367, for blazing a path forward for workers’ rights around the world. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:17 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 035685 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35685.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

